Google 



This is a digital copy of a book that was preserved for generations on library shelves before it was carefully scanned by Google as part of a project 

to make the world's books discoverable online. 

It has survived long enough for the copyright to expire and the book to enter the public domain. A public domain book is one that was never subject 

to copyright or whose legal copyright term has expired. Whether a book is in the public domain may vary country to country. Public domain books 

are our gateways to the past, representing a wealth of history, culture and knowledge that's often difficult to discover. 

Marks, notations and other maiginalia present in the original volume will appear in this file - a reminder of this book's long journey from the 

publisher to a library and finally to you. 

Usage guidelines 

Google is proud to partner with libraries to digitize public domain materials and make them widely accessible. Public domain books belong to the 
public and we are merely their custodians. Nevertheless, this work is expensive, so in order to keep providing tliis resource, we liave taken steps to 
prevent abuse by commercial parties, including placing technical restrictions on automated querying. 
We also ask that you: 

+ Make non-commercial use of the files We designed Google Book Search for use by individuals, and we request that you use these files for 
personal, non-commercial purposes. 

+ Refrain fivm automated querying Do not send automated queries of any sort to Google's system: If you are conducting research on machine 
translation, optical character recognition or other areas where access to a large amount of text is helpful, please contact us. We encourage the 
use of public domain materials for these purposes and may be able to help. 

+ Maintain attributionTht GoogXt "watermark" you see on each file is essential for in forming people about this project and helping them find 
additional materials through Google Book Search. Please do not remove it. 

+ Keep it legal Whatever your use, remember that you are responsible for ensuring that what you are doing is legal. Do not assume that just 
because we believe a book is in the public domain for users in the United States, that the work is also in the public domain for users in other 
countries. Whether a book is still in copyright varies from country to country, and we can't offer guidance on whether any specific use of 
any specific book is allowed. Please do not assume that a book's appearance in Google Book Search means it can be used in any manner 
anywhere in the world. Copyright infringement liabili^ can be quite severe. 

About Google Book Search 

Google's mission is to organize the world's information and to make it universally accessible and useful. Google Book Search helps readers 
discover the world's books while helping authors and publishers reach new audiences. You can search through the full text of this book on the web 

at |http: //books .google .com/I 



I 



TAYLOR 

INSTITUTION 

LIBRARY 



ST. GILES OXFORD 



Vet. F-v.TT. 3, ixQ 5- 





'*^v 



#«llft^ 



r 



i 




l^yk^ 



^' 




^.i' 



S!«3!^--Vj ■^i 



HE 




R I A D E 



r >'*■. 



AN E P I C K 




O 




M 



r'N 



T E N C A N T OS. 

Traniiattd ftorti tte Fktv-cu < 



INTO 



* r 



&&lijb Blank VERSE 

■ t 

T '' . * . . 

To Which are -nowaddcd. 

The Argument to each CANTO, 



A N I> 



LARGE NOTES 

HxsTOKXcX. and,C.,Txc.. 



, 



Printed forC. DAyis, in Vater-JStojier'ftow, 



*»•■-»• 





Advertisement to the Reader. 

TH E following .Dedication was writ- 
ten in Efiglijh by Monfieur de Vol- 
tairfi and prefixed to his French Edition of 
the Henriade, publiflied by himfelf in Lon- 
don, 



I 



T O T H E 

QUEEN. 

MJDJM, 

iT is the Fate of Henry 
the Fourth to be pro- 
tedled by an Evglifh 
Queen. He was allilted 
by that Great Elizahth who was 
in her Age the Glory of her Sex. 
By whom can his Memory be fo 
well proteded, as by her who 
A 2 refeov 



(iv) 

refenibles fo much EUxahth in 
her perfonal Virtues ? 

Yo UH MAJESTY will find 
in this Book, bold, impartial 
Truths i Morality unftained 
with Superftition ; a Spirit of 
Liberty equally abhorrent of 
Rebellion and of Tyranny ; the 
Rights of Kings always aflert- 
ed, and ^thofe of Mankind ne- 
ver laid afide. 

The fame Spirit in which 
it h. written, gave me the Con- 
fidence, to offer it to the Virtu- 
ous Confort of a King, who 
among fo many Crown d Heads, 
enjoys, almoft alone, the inefti- 
mable Honour of ruling a Free 
Nations a King who makes bis 
Power confift in being Beloved, 
and his Glory in being Juft. 

' * Our 



( V. ) 

Our Defcartes, who was the 
greateft Philofopher in Europe, 
before Sir Ifaac Newton appear- 
ed, dedicated his Principles .to 
the celebrated Princeft Palatine 

» 

Elizaheth j not, faid he, becaufe 
ftie was a Princefs, for true Phi- 
lofophers refpeft Princes, and 
never flatter them ; but becaufe 
of all his Readers (he under- 
ftood him the beft, and loved 
Truth the moft. 

I BEG Ledve, MADAM, 
(without comparing myfelf to 
Defcartes) to dedicate the 

Hbnriade to your majesty 

upon the like Account; not 
only as the ProieBrefs of all A rt^ 
and Sciences, but as the Beft 
Judge of them. 

1am with that profound Re- 
fpe6l:,which is due to the Great- 

A 3 eft 



( vi ) 

eft Virtue, as well as to the 

JHigheft Rank, 



May it pleafe your Majefty, 



Tour Majeftys 

V 

mofl HumMe, 
mojl Dutiful^ 
mofl Qibliged Servant ^ 



VOLTAIRE. 



PREFACE. 



IT has been cuftomary for Au- 
thors to recommend their Wri- 
tings, by telling us on what Oc- 
cafion it' was written, as during 
Confinement by bad Weather, 
or bad Conftitution, Want of other Bufi- 
nefs, and not knowing what elle to do ; fo 
they thought of obliging their Readers 
with their wafte Time at the Expence of 
wafting their own. But I can truly fay, that 
this Tranflation was the Efieft of a very 
agreeable Leifure laft Summer in the Coun- 
try, where having not the Temptation of 
Books to keep me in a Clofet, I whil'd away 
the pleafant Hours in Walks and Shades, 
which have ever been the Haunts of the 
Mufes; and no wonder if I fancy'd at lead 
A + the 



The PREFACE. 

the Infedion had feiz'd me, and a Fit of 
verfifying enfu'd. 

Gaudentes rure Camcenx. 
^&e Mufes gladdert in the Shades. 

But being loath to venture upon my own 
Strength, I took to my Afliftance a late 
Performance of a French Poet, Monfieur de 
Voltaire, whofp Poem, the Henriade, 
was in good Efteem, before fome other Per- 
formances of his gave Offence to thofe who 
had before efteem'd him. 

The Henri ADE, with all its Faults, is the 
befk Hero'tck Poem in the French Tongue ; 
and I was willing my Countrymen, who dp 
not underftand it, fliould fee what the French 
are capable of in Rpick Poetry, which will 
appear to be very little to thofe that are ac-: 
quainted with Milton r, and who is there in 
England that can read, and is not acquaint- 
ed with him, or will dare own it ? Dryden 
afBrcfts, that the French Genius and Language 
are not capable pf Heroick Poetry. The 
French, iays he, have fet up Purh^ for the 
Standard af their Language ^ and a Mafculine 

Vigour is that of ours. Like their Tongue is 

'■■■■-'■■ ^^ 



The PREFACE. 

the Genius of their Poets y tt^ht and trsfling in 
Compartfon of the Englifti, mere proper for 
Sonnets^ Madrigals and Elegies, than Heroick 
Poetry, And in another Place of his Dedi- 
cation of the M.neis, Ifatd before<, and I re- 
peat it, that the affeBed Purity of the French 
has unfinevfd their Language, 

Thefe Criticifms of his are as juft as moft 
of his other Criticifms, that is, they muft be 
wnderftood iij a limited S^nfe: For there are 
Inflances of Didion in Corneille and Segraisy 
where the Language does not want Sinews, 
and it may well be obje€ted to me, that if 
thp French Genius and Tongue arc incapable 
of Epick Poetry, it ought to have difcou- 
rag'd me from undertaking this Vcrfion; but 
Dry den Jiad not feen the Henri ade when 
he. wrote what we have cited out of his I^i- 
ftle to the Lord Normanhy 5 and it muft be 
own'd, that Mr.VoLTAiR^'^ Poem ha& Beau- 
ties in it> which are well worth reading. We 
hope they are not all loft in the Tranflation. 
I chofe to render it in Blank Verfe to have 
the more Liberty in rendring it : For con- 
fining myfelf to the Author's Senfe, and 
pretty ?nuch to his Words, I fhould hav? 
' ' beep. 



The P R E F A C E. 

been too much fetter'd to have been confin'd 
alfo to Rhyme, of which Mtlton fays, Rhyme 
is no mcejfar'y Adjun5i or true Ornament of 
Poem or good Verfe in longer fVorks efpeciallyy 
but the Invention of a barbarous Age to fet off 
wretched Matter and lame Meeter, gracd in- 
deed fine e by the Ufe of fome famous Modem 
Poets carried away by Cufiom^ but much to 
their own Vexation', Hmdranc6 and Conjlraint 
to exprefs many 'Things otherwife^ and for the 
mofl Part worfe than elfe they would have 
exprefs d them., &c. 

The greateft Poets and moft celebrated 
Rhymefters are Proofs of this. I have ob- 
ferv'd elfewherc, that Dryden turns Phalaris's 
Bull into a Cow, purely for the fake of a 
Rhyme to Low; and the French, whole 
Poetry depends in a great Meafure on the 
Jingle, are frequently fubjed to the like In- 
con veniencies. St, Amand, one of their Aca- 
demy, writing in Praife of a great Friend of 
his, Mr. Faret, a Member alfo of the Aca- 
demy,.a learned, virtuous, fober Man, made 
him a Sot and a Debauchee meerly becaufe 
his Name, Faret, rhy m'd to Gabaret, z.Tc-^ 
vern, according to the French Way of rhy-. 
ming, as, venu 



The PREFACE. 



venu \ claret eV j ferdd > 
tnconnu^ furete\ defero^d\ 

In Efjglt/h Rhyme, if not eafy and exa<9:» 
is abominable, as thefe Rhymes of our beft 
Verfifiers. 

^^^ \ Drvd \ ^^^^ \ ^^^ 
Eyei ^ ^ Oaths J long 

Hour ? Thorn 
Kalendar i Arm^ &c. 

In the Tranflation of Ov'td^z Epiftlcs by- 

2)ry^<?« and others. \j > in the EJfa'^ 

on Crttkifnh tho' the Rhymes in that Poem 
are as well chofen as in any Poem in our 
Tongue ; and what is laid here is not to de- 
preciate the Merit of any of the Poets, whofe 
Rhymes are mention'd, but to fhew the Ne- 
cefllty they are often under to give bal4 
Rhymes rather than none. 

I am fenfible 'tis invidious and dangerous 
to lay any thing but Prajfe of Authors, and 
efpecially of Poets, who are as jealous of 
their Fame as Lovers are of their Miftrefles, 
&nd would quarrel with the very Wind that 

blows 



The PREFACE. 

blows on them; but this is a Foible^ and a 
fure Sign that Writers are afraid of Critkifm^ 
wjhen they hate it. An innocent Man fears 
oot Laws nor Judges; an Offender lives in 
conllant Dread of both. For my Part, if a 
Man of Judgment fhews me an Error, ei- 
ther publickly or privately, and does it with 
the Humanity we owe oile another, as we 
are Men, and as we, are Neighbours, I am 
thankful to him, and fhould reckon it bafe 
and ungrateful, infolently and arbitrarily to 
anfwer him with ill Names and ill Manners, 
negla9:ing hisCriticifm which I eou'd not an- 
fwer, as too many Authors have lately taken a 
Liberty to do, more to the Prejudice of their 
dwft Cb^ra^ers, than thofe of the Perfbns 
they ab«s*d. But to return to my Subjedl. 

Bofleattdkyiy R^yme fs a Slave and fhould 
obey, and wheil it rebels, Wft is the Slave, 
and its ChsltadHef is as nriuch funk by it, as 
if the Mafler was reduc'd to wait on the 

As great a Critick as B»ileau (the I^rd 
Rofcamrmtj) feys of Rhyme. 

' And by Succejion in unktter'd TimeSf 
Jk Bards begariy fi Monks rung en the Chimes. 

2 He 



/ 



The PREFACE. 

* ■ 

He adds, of A//7/(?«'s rejeding thisConftraint: 

hut now that Phoebus and the Sacred Nine 
With all their Beams on our bleji IJland Jbine^ 
Why jhotid we not their ancient Rites rejlore^ 
And be what Rome or Athens were before^ 
Have we forgot how RzphztV s numerous Profi* 
Led our exalted Souls thro' heavenly Camps. 
Oh may I live to hail the glorious Day^ 
Andfing loud Paeans in the crowded Way. 
When in triumphant State the Bricifh Mufe^ 
Urue to herfelf {hall barbarous Aid refufe^ 
And in the Roman Majefiy appear^ 
Which none knows better^ and none comes fo near. 

'Tis certain the Romans could not endure 
the barbarous Jingle of Rhymes. Their Ear 
was too delicate to be delighted with that 
Identity of Sound at the End of a Verfe, and 
their Judgment too juft to be pleas'd with 
Trifles inftead of Wit. But I queftion wher 
ther Rhyme is not older than Rymer makes 
it, an Inngva^tion of the Arahtam^ who over- 
run the Romaff Empire i lOO Years ago ; and 
it muft be\a J^g ^hilc after, that it pre- 
vaiFd among tl>e ^hj^iai} Monks, more bar- 
barous even than; thoijb Barbarians. I am apt 
to believe that the very firft Vcrfe-makers orr 

'^^Paradife Lojl^ Book vL. . ; , , .... 

namented 



The PREFACE. 

namented their Meeter with this Chiming. 
Le Clerc tells us, that David's Pfalms were 
written in Rhyme. If fo, we are to go far- 
ther back than the Arabians for the Ufe of it. 
The Lord Jiofcommon makes the Britifh 
Bards to have begun Rhyming. Now the 
Bards were before the Druids, who in Time 
got the Start of them. Straho fays, they were 
Songfters or Poets, and Fejlus, that they fung 
in Recitatroe Verle. Sammes very fond of 
bringing his Britons from Phosmcia, endea- 
vours to prove that thefe Bards were of Phoe- - 
nician Original ; and as their Verfes rhym'd, 
it may reafonably be conjedur'd, that the 
firft Poets did every where rhyme their Verr 
fbs. We have Indian Verfes rhym'd in De- 
laef^ Voyages, and Perjick Verfes rhym'd 
in P. Megaillans ; and the Cuftom of Rhym- 
ing being in both the Indies, where the Na- 
tives and Poets never heard of each other, 
nor of Bards, nor Monks ; it may, I fay, be 
reafonably cpnjeftur'd^' that the fame Sound- 
ing at the End of the Verfe, whether at firft 
accidental or ftudy'd, was miftaken for Mu- 
fick lik6 the tinckling of Brafs. But the 
Refinement of politer Nations and Ages 

threw 



The PREFACE. 

threw ofF that Slavery ; for foch is it, even 
by the Confeffion of Dr'^den^ than whom no 
Poet ever rhym'd better, as he himfelf at 
the lame Time infinuates. Hannibal Caro, 
fays he, freed himfelf -from the Shackles of 
Modern Rhyme, if it he modern, which is cer- 
tainly a Conjlraint even to the befi Poets, and 
thofe who make it with mofi Eafe. What it 
adds to Sweetnefs it takes away from Senfe, 
and he who lofes the leafi by it may be caWd 
a Gamer. It often makes usfwerve from an 
Author' sMearting, However,it muft be own'd, 
that • Rhymes are to be met with in Latin 
Poets, efpecially in the Age after the Clajfick ; 
and, if I forget not, befides the Sorori and Ux- 
ori of Ovid, there are the like Inflances in 
others ; but they may be purely the EiFe<3: 
of Chance, as we find in Lord Rofcommons 
Verfion of Horace'^ Art of Poetry ieveral 
Rhymes, tho* the Tranllation was intended 
to be in Blank Verfe. 
This of Aufofiius, 

Vel tria fotanti, vel ter tria multiplicanti. 

was doubtlefs chofen for its Mufick at that 

Time the has Empire, about 370 Years after 

a Chrift, 




The PREFACE. 

Chrift, long before Mahomet and his Arabi- 
ans made a Noife in the World. 

I muft confefs the late Affectation of Mil- 
tomcks, or Verfe in Imitation of Milton, with- 
out Rhyme, and fwoln with the like com- 
pound Words, are not at all to my Gout. 
I think it is a Vice, as is all Kind of Affec- 
tation, and an Abufe of a Manner which 
Milton would not have given into, had not 
his Subjeft requir'd it. The Perfons he in- 
troduced were God, his Son, the Arch-an- 
gels and Immortal Spirits; and any other 
Language than what he Audied to adapt to 
it, would have been beneath its Dignity. It 
was for this Reafbn he has fo many Grecifmsy 
Latini/ms, Compound and Antique Words, 
and that he threw off Rhyme. Tho' I read 
the Seafbm with a great deal of Pleafure, 
yet I could not without Regret fee fb many 
good Thou^ts, a«d fi> much good Paint- 
ing disfigur'd with the ^tiffnefs of an affc«9:- 
ed Style. 

Let usfee how eaJy) bowi(^ ionofous 
and charming is Mtlton in that Sylvan Scene, 
Book IV. 

Befwixt 



i.' 



The PREFACE 



Betwixt tbem Lawns or Level- Downs and Flocks 
Grazing the tender Herb^ were interposd^ 
Or palmy Hillock^ or the jlowry Lap 
Ofjome irriguous Valley^ fpread her Store^ 
'Plow'rs of all Hue^ and without Tthorn the Rofe. 
Another Side umbrageous Grots and Caves 
Of cool Recefs^ o'er which the mantling Vine 
Lays forth her purple Grape^ and gently creeps 
Luxuriant. Mean while murmuring Waters fall 
Down theflope Hills difpers'dy or in a Lake^ 
T!hat to the fringed Bank with Myrtle crown d • 
Her Chryftal Mirrour boldsy unite their Streams. 
The Birds their Choir apply ^ Airs^ Vernal Airs 
Breathing the Smell of Field and Grove attune 
The trembling Leafs -y while univerfal Pan, 
Knit with the Graces and the Hours in Dance ^ 
Led on the Eternal Spring. 

I chofe this moft beautiful Image, as well 
to fhew the little need there is of Rhime in 
the fofteftDefcriptions as the wonderful Eafi- 
nefs of the Poet amidft fo much Dignity and 

Elevation. 

And here let us paufe a little to take Plea- 
fure in this Triumph of Modern Engl'tfio 
Poefy over the Ancient, over even the Gret^k 
and the Latin. Let the Learned produce a 
Paflage in all the Id^ls and Ejclogues of An- 
tiquity in any Meafure comparable to 

B While 



The PREFACE. 

fTbile umverfal Pan 
fCttit with the Graces and the Hours in Bance^ 
JLe4 on th' Eternal Spring, 

My Lord Rofcommons Verfipn of Horace 
de Arte Poettca in Bl^nk Verfe is eafy and 
iinaffcftcd ; and yet as he w^s giving the 
Law to Pp^ts, he might have given his Dic- 
tion all jhe Grandeur that our Language 
and the Spbjeifb were capable o^ and it 
would have been decent and natural, hut he 
chofe to prefervc the Epiftolary Manner, and 
to imitate Milton only in rejefling Rhinae. 

The Great Lord Somers, equally eminent 
as a Statefman, a Judge, ^ Lawyer, a Scho- 
lar, a Poet and Orator, in his Verfion of 
Plutarch^ Life of Mctbiades has thefe Blank 
Verfes out of the Greek. 

His Ffft&er he mil imitate in all^ 

Like one dijfolv'd in Eafe and Luxury^ 

His long loofe Robe he Jiems to draw with Pain^ 

Carelejsly leans his Head^ and in bis Talk 

AffeSls to lifp. 

We do pot ifi this Tranflation nor in 
that of the Art of Poetry, find any of thofe 
Flatus's and SwelHngs which are miftaken 
fcf Mjltofi's Sublime, and often made ufe 

of 



1:lie PREFACE. 

6f mat a propos and very unLnaturaJJ)''^ 
In Philips % Burlelque Poem, Tloe Splendid 
Shilling the Miltonick Manhcr fucceeded, be- 
taufe the Tumidity or falfe Pomp of the 
Verfe increafed the Ridtculunty which was 
the Subjed of the Poem ; but iri ferious Pieces 
filch Affe£fdtion does teally produce the Ri- 
diculuni^ where the Sublime was intended. 

I am better pleased with this oncf Line of 
Spencer for its Simplicity and Painting after 
Life, 

jind tieriinfate an Old Old Man bdlf-Btind, 

than with all the forc'd Greatneft and found- 
ing Exprcflions of the Falfe Sublime. 

I kept clofe to my Author thro' all his 
Poem, and, if there is any Merit in fuch 
Exa6bn€fs, I may affirm that no Tranflation 
of Poetry is mott literal than This. One 
cannot well ctr if the Rules laid down in 
the Effay on Tranflated Verfe be obferved, as 
I hope they txt here. 

^begenmne ^enfe intelti^hly told 

Shews a 'tranjlator both difcreet andbdldi 

Excurjiens are inexpiably bad. 

And 'tis mucbfafer to leave out than add. 

Tour Author always will the beji ddvife^ 

Fall where befalls^ arid where he rifes^ rife. 

B 2 I^f- 



The PREFACE. 

Dr. Fehon teaches us that Tranflation is 
more difficult than Writing. He had certain- 
ly been righter ftill if he had faid, 'tis lefs 
pleafant and agreeable. 

I can by no Means approve the Licentiouf- 
nefs of certain Tranllators, who give them- 
felves the Liberty not only to vary from their 
Originals, but even to be the very Reverfe of 
them. Is it not monftrous to read in a Ver- 
fion of one of Boileaus Poems, 

Or GalliaV perjur'd Monarch, 

Yet Mr. Rowe in his Account of that 
Verfion lays, / know but few Hands could 
have fucceeded better than this. 

The fame Mr. Rowe confefles, he has al- 
ter'd Lucan in fpme Places, a Liberty not to 
be taken but with the greateft Caution, and 
much lefs that of making the Tranflation 
fpeak diredly contrary to what the Author 
intended in the Original. It is to make him 
a Lyar^ and to profane the Aflies of the 
Dead, if he happens to be lb. What bad 
enough can v/e fay of Nalfon the Hiftorian, 
in his Tranflation of the Life of Demetrius 
in Plutarch^ where he thus fliamefuUy abufes 
both Plutarch and his Readers ? 

the 



.v.. 



The PREFACE. 

The Paflage as rehdief d by Sir Thomas 
N^rth-i is thus : " Bemachares being accus'd 
" and condemn'd upon thefe Wqrds, he was 
** banifli'd Athens. See the Athenians how 
*' they us'd themfelves, who feem'd to be 
" delivered from the Garrifon, they had be- 
*' fore, and to be reftored to their former 
** Liberty and Freedom. From thence De- 
** metrtus went into Peloponnefus. 

Nalfon-i the fame who wrote the Hiftory 
of the Troubles in England after the Year 
1 640, tranflated it thus j 

But Demachares paid dearly for his Wit^ 
for being accused for it before the Criminal 
Judges^ the People-, who mufi needs be where 
they govern, were not able to endure any thing 
lefs frantic k than themfelves, they adjudged 
that honefi Man to perpetual Banijhment for 
being in his Senfes, and making an unfeajona-^ 
hie ufe of his Wit and Reafon. 

This was the natural Re fult of their new re- 
gain d Liberty, and the true CharaBer of the 
Temper o/ai popular State, which is only a Li- 
berty for allPerfons to be Slaves to the wild, ar- 
bitrary^ extravagant Humours of a giddy, rafh, 
and unconfiant Multitude of Fools, managed 

by a Set of mercenary Knaves. After this De- 
metrius 



\ 



metriiis tfiarclfd with his Forcds into Peloponk 
nefus. He makes Ptutarchi a Member of the 
Popular State of Cheroneaj fay what he ne- 
ver faid, and what he would have abhoiM, 
to intimate that the twd Houfes of Parlia- 
ment in England were at that Time a Mul- 
titude of Foolsy aiid the leading Members of 
thofe two Auguft Aflembli^s, a Set of Knaves j 
fiich an able faithful Tranflator was this Nal- 
fon^ on whofe Authority certain Writers have 
laid great Strels in their Hiftorical and Po- 
litical Difputes. The Verfion of Boileaid 
beforementioned, is full of fuch unfair and 
unjuftifiable Variations. 

I have more than once obferv'd in the 
Notes, that the Original of the Henriade i» 
in many Places too Profaick, and I have 
fbmetimes endeavoured to mend that Fault ^ 
but perhaps my Endeavours have not always 
fucceeded. 

Tranjlatton is not in that Efleem among 
the Firil Rate Criticks which Compofitioa 
is ; but for all thal^ it has its Meri^ and 
when well performed, in a much greater 
Degree than the Mediocrity of Compofing. 
The learned Monfieur Maucroix told his 
Friend BoileaUj That Tranjlatton was not the 

fVay 



The PREFACE. 

Wa^ to Immortality, which perhaps he took 
from the few Verfions of the Ancients that 
are handed down to us; tho' there is noRea- 
fon to think the Contraiy, but that the Ro- 
mans made great \J{t of the Greek Learning 
in that Manner, gnd if one judges of their 
^rformances b^ what Dacier Remarks on 
Horace% Tranflation of Dk Miht Mufa Vp- 
rum, &c. from Homer, that there are feve- 
ral Errors in two Verfes only, one ought not 
Jo be dealt with more feverely than our great 
Mailer himfelf, npr more expeded from us. 
My Lord Rofcommon fets this Matter in a 
JtTue Light. 

T« true^ cpmpofing is the nobler Fart 
Butgoo4 Troftjation is no eaJyArti 
for thf Materials have lor^fince been found, 
ret both your Fancy and your Hands 'art bound, 
^a by mprowng what was writ before 
fnventton hb(furs lej, but JuJ^meti mn. 

But the Reader, who confiders only hi$ 
riealure or Amufement, will not diftinguifh 

^ r^^'uf ^'"^^^^ ^^^ ^^ rranjttion, 
Jtnd probably cannot ^<y it. Thus the Tran- 

flt p ^'t^^' f-}"^ *" ^^ ^^"^> where 
^e Reader is diffatisfy'd, which in Verfions 

ot Poetry js a particular Hardfhip. I have 

gen tore d to Inftance fome Paflkges of the 

iimtqde in ^c Npte§, tp clear my felf of 

Defe<a 



r f 



The PREFACE. 

Defed in my Tranflation. Dry den fays up- 
on this, 

** Tranjlators are Slaves, and Labour on 
" another Man's Plantation. We drefs the 
♦* Vineyard, but the Wine is the Owners. 
" If the Soil be fometimes Barren, then we 
^* are fure of being fcourged ; if it be Fruits 
" fill, we are not thank'd ; for the proud 
" Reader will &y. The poor Drudge has done 
" his Duty. But this is nothing to what fol- 
" lows, for being obliged to make his Senfe 
^^ intelligible, we are forc'd to untune our 
" own Verfes, that we may give his Mean- 
" ing to the Reader. 

But thofe Trartjlaton who mind their own 
Verfes more than their Authors, and are not 
fo follicitous for a juft Verfion, ^s for a good 
run of Verfe, fare often better with the Rea- 
der than thofe who keep faithfully to the 
Ortgmal. Moft People love Plealiire better 
than Inftrudion ; and moft Poets and Tran- 
flators know this fo well, that if they can 
pleafe their Readers at any Rate, they care 
not how littl? tb^y iixftru^ them. 



HENRI AD E. 



THE 



CONTENTS 



Ianto t 



CTkto 11. 


-rr r^ 


-— zs. 


Canto III, 





-^ 46 


Casto IV. 




73 


Canto V. 




95 


Canto Vf. 




^^ '^7 


eA>iT-.iS:¥il: 


-rrT'~r- - ■ 


.- -.-^ . 138 


Canto Vni, 




— 13 


Canto IX. 




i8| 


CA.t!TO X, 




. . 206 




*c 


ERRATA 



'>'*« * w-«Mh •»•' k «^^ <> 



* " - K.1 






• ,-'V ■ 



V.'' 



; ; 



b A » 



tSQ1!ff)&StS^ll&a'SSI&lXfS^^ 



\ 



ERA A.T A. 



V 



PAG £ 1 01, 1. 4. read putid. p. io8» I. 2. r. Sertilige. p. 106, 1. 15. 
r. exults, 1. 16. dele . 1. 17. r. ///. p. 170, 1. 15. r.WMrming. p. 
4^6, 1. id. r. /f//. p. 302* 1. 15. dele . 2-253, 1. 9.. r. ^<rrl 5/r*£-R. 
265, 1. 30. del. fi many, p. 266, 1. 6. r. & »tf/. 1. 3 j, r; S^r^gr. pi 267*^ 
K 2. r. j^tfi&tfff. p. 272, 1. 18. r. 1591. p. «74, L 18. r. going in. p- 279*^ 
1: 2. r. tribunitiai. p; 280, 1. 24. r^Ujufiifie, p. 284^] 1. i^.. dde tne- 
Luziada, iff/, p. 293^ 1. 7. r. Kijr/. 



r 

« 

I 

« 



i . 



(SIBll9St£6XS&;SSXSaii 









H E N R I A D E. 



f^m^ 



CANTO I. 



I* I < 



ARGUMENT. 

Invocation to "Truth. The CharaSier of Henry III. of 
France. The League fet up againji him by the Duke 
de Guife. Henry de Bourbon, King of Navarre^ 
come% to the Afpflance of Henry III. and both bejiege 
Paris. Henry III. fends Henry of Navarre to defire 
Aid of Elizabeth ^een of England. Navarre lands 
in Jerfey, and there meets ilDith a Hermit of the Ro^ 
man Religion. The Hermit fpeaks to him of his Con^ 
yerfon to that Religion^ and his Succefs againji the 
Leaguers. A Defcription of England, its Co7iJlitu^ 
tion and Happinefs. Navarre has Audience ofSlueen 
Elizabeth. 



Sing the Hero, who by Right of Arms, * 
And Right of Royal Heirflhip reign'd 

. in France^ 
Who by long Labours learnt to rule, 
who knew. 




Mighty and MiM, to conquer and forgive. 



B 



Who 



2 HENRI ABE. 

Who Mayne^ the League^ and proud Iberia ,tam'd, 
Conq'ror and Father of his Country, He. 



Goddefs fevere ! Thee, Truth, I now implore, ^ 
Thy Spirit o'er my Work, Thy Brightnefs fpread. 
Be Thou familiar to the Ear of Kings ; 
'Tis Thine to tell them what they ought to know ; 
'Tis Thine to teach the Nations to avoid 
Divifion, and its dirfe EfFeds efchew. 



Say, how our Land by Difcord was laid wafte^ 
The People's SufFVings, and the Prince's Faults 
Say Thou ; and if of Old the Fable mix'd 
Her gentle Accents with thy fiercer Voice, 
If her fair Hand thy haughty Head adorn'd. 
And to thy Light, Her Shade more Luftre gave. 
Let her, with Me, the Path Thou tak'ft purfue. 
Not to conceal but to improve thy Charms. 



Then reign'd Vahis^ and in his doubtful Hand, ♦ 

Loofc 



H E N R I A D E. 3 

Loofe were the Reins of tott'ring Empire left. 
His Soul grew languid, Fear unhing d his Frame, 
And Valois^ truly fpeaking, reign'd no more. 
No more, that Prince, the Darling once of Fame, 
By Vidl ry from an Infant taught to war, 
Whofe growing Pow r, with trembling, Europe faw. 
Who, with him, bore away the Sighs of France^ 
When the North call'd him, by his Virtues mov'd 
To wear her Crowns, and laid them at his Feet. 5 - 
Thus He, and Thus in Fortune oft it proves,. 
Who fhone as Second is eclips'd as Firft, 
A Fearlefs Warriour, but a Coward King* 
Afleep upon his Throne, diffolv'd in Eafe, 
Beneath his Diadem his Weaknefs bends. 
^eluSy St Maigririy Joyeufe^ Epernoriy ^ 
Lewd Tyrants reigning in his Royal Name, 
Miflead him as they lift from Wifdom's Ways, 
And plunge in Pleafures his Lethargick Soul. 

B ^ Meatt 



4 H E N R I A D E. 

Mean while the Guijes with a rapid Flow 7 
Of Fortune on his falling Greatnefs rofe. 
In Paris They that League detefted form'3, 
Which infolently rivall'd Valois Pow'r. 
Two Parties oppofite with equal Pride 
And Fury to his Face contended for his Crown. ^ 
Forfaken foon by his corrupted Friends, 
His frighted People from his Palace driven, 
The Stranger in the Streets with daring Front 
Appears, and the revolted Princes joins, 
Deftrufliion threatens All— But Bourbon comes. 
The Virtuous Bourbon^ in whofe God-like Breaft 
A Warriour's Warmth, and righteous Vengeance glow; 
He fets the Light before his blinded Prince, 
Revives his Courage, and direds his Steps 

\ V 

From Shame to Glory, and from Sports to Fights. 

« 

Now to the Walls oiF Paris^ the Two Kings 9 
Advice, a hundred Nations take th* Alarm, 
Rous'd by the Rumour of their high Exploits, 

a ~ And 



H E N R IAD E. 

And Europe, interefted in this Turn ^^ 

On her proud Rampiers, anxious, cafts her Eyes. 

Difcord accurft is in the City feen, 

Stirring to bloody Fights the League and Mayne^ 

Horror attends Her, and from all her Towers 

To Rome and Spain, She for Affiftance calls. 

The furious Monfter, dreaded by her Slaves, 

Inflexible and Gruel, all her Wiles, 

And all her Pow'rs employs to plague Mankind. 

With her own Party's Blood, her Hands oft ftain'd. 

She Tyrant-like inhabits humane Hearts, 

Rends them with Rage infernal, and the Crimes 

Herfelf infpires, She puniflies Herfelf. 



Againft this Monfter, and her foul Attempts 
The Monarchs.reconciPd colleft their Hofts. 
A Hundred Chiefs beneath their Banners ranged 
Bulwarks of Ffance, divided by their Scft, ^^ 
And by Revenge united flye to Arms. 
Their Deftiny to Bourbon they commit, 

B 3 He 



6 B E N R 1 A D E. 

He gains- all Hearts, and i\ll in him unite. 

To Him the Soldiers fo fubmit, They feem 

One Only Chief to have, One OiJi^ Church. 

The Father of the Bourbons from his Seat ^^ 

Among thlmmortals, Lewh looking down 

With Eyes Parental on his glorious Son, 

Prefag'd in Him the Splendor of his Race 

Pitying his Errors, with his Courage charm'd, '^ 

He faw the Time wou'd come when He wou'd prove 

An Honour to the Crown Himfelf had worn. 

Still more he wlfli'd him, Truth to know and love i 

But Henry to his Height Supream advanced 

By hidden Ways even to Himfelf unknown. 

hewh from Heav'n his helping Hand held forth 

But hid the Help he gave him, left in Fight 

The Hero might of ViftVy be*too fute, 

And with left Peril lefs Renown acquire. 

r 

And now both Parties at the Rampire's Foot 
Well weigh the Dangers of the doubtful Day. 

Slaughter 



H E N R I A D E, 

Slaughter had o'er our dcfolated Fields 
Prom Sea to Sea her fanguine Horrors fpread. 
When Valois to Bourbon thus held Difcourfe, ^*f 
And interrupted oft his Words with Sighs. 



You fee how I am falVn, Your Wrongs are Mine- 
The League alike are Enemies to Both. 
Againft their Prince They in Rebellion rife, 
Both in their Rage confound and Both purfue. 
Warts will Now not know Us, nor receive 
As Mafter, Me, who am her King, nor You 
Who are to be ; She knows the Laws, the Ties 
Of Blood, your Virtue call You to a Crown, 
But fears your future Greatnefs, and by Arms 
Strives to exclude you from my tott'ring Throne. 
Religion, ever dreadful in her Wrath, 
Her dire Anathema's againft you darts. 
'Riomey who without Militia wages War, 

« 

Her Thunder puts into the Spaniards Hands, 
Kindred^ Friends^ Subje^ts^ All againft Me arm, 

B 4 And 



S H E N R IAD E. 

And Fm by All abandon'd and betra/d. 
The greedy Spaniards by my Spoils enrich'd, 
O'crwhelm with Multitudes my wafted Fields. 
So numerous and outrageous are my Foes, 
Let us, it is no more than They have done, 
Call into France the Stranger to Our Aid : 
Th'Illuftrious Queen pf Enghndy let us gain. 
By fecret Treaty ; ancient Feuds I know 
Between the French and Englijh long have fix'd 
Immortal Hate, and feldom have They Truce. 
London of Paris e'er was emulous : 
But after fuch Affronts, and fuch Difgracc, 
Subjedts and Country I. have Here no more* 
I hate and wou'd this odious League chaftifc* 
Whoever will revenge Me ihall be French 
To Me ; and to negociate this Affair 
I'll not the tardy Steps of Envoys takej 
You only Til intruft, for only you 
By fair Perfwafion can prevail with Kings 
And give them for my Cafe forlorn Concern, • 



To 



H E N R I A D E, 

To Britain go: Your Fame will plead my Caufe, 
And an auxiliary Hoft procure. 
Your Arm* my Foes to vanquifli I'll employ; 
But *tis your Virtues that muft make me Friends, 



He faid— The Hero heard him with Regret: 

So jealous of his Glory, he was griev'd 

The Honour of the Viil'ry to divide. 

He to Remembrance calls the glorious Time, 

So dear to his great Heart, when He Himfelf 

With Conde only, quelFd the trembling League, 

When None to fuccour Him or counfel came 

And All was to his (ingle Courage due. 

But in Obedfence to his Mailer's Will, 

And to accomplifh the Defigns He form'd. 

His Arm a while fufpends the deadly Blow, 

A while in France ungather'd Laurels leaves, 

And putting on his Valour, irkfome Force, 

Unwillingly ixomParis he departs. 

The Soldiers, ignorant of his Intent, 
t ' Their 



lo H E N R I A D E, 

Their Deftiny from his Return exped. 



He goes—Mean time the guilty Town believes 
He's prefent flill and ready for a Storm. 
And ftill his Name, chief Pillar of the Throne, 
Kills them with Fear, and is to them a War. 
Already has he paft the Neujlrian Plains, 
Mornafs his fble Companion, his heft Friend, *f 
His Confident, but not his Flatterer, 
Support, too virtuous, on Error's Side, 
Who fam'd alike for Prudence and for Zeal 
With like AfFedion ferves his Church and France. 
Cenfor of Courtiers, but at Court belov'd, 
Vow'd Enemy of Rome^ at Rome efteem'd. 



Between two Rocks on which the roaring Main 
Beats furious, and his foamy Billows breaks, 
Dieppe offers to his Eyes a Pore fecure. '^ 
The Seamen crowd at his Approach the Deck, 
Ready their Ships for his Reception make, 

7 And 



HENRIADE. n 

And ev'ry Hand's prepared to hoift a Sail, 

Or weigh the crefcent Anchor at Comipand. 

Tempeftuous Boreai in mid Air enchain'd. 

To wanton Zephirs leaves the dancing Waves. 

Now to the Winds the fweliing Sails are fpread. 

They loofc, and foon the lefsning Shore is loft. 

The Coafts of England are in Ken, but foon 

The Day's bright Star's in dreary Clouds involved 

The Tcmpeft gathers in the gloomy Air, 

And grumbles hoarfely in remoter Seas ; 

The Winds unbound are with the Waves at War, 

And baleful Lightning thro' the Darkneis burfts. 

The Fires Above, th'enrag'd Abyfs Below 

Death to the Seamen every where prefent, »7 

Aghaft they fee the watry Mountains rife : 

Dauntlefs the Hero ftands amidft the Storm, 

Nor does its Fury or Himfelf regard ; 

His Country is his Care : To Her he turns 

His Eyes, for Her he feems to blame the Winds, 

Whofc Rage fo long docs her Relief delay. 

Thus 



It HENRIADE, 

Thus, but lefs generous, on Epire's Coaft, 
Contending for the Empire of the Globe, 
And trufting to the Rage of Seas and Winds 
The Deftiny of RomCy and of the World, 
At once defying Pompey and the Deep, 
Cafar oppos'd his Fortune to the Storm, 



The God of the Great Univcrfe, who flies 
Upon the Wifags of Winds, and fwells the Seas, 
That God, whofe Wifdom is ineffable. 
Who changes Empires, raifcs and deftroys, 
Look'd in that Moment frpm his radiant Throne, 
In higheft Heav'n, on Henrfs haplefs State, 
Nor did to be Himfelf his Guide difiJkin. 
The Billows, to his Beck obedient, bear 
His Ship, as bidden, to the neareft Shoar ; 
Where Jerfey^ Sea encompafs'd, feems to rife ' 
Out of the Bofom of the deep he drives. 
And There, with God to guide, the Hero lands. 
Not far from Shoar a Wood's refreftiing Shade 

Invites 



HENRIADE. 13 



\ 



Invites the weary Traveller to Reft. 

A Rock, that hides it from the Tempeft's Rage^ 

Forbids the North to trouble its Repofc. 

A Grot within the Gloom by Nature built, 

Ovtres to Her Hands its Beauties and its Ufe* 

There liv'd a venerable Seer, who far 

Prom Court, the Surfeit of his younger Years, 

Sought in that Solitude the Sweets of Peace. 

To Man unknown, and firec from carking Care, 

Himfelf to know was all his Study There, 

Remembering with Regret his ufelefe Life, 

How loft in Plcafure, and how plung'd in Love* 

Oft on th'enameird Mead he muiing lay 

Near the green Margin of a murmVing Brook, 

And under Foot his Tyrant-Paffions trod. 

For Death he waited There with Mind tranquil. 

In hope to fee the God whom he ador'd, 

Who gracious to his Age vouchfaf'd to. fend 

Wifdom to iblace him in his Retreat, 

And of his Heavenly Gifts to Him profufe 

Set 




14 H E N R I A D E. 

Set ope before his Eyes the Book of Fate. 
The Hero thus by high Inftinfl: he knew, 
And ofFer'd him for Food his Sylvan Fare. 
The Prince accuftom'd to fuch homely Meals, 
Had often in an humble Cot been charm'd, 
When flying Courts, and of Himfelf in Queft, 
He mortify'd a Scepter's pamper'd Pride. 
The Troubles o'er the Chriftian Empire fpread, 
Were a fair Field to furnifti ufeful Talk; 
Mornayy unfhaken in his Se£):, was deem'd 
The firmed Prop of Calvin's novel Faith. 
Henry^ who doubted, of the Skies implor'd 
A Ray of Light to guide his wand'ring Soul. 
For in all Times, faid he, has facred Truth 
With Errrors been environ'd, and (hall I 
Who hope for Help from Heav'n alone, not know 
Thie Path that leads to Heav'n, to take the Right? 
A God fo gracious, Mafter of Mankind 
Had been, if he were willing to be, fervU 



tet 



H E N R I A D B. 15 



Let us the Ways of Providence adore. 
The Solitary faid, and not accufe 
The Dread Creator for his Creature's Crimesn 
Well I remember Calvinifm was weak 
And humble heretofore, without Support 
I faw her when her Haunt was in the Night, 
She like an Exile liv'd within our Walls.. 
I faw her from this Infant feeble State 
Advance by flow Degrees and Ways obfcure. 
In fine, I faw her rife as from the Dufl 
And nienacing, uplift her haughty Head, 
Take place upon the Throne, infult Mankind, 
And proudly our demolifh'd Altars fpurn. 
Far from the Court I to this lonely Grot 
Retir'd my wrong'd Religion to deplore. 
Here Hope at leaft gave Comfort to my Age: 
I thotight fo new a Wor(hip would not laft, 
Its very Being owing to Caprice. ^^ 
We faw it borU;, and we {hall fee it die. 



Frail 



i6 H E N R I A D E. 

Frail like Themfelves are all the Works of Men, 
Heav'n, as he plcafes, fruftrates their Deugns, 
He's liable ftill Himfclf, ahd none but He. 
Our Malice impotent and vain wou'd fap 
The Holy City, whofe Foundations deep 
Were fix'd by his Almighty Hand, and firm 

« 

^ill ftand, triumphant over Hell and Time. 
To you. Great Bourbon^ He'll Himfelf make known. 
And Light, fince you defire it, you fhall have. 
You he has chofen. You his Arm fhall guide 
Thro' Combats, to the Throne of the Valois. 

h » • 4 

Already Vift'ry has his Dread Command 
For you the Way to Glory to prepare. • 
But if his Truth enlightens not your Mind, 
Hope not to enter Paris^ and till then 
Avoid the Weaknefs which Great Hearts indulge. 
Shun, above all Things, Beauty's Syren Charms ; 
Swreet is the Poifon, but the Death is fure. 
Your Paffions fear, and learn your Lulls to fame, 
Soft Pleafure to refift, ajjd fight with Love. 

Whctt 



tiZNRlAhE, \7 

When you, by mighty Effort have fubdu'd 

The Leaguers and yourfelf, when in a Siege 

Horrid and crer famous you fhall fliew. 

Bounty imnidnfe, ind give a Nation Life, 

Then ftiali your People's MisVies have an End, 

You (hall then find, that He whofe Heart is pure^ 

And trufts in Heav n, may hope for Heav'nly Aid. 

And wha refembles God^ has God to Friend. 

Each Word he feid, was like a Dart of Fire, 

Which penetrated Henry\ inmoft Soul. 

He fancy 'd in thoife happy Times he liv'dy 

When God, their Maker, with Mankind conversed, 

When fimple Veriui; Wonders wrought in Wafte^ 

Commanded Kings, and Oracles prohounc'd. . 

He held the Holy Hermit in his Armsj ' /. 

The Tears faft trickling from his huinid Eyes. 

And in that very Inllant he beheld 

The Dawning Day^ which was as yet but Dawn. 



Momay 



i8 H E N Rl AD E. 



Mornay^ tho' not a£Fe£tedy feem'd furprtz'd 
Th' Almighty,. Maftcr of his Gifts, from Him 
Had hid Himfdf, and vainly was he call'd 
The Wife, whofe Virtues were with Errors mkU 
While, as Heav'h wiird, the Sage difcours'd the Prince, 
And open'd to his yielding Heart a Way, 
Th'outragious Winds were at his Voice appeas'dj 
The Sun broke out again, the Sea grew calm > 
The Seer eondudted Bourbon to the Shoar, 
And Henry'j weighing, to fair jilbion faird% 



At fight of England inly he admir'd 
The Change which had that potent Empire bleft. 
Where, of th0 wifeft Laws the long Abufe 
Had Kbgs and People miferable made. 
That bloody Theatre, where in the Courfe *9 
Of many Wars, a Hundred Heroes fell j 
That flipp'ry Throne from whence a Hundred Kings 
(isd.fall'n, a Virgin Queen with Glory fills, 

And 



HE N R IAD £. 19 

And with her Fame, the wondering Univerfc. 

Elizabeth^ whofe Wifdom holds the Scale 

Of Europe^ and her Choice the Ballance turns. 

The refty Englijh bear her Yoke with Joy, 

A Natixm fond of changing, neVe alike 

In Servitude or Libeny at Eafe. 

Their Loffes are forgotten in her Reign. 

Cover 'd with fleecy Flocks are all their Plains, 

With Corn their furrow'd Fields, with Ships their Seas. 

At Land they're fear'd, and of the Waters Kings. 

Their Fleets imperious give to Ocean Law> 

And Fortune from the World's laft Limits call. 

London^ fo barb Vo us Heretofore, is Now 

The Centre of all Arts, the Magazine 

Which amply the whole Univerfe fupplies. 

At Wejiminjier Three different Pow'rs appear 

Together, and t:an hardly comprehend 

The Knot, by which they are together bound. 

The People's Deputies, the Peers, the King 

Ey Intercft divided, and by Law '^ "! 

C 2 Unite J 



lo HRNRIADE. 

United, thefe three Members form ihe Frame 
Of this puiffant Body, to Themfelves 
Dangerous, and to their NeigJ^bours terrible^ 
Happy the People, if they knew to pay 
Refpedl, which to the Sovereign Pow'r they owe ; 
More Happy, if their Kings Mild, Jufl; and Wife 
Knew to refped the publick Liberty; 
Ah, when will France^ cries Bourhoity fee the Laws 
Flourifli as in the Reign of fuch a Prince > 
And what a bright Example, Oh ye Kings ! 
This Woman is, who (huts the Gates of War 
And Difcord to your Doors and Horror fends; 
While by her faithful Subjects, She's ador'd. 
And makes their Happinefs> as They make Herl 



And now at that vaft City he arrives. 
Where Liberty alone Abundance feeds. 
He fees the Tow'r by Britain s Conq'ror built, « 
Elizabeth^ augufl; Abode, not far 
Mornay his ible Attendant dill, he waits 

Upon 



f 



H E N RI A D E. ii 

Upon the <^eni without a coux^j Train, 
Or Pomp, or Equipage, in which the Great, 
Be what they will, a fecret Pleafure take, 
But the true Hero with Contempt regards. 
He (peaks with Grace, peculiar to Himfclf, 
His Franknefs is his only Eloquence, 
in private he explains the Needs of Franc e^ 
And humbles his Great Heart fo low as PrayV, 
But in his very Pray'r the Hero fliines. 



How's this? The Queen fays in Surprize, Are you 
A Servant to Valoisy and is it He 
Who fends You to the Thames ? How then are You ? 
Of his Fierce Enemy become his Friend ? 
Are You his new Protedor, and to Me 
Do*s Henry for his Pcrfecutorfuet 
From the fiun'-s rifing to his fetting. Fame 
Of your long Differences loudly fpeaks, 
And .4o I fee You fd- Valois in Arms^ 

C 3 You, 



11 H E N R I A D.E, 

You, whom in Fight He has (b oftea fcafd? 



Our Hatred is in his Misfortunes loft, 
Reply'd the Prince, Valois has been a Stavc^ 
But is atlaft, tho'llill unhappy. Free. 
Happy might he have been, if Truft in Me, 
And in his won:Bed Courage, He had put. 
If he no othq- vain Support had fought. 
Nor Artifice and Trick inglorious try*d» 
By Weaknefs, and by Fear he was my Foe. 
But when I faw bis Danger, I forgot- 
His Hate, and him I vanquifh'd, will avenge. 
'Tis yours, Great Quceri, in this our righteous W^ir 
The Name of England mod rcnown'd to make. 
Crown iiU your Virtues with the juft Defence 
Of our invaded Rigbts> and joyi with Mc 
To fuccour and revenge the Caufe of King& 

Elizabeth^ impatient, bad him tell 
At large what Troubles had afflidted France^ 

What 



H E N R I A D E. 13 

What Springs of Aftion xnov'd the huge Machine, 
Ifhat Chain of Caufes had in Paris wrought 
The mighty Change that had amaz'd the World. 



Rumour already, fays the Queen, has oft 
Brought Tidings hither o( thofe bloody Bfdik, 
But Rumour's Tongue, as indiicreet as light. 
Much Fable mixes with a little Truth. 
I never heeded her Uncertain Tales. 
You the moft famous Witnefs of the Fadls, 
You, who have conqucr'd and have fev'd Valois^ 
Say what this Friendftiip formed between you Now, 
Explain the Motives of fo ftrange a Turn. 
Of You none worthily can fpeak, but You. 
Tell Me your Troubles and your Feats of Arm& 
Vanquifli'd and Viftor let me know your Fate. 
Your various Life a Leflbn is to Kings. 



The Prince reply'd. Ah Madam, muft I call ^ 
To mind, the wretched Story of thefe Times ? 

C 4 Ah^ 



14 H E N R I A D E. 

Ah, prou'd to Heav'n, to whom my Griefs are known, 

Thofe Horrors, he permitted in his Wrath, • 

Were in Obliyipn Eternal funk. 

Why aflc you Me, with my relaxant Lips 

To tell you, what the Fury and the Shamo 

Of the difcoitling Princes of my Blood ? 

My Heart at the Remembrance fliudders ftUI, 

But You commanding, Madaih, I obey. 

And while fuch fad Adventures I relate, 

Pardon, Great Queen, if grating Truths you hpar. 

Another might have hid them, or difguis'd, 

put Bourbon never to difleriible kn^w. 



HE Tf. 



H E N R I A D E. 



CANTO II. 

ARGUMENT. 

Henry relates to ^een Elizabeth the Ri/e and Pro- 
grefs of the League. Hecondfmm Perjecutkn. The 
CkaraSier of Katherine de Mcdicis, Regent of 
France, in the Mirfonty of ber Sons Francis I. and 
Charles IX. The Cbara£i^r of the King of Na- 
varre, Father of- Bourbijn ; Of Admiral CoUgny. 
The Majfacre of Paris. 

HE Miferies of France^ Great Queen* 

are fucb, 
As lecin with Hosroi^ from their (acred 
Source, 
Religion, wbofe inhumane Zeal enflam'd 
The French^ and put in cv'ry Hand a Svi'ord. 

'Tis 



26 H E N RI A D E. 

'Tis not for Me the Qucftion to decide. 
Whether Genevans in the Right, or Rome. 
Howe'er Divine They arc by Party dccm'd. 
On both Sides have we Fraud and Fury found 
If Treachery by Error is begot. 
If in the bloody Strife v^rhich Europe waftes 
Treafbn and Murder mark the wronger Side, 
Then both have been the wronger, both alike 
Are plung*d as well in Error as in Crima 
For Me, who in the State's De&nce engage, 

« 

When Heav'n's offended, be the Vengeance His. 

I ne'er attempted Things above my Reach, 

Nor Holy Inceiiie with xtSk Hand profan'd^ 
Perifti the Politicians, ever curft. 

That o'er 4ie Mind ufurp ddpotick Pow*f, 

That would weak Mortals Sword in Hand convert, 

■ 
• « 

That water with the Blood of Hereticks 
Their Altars hallow'd by the. Blood of Ohr ift, 
That, guided by falfe Zeal or Profit, ferve 
By none but Homicides the God of P^ace* 

Ah 



H E NM I AD E, 17 

Ah, wou'i to ii&s^% whcfe Law t ietk id km>w^ 

The Court oT the Vahis had thought like Me* 

But no fudh Scruple idki die Guijes guide, 

At Will a People credulous they lead. 

And pafs Atnimion lewd for fervent Zeal^ 

As if their Incereft and Heav'ns were Oiie. 

The Many in their Snare entmpt, grew mad, . 

And urg*d by cruel Piety took Arras - 

Againft Me, on my vow'd Defiruftion bene 

I've feen our Cmzem in Batde joio, 

And cut each other's Throats 'wkh Holy Zeal ; 

iVe Keen thtm Fire in Hand amidft the Fighc 

For vain Difputes they couki not compmhead* 

You know the Populace, and what they dare 

When Vengeance in the Caufe of Heav'n diey row^ 

And blinded by Religion break the Rein 

Of due Obedience, and renounce all Rule. 

You know i^ and your Forefight long ago 

Stifled the Mifchief at its Birth 3 the Storm 

» 

Was fcarce in your Dominions form'd, your Cares 

Againft 



i8 H E N R I A D E. 

Againu it gqardcd, and your Virtues calm'd. 
You reign, the People's happy in their Prince, 
Your Laws are flourifhing, and London free. 
A different Path did Medicis purfue. 
Perhaps afFedted with the Harms ]^u hear. 
What was this Medicis you may demand, *i 
And I, with faithful Lips, at leaft, will tell. 
Many have fpoken of her, Few have known. 
Few founded with their Line her Heart profound. 
In her Son's Court I twenty Years vi«as bred. 
There tweaty Years the Tempcft gathVing (aw. 
And learnt to know her to my Cok too weH. 
Her Hufband dying in his PrirH^of Life, # r' 
Free Courfe to her Ambition, fcft^ each Son . 

* 

Delivered from her Tutelagie became 

Her Foe as fafl as He without. Her reign'd. 

Confufion, Jealoufy, about the Throne 

Her Hand, illrfated, with DiviJBon fow'd, 

IncefTantly oppofing by her Craft 

The Guije'n to the Conde^ France to France. 

Still 



H E N Rl AD E. 19 

Still ready with her'Encmies to join, ; 

And change the Views of Rivals and of Friends, 

A Slave to Pleafure, to Ambition more, ^f 

A Bigot to the Se<ft which iObe betra/d, ^^ — 

PoffciSng in a Word, I dare no more. 

The Vices with few Vcrtues of the Fair. . . » 

Madam, the Phrafe wou'd be too free, were you, 

What never are you, in- the Sex comprized. 

Auguft B»li%a only has the Charms. 

Heav'n, who for Empire formed You, in your Life 

A bright Example fets to all Mankind, 

And Europe counts you with the Greateft Men. 



The Second Francis by a fudden Stroke ^7 
Of Fate, his Father foUow'd to the Grave. 
Weak Child, the Guifes were his Gods, and none ^ 
As yet his Virtues or his Vices knew. 



Charles^ more a Child, enjoy 'd the Name of King, '^ 
But Medicis alone poflefs'd the PowV, 

And 



50 H EN R I A D E. 

And made the Nation tremble ; ta iccxxrc 
Her Role^ 9ie purpos'd to be Tutrds Mk^ 
And in eternal Childhood keep the King. 
In Difcord's Hands She put the flaming Brand, 
And by a Hundred Battles kept the Throne. 

« 

To Wrath the Rival Seds She wrought, and War 
As fierce, as Civil alvrays is^ eoiu'd. i^ 



Dreux firil beheld their £ial Enfigns fpread. a^ 
Their Firft Exploits, a fr^htful Scene, \iicrc There. 
Old Montmerency near the Tomb of Kings, ^ 
A leaden Death, a Warriour's Prefent, mer^ 
And to the Labours of an hundred Years 
There put an End ; at Orleans^ Guife was flain, 33 
My wretched Father, to the Court a Slave, 34 
And Servant^ much unwilling, ta the Queeo, 
Long after him a doubtful Fortune dragged. 
By his own Hand his Mifery was made, 
And for his Enemies he fought and c^U 



Conde 



HEN R 1 AD E. 



Cmde^ Myfelf his Brother's only Son^ 35 
To Mc a Maft^ and a Father piiov'd. 
His Camp my Cradle, There beneath the Shade 
Of Laurels, to Fat^iie inur'd, I \\v*d^ 
Like him, Conn-Indolence I early feorn'd \ 
His Combats in my Childhood were my Plays: 
Ah I ftill mourn, and ever {hall I mourn 
His Murder by a vile Aflaffin's Hand. 3^ 
Heaven, kind Proteftor of my helplefs Age, 
Me to the Care of Heroes ftiil confignU 
Coligny after Conde took that Truft, 
Was my Defender, and my Party's Prop. 
I owe him. Madam, All the Debt I own^ 37 
Whatever Europe in my Favour ^eaks ; 
Whatever Rome has. in my Deeds efteem'd 3^ 
To Thee, IllujftrkHis Shade, I owe it AIL 
Under his l^ye in Courage as in -Years 
I grew, and ferv'd my RreDticcXhip of War> 
Heavy, but light by his. Example made. 



By 



-» --». 



31 H E N R I A D E. 

By him inftrudtcd in the Hero's Art, 
I faw him in the Warriour's Toils grow grey^ 
The Burthen of the Common Caufc he bore 
\N\xh Medicis^ and Fortune ftill adverfe. 
In evVy Circumftance of Life he gdn'd 
The Love of Friends and the Refpedt of Foes^ 
And, when he did not profper, he was fear'd. 
In Combats knowings in Retreats th* fame, 
Mod Grand, and moft redoubted in Defeats^ l% 
Which neither Gajlon nor Dumis cou'd boaft 4® 
Amid the various Ecchoes of their Fan^e. 

Ten Years in winning and in lofing fpcnt, 4» 
The Plains ftill fpread with an embattled Hoft 
Of Thofe, whom Medicis believ'd dc'ftroy*d. 
After fo many Trials (be was tir'd 
With Combating and Conquering in vain. 
Efforts of War She theanc no mord to tfy^ 
But with one Stroke the Civil Difcord end. 
The Court their Favours ofFer'd a& a Lure, 



And 



H E N R I AD E. 3 j 

And, finCe they cdu'd not vanquifli, gave us Peace* 
What Peace, ye righteous and avenging Pow'rs ! 
How fprinkled was her Olive-Branch with Blood ! 
Heav'n ! muft the Mafters of Mankind, make plain^ 
Like Medicis^ )Stydt Subjeds Way to Crimes? 



Colignyy ever faithful to his Printe 
In Heart, tho' forc*d Oppreflion to cppoie^i 
And Friend to 'France^ when He againft her fough^ 
Was firfl at Union's Call to lend an £ar^ 
And Peace to the difttadted State reftore. 
The Hero feldom to Diftruft gives way, 
Or marches, diffident, amid the Foe. 
He leads me to the Louvre^ Medids 
With Tears receives Me, arid with open Arngis. 
A Mother's Tenderneis cou'd not be more. 
Nor more the Friendfliip, nor the fraudful Faith^ 
Confirmed widb Oaths, She to CiKgny plights p 

■ 

With Dignitie» and Benefits o'crborn, 

KBs Coun&b are to be Her f ucvre Gw^ 

D My 



34 UENRIADE. 

My Servants She wiih flatt'ring Hopes deludes. 

Of her Son's Favours to my Friends profvife 

In Promiies, She lulls their Feac afleep. 

And long we hop'd thefe Halcyon Days wou'd Uft. 

Yet fooae, fofpefting Treafon in hei 

Were jealous of the Gifts of Enemies. 

The more they doiriit, the King the tnore dil 

The King t^ MeMcis'^ Lefibns form'd 

Of Fraud and Pei^iry the Fra^)jce knew. 

Murder She mttde £uniliar to hi^ Hear^ 

And, as to Crudity his Nature ben^ 

Her cruel G)unfels He with Pleafure heard; 

Apt Scholar in her eaoecrable School. 

The better to conceal th' accurs'd Defign 

His Sifter I muft ived» the Wedding fiz'd, ^ 

He calls me Brotho:, Ah deluding Naine! 

Vain Vaws> and fatal Hymeneal Knot ! 

Our Marriage, the &ft Signal to our Woes^ 

The Wrath of Heavin provok'd ^ the Day of Joy 

My Mothers Deatiir tovhat of Moiinuvg chn^iL 



cF 



H E N R I A D E, 35 

V 

I wou'd not be unj^^ nor more impute 
To Medicis than She d^fervcs j that Death 
Without her fecret Helping might have hap'd* 
There's no Neceflity to ftarch for Crimes 
Againfl: her ; t>n that Day my Mother dy 'd. 
Pardon thefe Tears, to her Remembrance due. 
By Duty forc'd, and Tendernefs they flow. 



Mean time, impatient for their Fill of Blood. 
The Murd Vers wait the dreadful Hour j it com^b^ 
With Horrors, fuch as Hell cou'd furniib, wiogU fl 
The Signal giv'n, no Tumult and no Noift 
Enfue, the Darknefs of the Night befriends 
Their Helli/h Work, and Nature in a Fright 
Shuts up the trembling Light in dreary Qoudk 



Coligny languifhes ia falfe Rqxdfe, 
Sleep clofes with deoeitfuVHand his Eyes* . 
Forth on a fuddca break a thoufand Cricar 
Hideous, and rob Isia of fagls FlattVing Reft; 

D a Ho 



i . « 



3<5 H E N R I A D E. 

He rifes, looks around him and beholds. 
Where'er he looks, Affaffins bath'd in Blood. 
Torches and Arms on ev'ry Side he fees, 
And Streets illumin'd with their horrid Shine, 
His Palace m a Blaze, the People ftun'd 
With fierce and frefli Alarms, the Din of Death j 
His bleeding Servants, ftifled in the Flame. . 
The Ruffians to the Slaughter prcfi in Crowds, 
And cry with Voices horrible, Spare none. 
God, Medicis^ the King command, Sparc none. 
He hilars CoJign/s Name ; far off he fees 
Teligny^ Gallant Youth, by Nuptial Tye 45 ^ 
His Son, well worthy of his Daughter's Love, 
Hope of his Party, Honour of his Houfe, 
Bleeding and mangled in the Butchers Hands, 
Demanding great Revenge with out-ftretch'd Arms 
But Ah, demapds it of a Man difarm'd^ 
A naked Hero without Help or Hope, 
Who feeing he muft jperiih^ and, hud Hap 1 

Muft pcrlfh.unrev(pg'd, r6folv'd:t6 

I 2 r - At 






H E N R I AD E. 37 

At lead as he had liv'd, and as became 
His Glory, and the Grcatnefs of his Heart. 
And now the Murderers, a numVous Band, . 
The Gates of his Apartment ftrive to force. 
He opens them Himfelf, and to their Eyes 
His Perfon in full Majefty prefents. 
Serene his Look, as when in Fight he gave 
The Word to Slaughter, or to Rage. or Reft. 
That Venerable Air, that Grand Afpe6t 
Surpriz'd th'Aflaffins with unwonted Aw^ 
And in Suipence a while their Fury held. 
Finifli, fays he, your Work, and thefe grey Hairs 
Stain with my Blood, now Ice, which forty Years 

» 

Warm'd me in Battle, and was Ipar'd by Wan 
Strike, and fear nothing, I forgive you All, 
My Life's of litde Worth \ take what is left. 
Which to fave yours I rather wou*d have loft. 
The Tygers melting at thefe moving Words, 
Fell at his Feet j One threw away his Arms, 
Another xlrown'd in Tears embrac'd his Kn«es« 

D3 Sur- 



jS H E N R I AD B. 

Surrounded by his Murd'rcrs thus he feem'd 
An Eaftern Monarch by his Slaves adorU 
B(fme waiting for the Viftim in the Court, ^ 
And angry that his Crime had be?tt deferr'd. 
Mounted the Stairs to fet the Ruffians on. 
And found them trembling at the Hero's Feet. 
At this affcding Sight alone unmov'd. 
Alone agabft Compaffion hardcn'd, Befme, 
Conceiv'd it criminal toftay hisHand j 
That Pity to Ctligftf, or Remorfe 
To Medicis was Tjreafon. Thus infpir'd 
By H^l, he thro' the Soldiers broke his Way. 

I 

Tht Hero widi intrepid Front beheld 

His Coming, and as (leady flood the Stroke, 

When in his Heart the A^aCHn plung'd his Sword, 

« 

But turn'd ailde his Eyes^ afraid to meet 
ColigtrfX left a Look fliouM (hake his Soul> 
And turn to ihi?'ring Fear, his burning Rage. 
Sb fell the Greateft Man ih France, whom Death 
From hiMx. and from Ootraee couli not faves 



r ' 



H E N Rl AD E. 39 

A Grave was to his mangled Corpfe deny d» 
A Feaft to ray'nous Beiiib» and Qirds pf Prey. . 
His Head at Mtdkii\ Feet wa$ laid» . 
Fit Conqueft fi>r Her&lf, and for her Son. 
With fdgn'd Indifference She the Prefent takes^ 
And without &em{Qg to enjoy the Fruit 
Of Vengeance> without Pleaiure or Remorfe» 
In&nfible of Both— She's cool and caim» 
As if CO fuch Qbltdons She were usU 



IVhp can describe tbisit cruel Nighty and who 
The v^ious Iitaagea of ^tighter paint? 
The Ravages of Ruffians, who can tell \ 
CoUgnfs Murder wias but an Eflay, 
Not with their future Crioies to be compar'd. 
When bettpr pnt^'d in the Trade of Death, 
Horrors on Horrors infinite ^aef hea^'d. 
Th'unl^dled Root ib Heat of Zeal let looie. 
By Medici{ aicoung'd, and the King, 
March with drawn Swords, and £]ws that fparkledPire 

D 4 Oer 



^ 



40 H E N R I A D E, 

0*er the dead Bodies of our bleeding Friends, 

Guife at their Head, his Heart enflam'd with Ire 

On All, whofollaw'd Me, outragious, falls 

The Manes of his Father to revenge. ^ 

NeverSf 5^ Gondii 5^ Havanne^ p with equal Rii^> 

And each a Dagger in his Ha^rid advance 

To flay the Brethren, and to fee them flain, ' • 

They animate the Crowd, they mme Uieir Prey, 

And mark the Vidims that are ddom'd ' to bleed. 

The Tumult, and the Cries I leave untold, 

NThe Torrents that o'erflow'd the Streets with Blood, 

Daughters with Mofthers dying, Son^ with Sires^V 

Sifters with Brothers, and with Hufbands Wives. 

The Young arc facrific'd of either Sex, 

And cradled Infants dafh'd againft the Walk 

Such Fury's in the Heart of Man, but fuch 

As fcarce in future Times will be believ'd. 

And fcarpc by you yourfclf : the bloody Priert^,' 

Whene'er the Slaughter flackcns] cry aloudi* / 

And 'tdnew Maffaci:cs the Crov^ excite. 

The 



HENRIADE. 41 

The Pricfts pcrfuadc them they are ferving Heaven, 
When Brothers butcher Brothers 5 they invoke 
The Skies, and offer them with reeking Hands, 
Curft iacHfice \ the Blood of Innocents. 
How many Hero's peri(h'd. Men renown'd 
In War and Peace, 'Rtnil «, and Pardaillan « 
Guercbi 55 che Brave, and Lavardin the Wife, 5^ 
Worthy of longer Life and ©thcr Fate. 
Amongft the Miferable^ wb6m this Night, 
Accurft, did into Night Eternal plunge, 
MatfiRac iBLU^ Souitjfe 5r tfd De^th condtemti'd, 
A while defended their ill-fated Livt& - ': 

Thfeir bleeding Bodies J^erc'd all o*er With Wounds, ^ 

• • • • » 

And hardly breathing to the X^2^i;r/s Walls, 

Or drawn, or dragged, upon thcKing lihey call 

For Help. The Cruel King betriays them both. 

And with dieii^ Gore his hated Gates ard' Aain'd. * 

At Eafe hti< Mi^er from «i ToW'r ftirte^s ' 

The Horfbrs of the M/ght] the Work her own, '. 

Her cruel Fsfv'r itcs WkH. delighted Bye 1* 

. \ Behold 



4 



.2 



H E N R I A D E. 



Behold the Blood regpi^ing from the Wounds . 

Of flaughtcr'd Citizens chat flopd the Streeta; ^ 

And Paris^ now in Aflies* is the Scene 

Her Heroes for their Pomp triupsphftnt ihew. 

What fhall I fay ? Oh Wiclce4n€fi, Ob Shame, ^ 

Oh Woe mod woful ! Medici/^ $oa 

The King himfeif aniong the Rjuffians runs, 

Purfuing the prpfcrib'd from Street to Streei^ 

And with their jBlood his facred Hands diftains. 

The Prince^ whom fidw I . ferve^ the fame Vahis^ 

The King» who by my Mou^h implores your Aid, 

To Butchery his b^bVous JBt^Other urg*d» 

An4 ia jh^ aaughtej bor^ % Part jbborU 

Not that /^/ai> is cruel of 14n(i&lf» 

He rarely ^ipt hm Royal If and in ^ood. 

But hurry '0. by. .]p!xam|^e ia his Youth, 

His Cruelty, was Wei|jknje& more than, Orioie. 

Some midft, a murder'd Multitude, 'tii mie» 

£fcap'4 th' Maflin'^ Sword within his Re^ch. 

Th'Advemuteol' Qaumontts^ h^fysA tfaeiL f* 

From 



H E N R I AD E. 43 

From Mouth to Mouth in future Times (hall pafi. 

His Sire, who bent boieath the Weight of Years, 

Afleep between ^0 harmlefi Infants lay. 

One Bed held All, the Father and the Sons. 

Th'Aiiiffins by their Fury blinded ftabb'd 

The one the other with impetuous Strokes^ 

But Death flew o'er «he Hed wjtfa /atiddm Wing. ^ 

Our Deftinies are in the Hand of Htfav'k 

Alone, and as he wills ^ live or die. 

While Homicide is in its Rage deceivM^ 

The Polgnard never .pierc'd nor touchVl Caumiif. 

An Arm inviiiUe was his Defence, 

And from th'A&ffins fav'd his Infancy. 

The Father, fmitten with a ihouiand Wounds 

Lay dying o'er the Body 6f his Son, 

The Fury of the King aikl People moclc'd. 

And gave him at his Death a feoond Life. 



1 



Mean time, in thefe SmI McMnents, Vfiai did I? 

A^t confictiiig in the Faidlt of OnAm ^ 

Tttaqnil 



44 H E N R I A D E. 

Tranquil, and diftanc from the Noii^ of ArmSy 
I in the Louvre lay in fweet Repofe. 
Oh Night, Oh dreadful Night, Oh fatal Sleep, - 
Waking, Death's bloody Equipage X Izw. 

w 

My dear Domefticks murder'd, and the Rooms 
Of my Apartment ilowing with their Gore, 
Where'er I caft m.y Eyes, the purple Floor 
The Marks of my afTaflin'd Servants bore. 
The reeking Murd'refs to my Bfcd advance, 
Againft me lift'fhfcir Parricidal Hinds, \ :. 

And menace Death j for nQthii^rleis I look-d 
Refolv'd, and ofFer'd to their Sivo^ds itiy He^d, 
But whether fqme Re^^ the Ruffians paCyl : / 
To their King's Blood that drc^d In my Veitis, 
Or whether I by Medicis was doQiJj'd/ 
To fome feverer Ifate, or ^e . mig^ hcj)e . - . > 
If Storms aroic to fifld a Port in ,Mc, ^^ ; ^ . ; 
Or whether as an Hoftage She rcferv'd 
My Life, for other Trials f§t aparti , 
'Twas fav'd, and Jtie &;cchan^. She fent Me Chains* 
•l.vpru*.- More 



H E N R I A D E. 4^ 

More happy, and more worthy Envy, thou 

Cbligny^ didft thy Life dcfencclefe lofe ; 

But it was only l^ife, thy Liberty 

And Glory waited on Thee to the Tomb. 

You tremble. Madam, at the frightful Tale, 

So many Horrors touch your Royal Heart, 

As barb'rous as they feem I yet have told 

But the leaft Part of their Barbarity. 

One wou'd have faid that from the Louvre's TowVs 

To France the Signal Medicis difplay'd. 

All imitated PariSy Death at once 

In ev'ry City rag'd without Controul. 

• * 

And every Province was with Slaughter fpread. 
When Kings bid Crimes, too well a^rc they obey'd, 
Myriads of MurdVers execute their Wrath. 
The crinodfon Currents of the Floods of Prance 
Bear nothing to the frighted Seas l^ut Cqrpie. 



BEN- 



H E N R I A D E. 



CANTO III. 



ARGUMENT. 

3V SttJJm Death of Charles EC A fartber Cia- 
raSer of Henry III. of France. A CharaStr of tie 
Duke of Guife unJ the League. Henry IIL itferti 
Navarre. 'The Battle e/'Coutras. Guifc obliges 
Henry to leave Paris. Guiie hting murdered at 
Blois, bit Brother the Duke de Mayne beads the 
Leaguers. His CbaraBer, Henry IIL unites again 
with Navarre, ^eett Elizibech'x Speech to Na* 
varre at his Departure, The Eart of Effex cwn^ 
masids the Auxiliaries the ^titers fends to France 
agairs/l the League. 

O M E Days, as Fate decreed, th'A9affira 

toil'd, 
To Slaughter and to Ipoil their Cour& 
was frea 
At length, £itigu'd w!di their lepeated Crimes, 

7 For 



H E N Rl AD E, 47 

For want of Victims, they their Daggers (heathU 
The People, whbni the Queen agaiiift themfelvcs 
Had arn^'d, at length her hidden Purpofe faw. 
And eafily their Pafljions fliift like Winds, 
From Pity fwell to Rage, from Rage to Pity fink. 
And now their groaning Country's Voice they hear. ; 
With Horror CharUs was on a fudden feiz'd^ 
Remorfe fucceeded Rage, and rent his Soul. 
The fatal Culture of hi$ tender Years 
Went far his eafy Nature to corrupt. 
But had not ftifled that tremendous Voice, 
Which ftartles Kings, tod frights them on the Throne. 
His Mother's Maxims on his Mind impreft. 
He MFa$ {lot hiu'denVl in bis Crimes, like Her. 
He pin'd and faded in the Flow'r of Youth 
Bkftcid by Griefs as early Fruits by Frdft. 
A mortal Languor cut hith Ihort in Life, 
Th'Almighty wreaked his Vengeance oh hii Head» 
And mark'd him dying with his Seal of Wrath \ 

That Kbgs might by his Chafti&m^ 

The 



ir 



4^ HENRIADE. 

The like, if they to imitate him darU 

I faw him juft as he expired, and ftill 

Before my Eyes fhall have the frightful Si^n 

The Blood that bubbled thro* his broken Vcin^ 

Reveng'd the Torrents fpilt by his Command^ 

Struck by a Hand invifible He d/d ; ^4 

And France aftonifli'd at his dreadful End, 

Pity'd a King fo young, fo foon cut off j 

A King to Wickiednefs mifled by thofe. 

Who were by Duty and by Nature bound 

To fet him right, if Youth inclined to ib'ay, 

A King whofe late Repentance flatter'd France 

With the fair Promife of a milder Reign. 

The Rumour of his Death (bon reached the Norcb| 

Valoh impatient pais'd'thro* various Climes ^ 

To feize a Realm which ftill with Slaughter rieek'd. 

And (eat himfelf on Cbarles'% bloody Throne. 

The Poles had lately with united Choice 

To Valois^ tho' an Alien^ giv'n their Crovnir 

So grand above ail Princes was his Fame* 

More 



H E N R I A D li., ^ 4^ 

More thah an hundred Provinces beftow'd 

Their Voices on Valois ; far off in France 

A Name acquired coo foon's a heavy Load^ 

And dang'rous to ht born, as Valois found. 

Without Difguife or Artifice I fp eak. 

And fince 'twas your Command, without Cohftraiht^ 

Great Queen, all Double-dealing Ideteft. 

And thb' I ferve Valois^ I can't iexcufe 

His Glory vanifti'd like a flitting Shade ; ^^ 

Prodigious Change, but fuch as often haps, 

More than one King, we have in Combats feeii 

A Conqueror, and in his Court a Slave. 

True Courage, mighty Queen, is irt the Mind, 

Valois has Virtues, not linmix'd. He's brave. 

But weak, and more a Soldier than a King. 

He's never but in Battle refolute. 

His Fav 'rites flattering his Indolence, 

Guide, as they lift, his Paflions and his PowV^ 

Shut up within the Palace Walls, they live ^* 

• . - , 

Diflblv'd with him in Luxury, and heif • 

E jNo 



so HENRI AD E. 

No Clamours, nor the Cries of the Opprcft. 
They didace, by his Mouth, their wicked Wills. 
The little of the Nation's Treafurc left 
They fquandcr on their Lufts, the People figh. 
But figh in vain to fee the Waftc of Wealth. 
While, as his greedy Mailers drive him on^ 
Valoh with Subfidies wou'd load the State. 
Guife fhcws himfelf, and ftrait th'inconftant Crowd ^7 
Turn all their Eyes towards this glittering Stan 
His Valour, his Exploits, his Father's Fame, 
His Air, his Beauty, and an Art to pleafe. 
Which more than Virtue o'er AiFedions reigns. 
Subdue all Hearts, and gain their Vows for Gutje, 
None better knew to flatter and feducej 
None had his Paffions better at Command ; 
None better knew with fair Appearances 
To colour his Defigns, and in the Depths 
Of Thought, to bury his ambitious Schemes. 
Proud, Plaulible, Imperious, Popular j 
The Mifery of France fo grieves bis SouI> 

fa 



HENRIADE. 51 

His whole Difcourfe is Pity and Complaint;; 

Th'intoUcrabic Tajjes he detefts. 

Happy the Poor from feeing him return. 

The Pray'r of timid Want he oft prevents 

^arisy impatient in his Abfence, knows 

His Prefence only by his Benefits. 

The Great, at once he captivates and hates^ 

A dreadful Foe, to Reconcilement deaf. 

By Nature daring, fupple by Defign. 

His Virtues, ev'n his very Vices (hine. 

Knowing in Dangers, yet He Nothing dreads, 

A gallant Soldier, an accomplifh'd Prince, 

But a bad Citizen, when thought the beft. 

Some Time he took, to put his Pow'r to proof. 

And of the People fix the wavVing Minds. 

He hides Hicofelf no SQore, His Aim avows, 

And is at bold Defiance with his King. 

In Tarts he contrives that Fatal League^ 

Which foon infers the Provinces of France. 

Pell Moniler, by the Great and People bred, 

P 2 Fruitful 



51 HENRIADE, 

Fruitful in Tyrants, and with Slaughter fat. 
Two Monarchs then at once were feen in France^ 
The One, the Royal Name, the Show poflcft. 
The Other, on his Side had Hope and Fear, 
And wanted not the Name td be a King. 
The Noife awak'd Valois^ but fcarce his Eyes 
Cou'd lift their leaden Lids to look around 
And fee the rifing Storm, while o'r his Head 
The Thunders grumble, heavily it hangs j 
He with a Moment's tedious waking tirds. 
And finks again into the Arms of Sleep. 
Thus on the Borders of a Precipice, 
Among his FavVites and his foft Delights, 
Tranquil and eafy he enjoys his Dreamsi. 
Myfelf was only left him, he had none 
But Me to help him on Deftruftion's Brink. 
Heir, he demifing, to the Throne of France^ 
Without more Thought I flew to his Defence, 

i. 

And ofFer'd to his Weaknefe needful Aid, 
Refolv'd to fevc him, or be loft Myfelf. 



But 



HENRI AD E. 53 

But Guife had too much Cunning, and too well 

Knew how to ruin, when on Ruin 1)ent, 

In fecret plotting to deftroy us Both. 

Of One He by the Other gained his Ends. 

Valois was by his Wiles obliged to part 

With the fole Help, that was to favc him left. 

Religion, the moft fpecious of Pretexts, 

Was the fair Veil to hide the foul Defign ; 

The People, at Religion's Name alarm'd. 

Take Fire again, the Former hardly quench'd : ( 

The Wprfhip of their Fathers tp their Zeal 

He recommends, and with apt Words difplays 

The Dangers, menacing from foreign Seds. 

Me, to the Church an Enemy, and God, 

He reprefents, a^nd fays, where'er he comes. 

He fpreads hi^ Errors, and Example takes 

From England's Queen, whofe Works too well arc 

. known. 
On your demolifli'd Temples will he found 
His Own, in Paris will his Preachers fwarm* 

• E 3 The 



^4 HENRI An E, 

The People at thefe Words, enflam*d with Ire, 
And trembling for their Altars, cry'd to Arms. 
The Noife foon rcach'd the Lou^re^ and the League^ 
Feigning to be themfelves in mortal Fright, 
Approached the King, and in the Name of Rbme 
Forbad him to unite himfelf with Me. 
The King, too weak alas ! the Leaguers heard. 
And without murm'ring their Commands obeyed. 
When to revenge his Quarrel, on the Wing 
I came, 'twas faid the Brother oif my Wife 
Valois, had with the Leaguers made his Peace, 
And joyn'd, for my Deftrudlion, with my Foes. 
Armies already o cr the Countrey fpread, 
And, fpight of him, for hoftile Ads preparU 
He, out of meer Timidity, bids War. 
I pity'd him, but ftaid not to debate ; 
I purpofe now to fight him as I came, 
FuU-purpos'd to revenge : The League had rais'd 
All France againft Me, Provinces and Towns 
A Hundred at a Time, for Guife dcclarU 

Mc, 



H E N R I A D E, 55 

Me, Jt^eufey with a mighty Hoft purfu'd. 

Impetuous of Himfelf, and yet a Slave 

To the King's Weakneffes, and while he marched, 

Guijey equally as Wife as Brave, difpers'd 

My Friends, who ftirr*d : All Paffagcs {hut up 

Which favour'd their Approach. Thus ftreighten'd, 

thus 
With Enemies furrounded and with Arms, 
I held them at Defiance, tempted Rifks. 
And Heav'n, v^ho gives all VidVy, to my Caufe 
Propitious in the Day of Battle proved. 
I fought y<^eufey I vanquifti'd Him, He fell. 
And in the Plains of Couiras bit the Ground. ^ 
My Friends like Conq'rof s, like themfclves, behav'd. 
And this innumerable Army broke. 
Of all the Fav'rites, Idols of Valois^ 
Who flattered his voluptuous, liftlefs Life, 
His Mafters, and the Kingdom's, none was leij 
Unworthy of his Favour than Joyeufe. 
By Birth he flione among the firft in France i 

E 4 He 



56 H E N R I A D E. 

He was not without Virtues, and had Fate 
Lengthened his Line, and added to his Years, 
No doubt for Great Exploits He had been fam'dj^ 
And Guift% Glory been by his eclips'd. 
But bred till then at Court, and ever Uid 
In Pleafure's Bofom, and the Arms of Love, 
He a blind Courage only brought to cope 
With fteady Valour and cxperienc'd Arms^ 
Advantage dangerous in a Chief fo proud. 
A thoyfand gay Companions of the Court 
Followed his Fortunes, and partook his Fate, 
• Young Warriours, who to Battle with them bore 
The tender Tokens of their foftcr Vows. 
Eadb had the Cypher of his Fair, and wore 
The dear Diftindlion on his Martial Veft. 
With Gold their Weapons gUtter-d, and with Gqfij^. 
Their Hands with trivial Ojrhaments bed^ck'd 
Thus Fiery, Inexperienced, Rafla and Vain, 
They brought conceited Ignorance to the Field. 
Proud of their Pomp, and of their numVous Hoft 

Impc- 



H E N R I A D E, 57 

Impetuous, without Order, they advance. 

My Camp prefents them with another View, 

A filent Army, regular in Ranks, 

Where the rough Soldier on all Sides is fecn. 

Troops us'd to Toil, and grown in Combats oldj^ 

Inur'd to Blood, and cover'd o*er with Wounds. 

Their Swords and Muikets are their Ornaments. 

Like theqd in plain Attire, s^nd arm'd like themj^' 

I led their dufty Squadrons to the Fight, 

Like them a thoufand threat nlng Deaths I fac^dj 

Known only by my marching at their Head* 

I faw our Enemies in Rout, overthrown, 

Difpers'd, or dying in the Field they loft. 

This Sword, reludtant, in their Breaft Iplung'd^ 

Better it had been dipt in Spanijh Blood 

Among thcfe gaudy Courtiers. I muft own 

Among thqfe Youths, who perifli'd in their Primes 

None with diihonourable Wounds • were pierced. 

Firm in their Poft, as in their Stand, they fell. 

Nor turn'd, when Death adv*nc*d, afidc their 5ycs» 

Nor 



58 H E N RI AD E. 

Nor at his dfeacJful Strides, a Step recoird. 
Such of French Courtiers is the Cha rafter. 
In Peace their wonted Valour's ne'er diflblv'd. 
From Eafe and Pleafure they to Peril fly, 
FlattVers at Court, and Heroes in the CAmp. 
But why this fad Adventure do I tell ? 
Sad tho* Succefsful, why do I recall 
This Battle to Remembrance? All my Fights, 
And all the Blcod I yet have drawn arc French. 
Grandeur fo' dearly purchased has no Charms, 
My Laurels bloody all and bath'd with Tears. 
More roiferablc this Combat made Valois^ 
And deepen'd that Abyfs, from whence in vain 

• • » 

He wou'd have rifen by War. This new Difgracc 
Pour'd more Contempt upon him \ Farts grew 
Still lefs obedient, and the League more bold. 
Hi^ MisVy to compleat, he's forc'd to bear 
The Blaze of Guife'^ Glory, and the Blaft 
Of his own Happinefs, alternate Pain. 
Gnife at Vimory «9 with a happier Hand 

7 Took 



H E N R I A D E, 59 

Took Vengeance on the Germans for Joyeufe ; 
In Auneaul^ my furpriz'd Allies he flew. 
And crown*d with Lawrcis the Parijiam charmed. 
Their Tutekfy God this GonqVof fecm'd. 
Nor cou'd Vdhis avoid the hateful Sight 
He few the Triumphs of his Foe fuperb, 
Whofe Infolende increafing with Succefi^ 
|Ie made it in his cv'ry A£t appear 
That Vahis he had vanqui&'d more thah ferv'd 
Shame will at laft the cooleft Courage warm. 
The King at this laft Outrage was provdfc'd 
To tame a Subjeft's Pride 5 tod late ho try'd 
What he cou'd make in Paris of hid Pbw'f . 
The People neither loy'd nor feared f^alm. 
Audacious Tribes, and prompt to Mutiny^ 
No foonef did they fee he meant to reign 
Than, he's to them a Tyrant, Rebels they. 
They meet, cabal, and fajfe Alarms contrive; 
The Burghers arm, and Parts threatens War, 

A thoufand Rampires in an Infiant rais'd^ 

' Menace 



6o U E N R I A D E. 

Menace the Guards within the Louvre lock'd. 
Gttifi undifturb'd appears amid the Storm, 
Precipitates the People, or reftrains 
Himfelf, the Springs of the Sedition moveSa^ 
And as he pleafes guides the Qrand Machine^ 
The Burghers to the Palace run enraged. 
And at his Word, the King had been no more. 
But when his Glance wou'd have deflroy'd Valois^ 
And to his Life and Reign have put an End, 

Enough he thought it to have fhewn his PowV, 
And made his Mafter tremble in his Home^ 
Himfclf kept back the Mutineers, and left^ 

The Monarch, out of Pity, room to flye. . 
Whatever his Prcjedl was, as Tyrant, Guife 
Too little, and as Subje£t, did too much. 
Who makes his King afraid, has. ev*ry thing 
To fear Himfelf, and every Thing to dare. 
Guifey in his Great Defigns, thia Day confirm.'d,^ 
Saw 'twould be fatal to offend by Halves, 
And rais'd, tho' on a Precipice, fo high, 

* 

Miiling 



H E N R I A D E, 6t 

Miffing the Throne, he muft the Scaffold mount. 
Lord of the League^ and abfolute his PowV, 
His Heart oJF Hope, and Refolution foil. 
By Rome fupported, by the Spaniards helpt. 
And by the French adored, his Brethren Great 
In Name, and fit to fecond his Attempts, 
Guije, iti Imagination, had reftor'd P 

Thole Times, when the Defcendants of our King* 

Deprived, as foon as born, of Sway fupream. 

Under a Cowl the Crown Imperial hid. 

And in a Corner of a Cloifler mourned 

The Lofs of Empire left ih Tyrants Hands. 

Valois^ who had fo long deferred Revenge, 

To Btoisy fummon'd now the States of France: 7* 

What States they were, perhaps, you have been toUi 

Laws were proposM, but never took Effect. 

In vain a thoufand Deputies declaimed 

On Grievances, with barren Eloquence 

^Twas then, as it has always been, they fhew^ 

Th*Abufcs, but not one of them redrefsU 

Among 




6i H E N R I A D E. 

Among the States Guife arrogantly fits 

And braves the Prefcnce of his injured Prince. 

Near to the Throne He takes his Seat fublinoie. 

And, of Succefs afTur'd, He thinks he fees 

So many Subjeds in his Deputies. 

Already the corrupted Band had fold 

The fovVeign Powr to Gutfe^ and wait the Word 

To put it abfolute into his Hands* 

With fearing always, and with fparing tir'd, 

Vahis refolv'd to be revenged, and reign. 

His Rival to difpleafe him daily fought 

Occafion, and when rais'd defpis'd his Wrath. 

Little did he fufped fo weak a Prince, 

Howe'er provpk'd, could have the Force of Mind 

That arms Afiafiins Hands, and bids the Blow. 

Blinded by Dcftiny, his Hour is come. 

And Valois in his Prefence has Him flain. 

His Breaft a hundred Poignards bafely pierc'dj 

Expiring he prefcrv'd his haughty Air, 7^ 

That Front, perhaps, ftill dreadful to the King, 

Bloody 



HEN R I AD E, 63 

Bloody and Pale, his Mafler feem*d to brave. 
Thus dy*d this mighty Subjed:, Mixture rare. 
Of Virtues and of Vices (hining alL 
Valois^ who like a Coward bore his Wrongs^ 
Reveng'd them like a Coward, not a King. 



Soon did the dire Report in Paris ipread, 

The frighted People fiird the Air with Cries ; 

Old Men and Women wrung their Hands, and wail'd, 

And hung on Guife's Statues like a God's. 

Paris, in utmoft Peril, as She thought, 

Look'd on herfelf by double Duty bound 

To fave the Church, Her Father to revenge. 

Amidft them Gui/e's Brother, valiant Mayne, 74 

To Vengeance animates their Zeal, and Rage, 

And more by Int'rcft than Refentment mov'd. 

He fets a hundred Cities in a Flame. 

Mayne from his Childhood had been bred to War, 

And under Guife had early carry'd Arms, 

SucceiTor to his Glory, and Defigns, 

The 



64 H E N R t A D R, 

The Leaguers put their Scepter in his Hand ; 
That boundlefs Greatnefs to his Soul fo deir 
Soon reconcird him to a Brother's Lofs. 
He ferv'd, reludant, and tho* drbwn'd in Tears!, 
lik'd better to revenge Him than obey. 
Mayne is in Heart a Hero warm and wife: 

M 

*■ 

He by his Af ts can different Minds perfwade. 

And in Obedience to his Laws unite. 

Foes to their Mafters, to Ufurpers Slaves. 

He knows their Talents, and he knows their Ufe« 

Advantage of Misfortune oft he makes. 

Guife glar'd, and dazled more the People's Eyes; 

More grand, but not more dang'rous He, than Mayne. 

Such is the Chief, who now commands the League^ 

And, to hide nothing from you, I confefs 7s 

I fear his PtUdence. But for young Aumale^ 

Vain and prefumptuous, who in Tarh vaunts 

His Battles, Viftories, and Feats of Arms, 

Tho' Buckler of the Ledgut^ he bears till novr 

The Title of Invincible, tho' Fame 



H E N R I A D E. 6y 

Mas equalrd him to Guife^ and tho' iii Fightfi, 
Couragious like another hf^rs^ be feems^ 
It is but Courage, and I fear bim not. 

Mean while the King^ Who glories in his Craft, 7^ 
Th*Opprcffor, vainly ftyl'd the Catholick, 
Philips your Enemy, but much more mine^ 
Eipous*d the Quarrel of ufurping Mayne^ 
And fent out guilty Rivals impious Aid. 
Rome^ who thefe Troubles ought to have appeas'd, 
^me^ put the flaming Torch in Difcord's Hand. 
He, who's the Father of all Chriflians call'd, 
Gave to his Sons the Sanguinary Blade» 
Taris die Centre of all Ills becomes ; 
Valm to Mifery cxtream reduced. 
Without or Subjects or Defence purfu'd^ 
Saw he again muft have Recourie to Mc. 
GenVous He thought Me, and is not deceived. 
No Heart more anxious for the State than nciine. 
Such Danger for Refentment left w JEloom. 

F Oii 



66 il E N RI AD E. 

On V^ois as my Brother by the Bonds 

Of Marriage^ and by Laws my King, I looked. 

My Duty fo brdain'd ; a King was wrong'd. 

And I, a King, oblig'd to fee that Right 

Was done him in Authority and Rank. 

Nor Treaty made, nor Hoftage afk'd, I came 

And told Him, In your Courage is your Fate, 

Let Yzm's proud Rampirespp no more 

Tour Vengeance^ Come and Conquer there or Dye. 

I feid, and at the Word a Noble Pride 

PofTofe'd his Soul j I flatter not myfelf 

That my Example fuch a Change produc'd. 

And kindled in his Breaft i^ bright a Flame. 

Difgrace, no doubt, his fleepbg Valour wak'd, 

And made him loath thatEafe which caus'd his Shame. 

Valois of adverfe Fortune flood in need. 

And needful is Misfortune oft to Kings. 



Bmrbon his faithful Story thus purfu'd^ 
Nor did he Suit for Englijh Aids ncglca:. 



Now 



H E N R I A D E. 6y 

Now from the Rebel City's Walls, the Voice 
Of Vidtory recalls Him to his Gamp, 
He's follow 'd by a thoufand Gallant Youths, 
The Flow'r of Efiglandy who in Queft of Fame 
Quit Dover's chalky CliiFs, and cleave the Seas. 
EJfex is at their Head, lUuftrious Chief, 17 
Whofe Valour on the proud Iberian prov'd 
Their Policy confounded and their PowV. 
Little he thought, that an inglorious End 
Wou'd kill the Laurels He in War had won* 
Henry for EJfex ftaid not, fuch his Hafte 
To combat and to conquer for Valois^ 
And when he for Departure is prepared. 
Go, fays the Queen, Heroick Henry ^ go 3 
My Warriours will be with you crofs the WavcS^ 
*Tis you theyVe willing^ not your King,- to ferve. 
My Friendftiip, for their Treatment trufts, in yours 
You'll find them in the Day of Battle bold. 
Where Peril prcffes moft, you'll find them pYfefs, 
To imitate you more than to affift, 

F a By 



68 H E N R I A D E, 

By your Example taught the Art of War, 

« 

England in ferving you they'll learn to fcrve. 
Soon may the League beneath your Arms expire. 
The Spaniard is for Mayne^ agaihft you Rome. 
Go ; Conquer Spain^ and hear without Concern 
Rome's Thunders, which to Heroes are but Noife. 
The Pride of Sixtus 7^ and of Philip tame. 
And vindicate the Freedom of Mankind. 
Philip, His Father's Heir Tyrannical, ' 
Lefs Great, lefs Brave, but not lefs Politick, 
His Neighbours iirft divides, and then enflavcs;, 
And forming in his Palace vaft Defigns, 
Thinks to be Mafter of the Univerfe. 
Sixtus, who from the Duft to Empire rofe 
With lefs Puiffancc, has more Pride, to Kings 
The Shepherd of Monfalte a Rival grows. 
In Paris, as in Rome, he wou'd command. , 
Beneath the Luftre of a triple Crown 
Philip Himfelf and All he would fubjed. 

Fierce, Furious, Fraudful, Falfe, he hates the Great, 

And 



H E N R I J D E. 6^ 

And is the proud Oppreflbr of the Weak. 
In London^ in my Court he has his Brigucs, 
And the mock*d World is full of his Intrigues. 
Thcfe are the Foes you are to fight, they Both ' 
Have ris'n againft Me to their Lofs and Shame ; 
The One, unequal Combat, fought in vain 
With Englijh Valour and tempeftuous Winds; 
His Flight and Shipwreck were to Ocean (hewn. 
And England's Shoars with Blood Iberian ftain'd. 
Silent the Other Diiappointment bears. 
And Sixtus Me at once efteems and fears. 
Go then, your noble Enterprize purfue ; 
Mayne vanqui(h*d, Rome will readily fubmit. 
Tis yours her Hate and Favours to direft j 
Supple to ConqVors, to the Conquer'd ftiiF; 
Prompt to condemn, and ready to abfolve.^ 
'Tis yours to dart her Thunders or dcftroy. 



HE AT. 



H E N R I A D E. 
C A N T O IV. " 



ARGUMENT. 

Navarre returns to the Camp before Paris, wbere 
Henry III. has renewed the Siege, and beat the 
Leaguers into the 'Town. Aumale^ijV by Difcord. 
Her Speech to the Duke de Mayne. Her Flight to 
Rome.' The Degeneracy and Corruption of Popes 
ami the Popijh Church defcrib'd. The CharaSier of 
Sixt-us Quintus. Of State Policy. H^r Speech to 
Difcord. Religion attack'd in her Cell by Difcord 
a?7d State Policy. State Policy corrupts the Reve-r . 
rend DoBors of the Sorbonne. Difcord'j Speech to 
the Priejls in Paris. The Leaguers choefe a Council 
of State, -who put to Death feveral Members of tbt 
Parliament of Paris. 

HILE thus in fecrct high Difcourfe 

they held, 
And ^'d fuch weighty IntVefts in the 
Scale, 
Great Themes, while Both with Art profound dif- 
cufs'd. 

To 



H E N R I A D E, ni ^ 

9 
I 

I 

' To comlvit, conquer, and to rule the World. 

The frighted Seine upon his bloody Banks 

Beheld ihe Banners of the Leaguers wave. 

Falois in Henrfs Abfence full of Care, 

And fearful of th'Event, avoided Fight, 

In Couniel and in Arms He wanted Help, 
And Bourbon is in Both the Help He wants, 

Aflur'd of Viftory with Him : The League 

Grew bold by thefe Delays, nor fear*d to quit 

Their Walls, and in the Champian pufli the War. 

Proud Aumale^ Nemours 79^ Boufflers ^^, Bois Dciuphtn^ - 

Brifac ^S Canillac «% and Elbeuf 83, Brave All, 

And on the guilty Side intrepid Chiefs 

Struck Terror by their Sallies in Vahis^ 

Who apt to do, and to repent, regrets 

Bourbon'^ Departure, tho himfelf the Caufe. 

Among thefe Combatants their Mafter*s Foes, 

A Brother of Joyeufe had long appear 'd. 

He, who by Turns the Court and Cloyfter try*d j 

Now for the Court, and for the Cloyfter now, 

F 4 Wicked 



' 



72 HENRIADE. 

Wicked and Penitent, Courtier and Rcclufe, 
He takes and quits, retakes and quits again 
The Cuirafs and the Cowl, and from tbc Foot 
Of Holy Altars watcr'd with his Tears 
He runs, and animates the League to Rage, 
And in the Blood of France imbrues that Hand^ 
Which He had confecrated to his God. 
But among all thefe daring dangerous Peers, 
He, who moft merits Eulogy ill-got. 
Were you, young Prince, impetuous Autnale 84, 
You, born of Lvraine Blood, for Heroes fam'd. 
You, Enemy to Kings, to Laws, to Reft, 
Attended always with the Ncbleft Youth, 
Far in the Countrey fierce Incurfions make, 
Iq Sally ^fter Sally, thefe Aumale 
Inceflant leads, and feldom mifles Prey. 
Sometimes in Silence, fometimes with a Noife; 
Ii) pay-light fometimes, fometimes in the Night, 
lie falls on the Befiegers by Surprize, 
And ^tteps with their ^lood th^lr Mi|9 Fiel49f 



lA 



H E N R I A D E, 73 

In one of tl(iefe Encounters to tKfe Tents 

\ 

Of Valois He, triumphant, penetrates. 

Night and Surprife increafe th' Alarm, All ply. 

All tremble, to the ConqVor all give way. 

60 far did this tempeftuous Torrent roll 

And threaten Inundation wide and deep. 

When, Lo like Lightning burfting thro' a Cloud, 

Henry on Aumale's frighted Squadrons drives. 

His Flight to Pafisy fwift and unforefeen 

He came, Jle fought, He changed the Face of War, 

Fire's in his Eyes, and in his Hand is Death. 

See Joyeufe to his gloooiy Clpifter flies, 

Among the dying fiery Baveufe falls. 

t 4 . 

a 

Where run you, Boufflers^ too audacious Youth, 
See you not Death advancing ? Seek him not. 
Come not within the Reach of Henrys Arm, 
But ah, that Arm has reach'd him, and He's fallen i 
His once-bright Eyes no Ray of Light receives. 
For ever clos'd, and all his youthful Charms 
t'd^ and Wuh th^ FUth of Blood effac'd. ' 

Thus 




74- HENRIADE. 

Thus a fair FlowV in Summer-Morning frcfti 

\yith Z^/&yn JCiffcs and Aurora's Tears, 

At the firft raging of the Tcmpeft dies. 

Which drives adverfe, and ravages the Plains, 

In vain Aumale the Fugitives wou'd flop, 

His Voice prevails a Moment, but Bourbon's 

Soon drowns it, and precipitates their Flight; 

His threatening Look with Terror ftrikes them dead. 

And Fear difperfes whom Aumale wou'd joyn \ 

Who with the Flyprs into Flight is drawn. 

Thus on the Summit of a Hill, a.RocJc 

• ...4. • . , * 

That lifted to the Clouds its hoary Head,. 
Wafting with Frofts and Snows perpetual cleaves, 

• • - ^ . 

« 

And drops, and down the craggy Mountain foils. 

But hold— He flops, and to th'AfTailantfi turns j 

• < • 

He (hews them that fierce Front fo known andftarU 
And, difentanglecj from his flying Troops, 
Difdaining Life, flies back upon his Foes. 
His Rally checks^ the ConqVor in his Courfe, 
Short Paufe of Vidory, Aumale is fooa . 

With 



IT 



H E N R I A D E, 75 

With Enemies furrounded ; at his Head 

The Blow that would be certain Death is aixn'd; 

But Difcord fees and trembles for her Son, 

As barbVous as the Fiend, flie fears to lofe 

A Life fb needful to Her, and the League. 

She darts thro* Air, and to his Succour flies ; 

She comes, flie join^ him, and aigainft the Swords 

Of preffing Enemies, his Breaft defends. 

Her Iron ^hield impenetrable, vaft 

On whofe. Appearance Death and Horror wait, 

Whofe Sight, or Rage, or; freezing F^a • inlpircsj 

O'er Him {hef{*eads and intercepts Aflault^ 

Oh Child of Hetl, inexorable Pow'r! 

This once Thou haft been helpful to a Man. 

A Hero thou haft fav'd, his Fate prolonged 

WiA the fame Hand, that miniftcrs tp 'Death; 

With the fame barb -rous Handi that ne'er till now 

Spar'd Victim, and was never clean of Blood, 

Thou haft this once to mortal Man been kind. 

She to the Gates of Paris bears Auma^^ 

Staunches 



76 H E N R I A D E. 

Staunches the Blood that for her Pleafure flows; 
But when hiis He^ch She had reftor'd. She pour 'd 
Her deadly Poifon in his Heart malign. 
A Tyrant thus in cruel Pity grants 
A Wretch, copdemn'd to die, a fhort Reprieve 
To do fome horrid Crime, and wh^ 'tis done 
Delivers up the Criminal to Peath. 
Henry ^ whofe Arms had with Succefs been crownU 
To make the mod: of this Advantage knew. 
And of what Worth the Moments are in War, ' 
He preft his Enemies in their Surprife, 
And when ^he Battle ends th'Aflkult begins'. 
Marks of their Lofs around their Walk he leaves* 
Full of reanimating Hope Valets^ 
So well fupported, to his Soldiers gives 
Example^ and receives it of Bourbon. 9. 

He's foremoi^ in Fatigues, he braves Afarme j 
Its Pleafures Toil, and Peril has its Charms. 
The Chiefs are all united. All fucceeds 
To their juft Vows, and Conqueft's with their Arma. 

Terror 



H E N R I A D E. 77 

Terror before thetn marches to the ToWn, 

And foon difperfing the Parijian Bands^ 

Rufhes in their Amazement to the Gates 

To break the Barriers, and adnvit the King. < 

What in fo prcffing Danger can be done ? 

Mayne has an Army, but what Army ? Troops 

That raflily run to Mutiny from Trades. 

Here, with a Flood of Tears a Daughter mourns 

A Father, there a Brother in Defpair 

Weeps o*er a Brother's Grave 5 the prefent Times, 

Their making, each deplores, the future dreads. 

The Multitude by thefe Alarms disjoin'd 

Not eafily unite. They meet, confult. 

Some are for Flight, and for Surrender fome; 

All unrefolv'd, and for Refiflance none. 

So lightly do the feeble Vulgar change. 

And frottkTcmerity fubfide to Fear. 

Mayne fees them frighted, in a Fright himfelf; 

Irrcfolute, in all his Schemes perplcxt. 

When oh a fudden Difiord's itx his Sight; 

7 ^^ 



78 H E^N kl AD E. 

Her Snakes hifs horrible^ and thus fhe (peaks r 
" Heir of the moft redoubted Name in France i 
" With Me, in vow'd Purfuit of Vengeance join'd^ 
*« Bred in my View, and by nay Precepts formed, 
" Liftcn to thy Proteftrefs, and obey: 
« Fear Nothing from the People, weak and light j 
" A flight Misfortune fliakes their Goward-Souls, 
*' But they are Mine, their Hearts are in my Hands, 
** Soon (halt thou fee them 5 fecond our Defigns 

^' Full of my Poifon, to my Rage a Prey, 
*' With Rcfolution fight, and die with Joy. 

She faid— and fwifter than a Lightning's Flaih 
Cuts with unweary Wing the yielding Skies, 
France in thefc Troubles and Alarms fhe views^ 
Charmed with a Sight fo hideous and abhorrU 
Parch'd where (he breaths, and barren arc the Fields} 
Fruits dye away, infefted in the Bud, 
And in green Ears th'unripen'd Harveft rots ; 
Darkened the Face of Heav'n, the Stars turn pak. 

And 



HE N R I A D E. 79 

And Lightnings all around Hen darting Fires 
Seem to denounce Deftrudtion as fhe flies. 
A Whirlwind bears her to thofe fruitful Banks 
Enrich'd by Tybers tributary Waves. 
And now with cruel Eyes She Rome regards, 
Rome^ once her Temple, and the Dread of Kings. 
Ibmey deftin*d in all Times, in Peace and War 
To reign, and to be Miftrefs of the World, 
In Ages paft, by Conquefts (he prevaiVd, 
And Tyrants chained to her Triumphal Car, 
Her dreadful Eagle aw'd the peopled Globe. 
But now more peaceful is her Pow'r fupream. 
To bend her Conq'rors to her Yoke (he knows, 
To govern Minds, and have Command of Hearts. 
Her Counfels are her Laws, her Arms Decrees. 
Near the proud Capitol, where War bore Swaj, 
And on the pompous Ruins of the God, 
A Pontiii; where the Cafar's fate, is thron'd. 
Succe&ful Priefts have under Foot the Tombs 

Of Cato\ and the Scipio's facred Duft. 

2 The 



8o HENRIADE. 

The Throne's upon the Altar, and the Hand 
That holds the Scepter, does the Cenfer hold. 
God was Himfelf the Founder of his Giurch, 
Or perfecuted, or triumphant, She 
Her Piety and Purity preferv'd. 
With Truth, her firft Apoftlc brought to Baome 
Candour, Simplicity, and Mceknefs pure. 
A while his Succeflbrs his Paths purfu'd. 
And the more humble were the more reverU 
Their Heads with no vain Ornaments were deck'4 
Their Virtue, and their Poverty feverc, 
Holy and jealous of the only Goods, 
Which bear a Price in a true Chriftian's Heart 
From haulmy Cotes, their only Manfions, then 
They flew to Martyrdom and gain'd the Crown. 
The Grand Corrupter Time, their Manners changU 
By Heav'n at length abandoned to their Lufts, 
Greedy they grafp'd the Grandeurs of the World, 
And Princes, for our Punifliment, became. 
The Church now grown puiffant and profane. 

To 



H E N R I A D E. 8i 

To wicked crUcl Meh was foon a Prey, 

Her new Foundations were in Treafon laid^ 

In Poifon, and in Blood ; Her Pontiffs proud 

Lieutenants of the Son of God were ftyVd ; 

Yet, without Blufhing, the moft Holy Place 

With Liceft and Adult'ry they defird. 

And Rome^ opprefs'd by their detefted Sway, c -1 

Of her Falfe Deities regrets the Lofs. 

» • 

Of late more prudent Maxims have prevaird. 

The Court, ffiofe modcft, has conceal'd her Crime* 

Under Appearances more mild and fair. 

Decency reigns, the Conclave has its Laws. 

There, tho* not oft^ the brighteft Virtue (hines^ 

The Name of Urfin well deferves otir Praife ; 

But Thrones with few fuch Sov'reigns have been bleft^ 

Rome's Annals for above a thoufand Years 

Few Paftors among many Tyrants count. 



Then of the Church ind Rome was Sixius King* • 
Of a Great Man to gain the glorious Namej 



/ 



Sz H E N R I J D E. 

Were nothing more required than to be Falfe, 

Auftere, redoubted, then of Kings and Mea 

Sixtus among the Created may be roird. 

In Artifices fifteen Years he fpent. 

His Virtues fifteen Years and Vices hid. 

The Dignity he foyght, he feem'd to fhun^ 

Unworthy he afFefted to be thought, 

To make his Way the fmoothcr to the Throne. 

Cunning, fupported by Defpotick PowV, 

Reign'd in the Vatican with fairer Name, 

State- Policy y of Origin obfcene. 

Daughter of Intereft and Ambition, 

Parent of Fraud, Sedition, Subterfuge, 

The fubtle Manfter with Devices teems. 

At Eafe amidft Soliicitudes appears. 

Her hollow piercing Eyes, no Frieftds to Reft, 

Ne'er dipt their Lids in Slumber's Poppy Dew* 

She dazles Europe with Difguifes, formed 

To breed Confufion, and abufe Mankind. 

Prompt is Authority to lend her Pow'r ; 

i Falfliood's 



H E N R I A D E. 83 

Falfliood's in all her Words, but wears the Mafk 
Of Truth, and mimicks, to deceive, her Voice ; 
No fooncr fpy*d She Difcord, but flie ftraic 
With Air myfterious flew into her Arms, 
And flatter'd, with malignant Smiles, the Fiend, 
Cajol'd^ and on a fudden fighing faid ; 



For me thofe happy Times are now no more, 

When Mortals crowded to Me with their Vows. 

When Eurcpey credulous, the Church's Laws 

In mine confounded, and confefs'd my ^ay. 

I fpoke, and humbled Monarchs from their Thrones 

Defcending, trembled at my Feet; I fpoke. 

And War, as I direded, rag'd on Earth. 

My Thunders from the Fatican*s high Tow'rs 

I hurl'd, and Life and Death were in my Hand$«i 

Crowns, as I pleased, I gave and took away. 

Thofe Times are now no more, a few in Frame ^S 

Defy the Thunder in my Hand upheld ; 

Thefe Few embody'd by their hated Iaws, 
I G 2 Fri«»dg 



■ 



84 H E N R I A D E. 

Friends to the Church, and Enemies to Me^ 
The Peoples Eyes have*open'd, and from Mift^ 
Have clear 'd'; and, blinded, they'll be led no more. 
They firft unmafk'd Me, and for injured Truth 
Took Vengeance, and expos'd my Fraud to Sham& 
Why, Difcordy whom with fo much Zeal I ferve. 
Why cannot I the Senate's Self fcduce 
Or punifh ? Fll rekindle at thy Torch 
My Lighming, and to Afhes fee reduced 
The Throne of France. Our Poifons let's unite. 
And o'er theCJniverfe Infedlion fpread. 



She ^lid, and fwift as Thought thro' i^her fhoots. 
Thefe Monfters to Religion^s facred Cell 
Hie, and invade her peaceful Solitude. 
There without Pomp and without Noife She paft 
In Pray'r, and in Humility the Time. 
There, difencumber'd of the bulling Croud, 
[Who to make Fortunes only ufe her Name^ 

Her 



C^ 



HENRIABK 85 

Her Heart with Love of Henry was enfkm'd, 
A Holy Fire. This Daughter of the Skies 
Knew that one Day, She to revenge her Wrongs, 
And fix the lawful Worfhip in her Fanes, 
Should take Bourbon for her adopted Son. 
Worthy She thought him, and her ardent Sighs 
Haften'd the happy Time that yet feem'd flow. 
Difcord and impious Policy furpriz'd 
Their Enemy auguft, and laid rude Hands 
Upon her modeft Front, and heav nly Charms, 
Then without trembling ftript her of her Robes. 
Her facred Veil upon their Head impure 
They placed, and in their Violence took Pride* 
To Paris in Defpair the Furies flye, 
And in a Moment change the Peoples Hearts. 
Sly Policy^ with winning Air, her Way 
Into old Sorbonne\ fpacious Bofom works, ^^ 
And fees hsx Fadtious Heads together fwarais 
Once learn'd Defenders of Eternal Truth, 

They by their Leffons and Examples taiight, 

G 3 F^ith- 



86 H E N RI A D E. 

Faithful alike to God and to their King. 
Till then their manly Vigour they maintained. 
Error her Arrows ever fliot in vain 
Againft their Breads impenetrably firm. 
But rare the Virtue that can ftand a Shock 

Inceflant, andunfhaken perfevere. 
The Monfter in Difguife, with fair Addrefs, 
And foft bewitching Words foon fliook their Souls. 
Th' Ambitious She with Grcatnefs tempts, and fcts 
The Mitre, rich in Gems, before their Eyes. 
The Mifer, fecret Bargain, fells his Voice, 
With groffeft Eulogy the Pedant's charm'd, 
And wheedled by falfe Praife betrays the Truth. 
The Weak, She by her Threats intimidates; 
They meet tumultuous, and tumultuous vote, 
Amidft their Cries confus'd, Debate and Noife, 
Truth flies in Tears j the Mutinous prevail. 
And all the Bonds of due Obedience break. 
Which France had to the Line of Capel 87 rworn. 
Difcord^ with ready, as with cruel Hand, 

DraMTS 



/ 



H E N R I AD E. B7 

Draws the Decree in Chara<flcrs of Blood. 
Thence in an Inftanc on the Wing She fhoots 
From Church to Church, and that Decree proclaims. 
In Cloak Aujlinian or Francifcan Frock, 
Her Voice is in the Depths of Cloyfters heard. 
The Hol}!^ Spedres from their gloomy Cells 
Croud at her Call, and ber Commands attend. 



Know, fays the Fury, know Religion's Look ; 
Revenge the Caufe of injured Heav*n ; 'tis I 
Who know his Holy Will ; 'tis I, who call. 
From the moft High thfe Dagger I received. 
This Blade by God's own Hand was put in Mine, 
This Blade, fo dreadful to our Enemies. 
'Tis Time to quit your Temples awful Glooms. 
Go then, and (hew Examples of your 2eaL 
Go, teach the French, who waver in their Faith, 
To fight their Sovereign is to ferve the Lord. 
On Levies facred Family^fleft, 
CaU'd to the Holy Miniftry by Heav'n, 

G 4 They 



88 H E N R I A D E. 

They merited fuch Honours with their Swords, 
And at the Altar minifter'd with Hands 
Stain'd with the Blood of IfraeVt chofen Race. 
Where arc the Times, Ah where thofe happy Times 
When Brothers in my Prefence Brothers jflew ? 
You Priefts divine, you guided then their Arms, 
You only were Colignfs Homicides. 
I fwam in Blood, in Blood I now would fwim. 
Go (hew yourfelves to my devoted Sops* 

She faid, her fatal Poifon fwell'd their Hearts, 
And in a Moment they in Paris march. 
The Crofs, their Standard, waving in the Wind. 
They chant, and with their Cries, devout and fierce 
Seem to aflbciate Heav n in their Revolt. 
Curfes they mingle with Fanatick Vows, 
Lewd Imprecations with their publick PrayVs, 
As Priefts audacious, but as Warriours weak, 
With Sabre, and with Sword in Hand, they marcht 
In heavy Armour i% their Sackcloth hid i 

This 



H E N Rl AT> K 89 

This infamous Militia, thus equipped, 
Mix with th'impetuous Multitude, and urge 
To War, the God of Peace before them born. 



MaynCy who far off their vain Attempt beheld, 

Defpis'd what he afFedted to approve. 

He knew how eafily the Populace 

Confound Religion and Fanaticifm. 

The Art he knew, fo needful to a Prince 

To find their Weakneis, and their Error feed. 

This pious Scandal he applauds, which moves 

The Wifeman's Anger and the Soldier's Mirth« 

The Vulgar are tranfported at the Sight, 

They rend the Skies with Shouts of Hope and Joy, 

And as their Fury did to Fear give way. 

Their Fear to Fury yields. Thus he who rules 

TJie Main, and rides upon the Winds and Waves, 

Or calms, or troubles, as he lifts, the Seas. 

jyifcord for Help upon a Number fix'd. 

And chofe Sixteen diftinguifh'd by their Crimes, 

The 



i)o H E N RI AD E. 

The fierceft of the Faftion, to be firft 

In Service under their infernal Queen. 

She mounts them on her Car, obfcene with Blood, 

Pride, Treafon, Rage and Death before them march. 

Obfcureiy were they born, and bafely.bred, 

Ennobled by their Enmity to Kings, 

And fcated by the People next the Throne. 

Mayne trembling fees them by his Side, the Sports 

Of Difcordy whom She raifes in Caprice, 

And oft makes Eqvals of Accomplices. 

In this fad Time of Tumult Themis kept 

Her Chair untainted, from Infeftion free. 

No Thirft of Grandeur,, neither Hope nor Fear, 

Cou*d -make her Hand upright, the Ballance turn. 

Her Temple only without Spot remained. 

And thither Equity for Shelter flew. 

Within the Temple where the Goddefs dwells, 

A venerable Senate have their Seat, 

Difpenfers of the Laws, and the Support; 

Mediate between the People and the King. 

7 They 



H E N R I A D E, 91 

They march with equal Step, and oft fubmifsp 

Confiding in the Royal Equity, 

Lay at their Sovereign's Feet the Plaints of FratUi. 

Their fole Ambition is the publick Good, 

To Tyranny and to Rebellbn Foc». 

Full of Refpcft, of Refolution full. 

Slavery they hate, but in Obedience pride. 

Prompt for our Liberties to arm j they know 

And honour Rome^ but when She's wrong, oppofe. 

Jiiovfrtht Sixteen^ Tyrannick Troop, afiault 

The Gates of ^bemis. At their Head appears 

A bluftVing Fencer from a venal Stage, 

Rais'd by his Impudence to this high Poft. 

Amid the Senate with rude Front he thrufts. 

Nor bends before that awful Bench,^ whofe Breath 

The Fortunes of the Citizens decides. 

You Magiftrates, fays He, who reprefent 

In Senate not the Sov'reign but the State, 

The People, you yourfelves have long oppreft. 

By 



91 H E N R I AD E. 

By Me have fent you their Commands fupreme. 

The Capets Yoke they will no longer bear, 

And take that Pow'r away, which they abus'd. 

Mark, I forbid you, own them, if you dare, 

The People are your Matters now, obey. 

Thefe Words with fuch a threatening Air pronounc'd, 

With juft Aftoniihment the Senate ftruck. 

Such Inlblence, till then unknown, provoked 

Their Indignation, but without the Pow'r 

To puni(h, they in folemn Silence fate, 

A Silence, that cnrag'd th'audacious League. 

All but th*avenging Senate were feduc'd: - 

This Steadinefs is Outrage to their Crime. 

Great Harlai's ^9 to their Fury moft exposed. 

That Oracle of Juftice and the Laws, 

So terrible to the Perverfe, is feiz'd. 

By thofc he (hou'd have punifli'd, put in Bonds^ 

And to the Dungeon led. His Brethren beg 

To fliare the Glory of his Punifliment j 

Viaims of hoy^lty to Sovereigns due, 

. . They 



H E N R I A D E, 



93 



They offer to the Chain their genVous Hands. 

Say, Mufe, the Worthies Names, fo dear to France, 

And confecrate to Fame, whom Licenfe thus pppreft. 

Virtuous de 7bou 9\ Mole 9\ Bayeul, Scarorty 

Blancmenily jimelot93, ^nd young Longueil, 

Whofe Genius well fupply'd his want of Years, 

And "well his Heart Heroick match'd his Head. 

The Senate feiz'd by the Sixteen were led 

Like Slaves in Triumph thro* the Populace, 

To thofe dark Tow'r's, the 94 Palace of Revenge, 

Where Innocence is oft iliut up with Guilt. 

Thus have the Fadlious chang'd the State entire -, 

No Senate is there Now 9f , and No Sorbonne. 

Will not their Fury be content with this ? 

Juft Heav'n ! What Sight's prefented to my Eyes ? 

Who are the Magiftrates, the Hangman hales 

To Death, the Tyrants Orders to fulfil. 

Virtues in Paris have the Fate of Crimes. 

You, Brijfon 9^, Larcber^ Cardiff, Vidlims Great, 

No Shame attends you by this ihameful Death. 

Blufh 



94 H EN Rl AD E. 

Blufh nor, ye gbrious Shades^ your Names will live 
As long as Time, and in RetnembraDce fhipe. 
Difivd. amidft tfa£ Mutineers exults 
With Joy at the Succefi of her Defignsj 
Cruelly plea^'d Aie contemplates the War, 
Th'EfFe&s of Rage domeftick, and the Plagues, 
The wretched Crowds within thoie bloody WaUs» 
Againll their Ptioce united, and amongft 
Themfelves divided, DJ/confs heedle^ Imps, 
Sports of inteftme Fury, who promote 
Their Country's Ruin, and in Hers their Own, 
The Tumult from Within, the Peril from Withouti 
The Slaughter ev'ry where, the Waftc and Woe 



HEN- 



H E N R I A D E. 
C A N T O V. ~ 

ARGUMENT. 

Clement the Monk ajfajjinates Henry III. Clement*! 
CbaraBer. His wicked Prayer. Fanaticifm de- 
fcribed. His Speech to Clement to excite bim to the 
Murther. 1'be Leaguers a^iy to a Magician. 
Clement'i Speech to the King before be fiabs him. 
Hemy^Kr'n^ of t^Avine/ucceeds Henry III. 

EAN while the dire Machines of 

• Death advance. 
And in iheir^Womb the Fate of Re- 
bels bear. 
They batter down the Walls with Iron Globes, 
And from a hundred brazen Mouths ihoot Fire. 

Maynt'% 



96 H E N R I A D E. 

Mayne's Condufl:, and the Wrath of the Sixteen^ 
The Madncfe of the fadious Multitude, 
The Dodors fcandalous Harangues, are All 
Againft Vidtorious Henry ^ Succour vain, 
Conqueft attends Him. Sixtus, Philips Rome 
Break out in Menaces ; but Rome's no more 

The Terror of the World as in Old Times. 

She thunders, but her Thunder burfts in Ain 

The Spaniard's old, and moves with tardy Pace. 

His Troops, arrived in France^ rove up and down, 

JjSLy wafte the Cities, and negledl the Siege. 

Perfidious, He expedls th*exhaufted League 

Should yield, an eafy Conqueft, to his Yoke. 

And thus the dangerous Aid of a Falfe Friend, 

Inftead of an Ally prepares a Mafter, 

When a mad Prieft's determined Hand a- while 

Seem'd to give Deftiny another Form. 

BTou, peaceful Citizens of Faris^ born 

In better Times, forgive the unwilling Mofe, 

ConapeU'd the Truth to tell, how Fa<3ion rag'd. 

And 



H E N k t A D E. 

And Your Forefathers were feduc'd and fin'di 
To you the Guilt and Horror of their Crimes 
Extend not, your AfFedion to your Kings 
And firm AUegidnce, have their Faults repaired; 



97 



The Church has in all Times Recliifes bredj 

Colleagues in Houfe and Habit, and to Rules 

Severe, by certain rigid Statutes, fworn. 

From other Men diftinft, in Peace profound. 

Some live infenfible of Pleafure*s Charm^j 

And Strangers to the World and worldly Joys, 

To God, and Holy Reft devoted, thefe 

Avoid Mankind, whom they might well have ferv*d» 

Others have made themfelves of Ufe to Kings^ 

And in the Church, and in the Chair have ihin^d^ 

But oft intoxicated with Applaufc^ 

And frequent iii the World have learnt its Ways, 

Oft their Ambition has iii Brigues been fkill'd 3 

More than one Nation their Intrigues have WaiVd. 

Thus amodgft Men^ deplorable Abufe^ 

H Th* 



98 HENRIADE. 

The greateft Gcx)d becomes the greateft 111. 
Thofe who the Life of Dominick 97 embraced. 
Have fcen their Glory ftablifti'd long \n Spain, 
And from th'Obfcurity of bafe Employs 
Have rifen at once, and glittered near the Throne. 
With equal Zeal, but not with equal PowV 
This Order has in France been long renown'd, 
Prote(£ted by our Kings ; in peaceful State 
They liv'd, were happy, and might ftill have liv'd, 
Had Clement in her Bofom never lain, s^ 
Clement^ a Traytor, who from Youth had worn 
The gloomy Face df Virtue moft feverc : 
Weak, credulous, fanatical, devout. 
He with the Torrent of Rebellion drove. 
Difcord infus'd into this fenfelefs Youth, 
Her Poifon pour'd from her infernal Mouth. 
Proftrate at Altar's Feet he daily pray'd, 
And with his wicked Vows fatigu'd the Skies; 
Covered with Afhes and with Duft, 'tb faid. 
He once put up this horrid Pray'r to Heav'a. 



Ob 



M E M RI AD K §^ 



Ob Gody Pf(Ae&6r of Aelfgioks Kif^s^ 
Of lyt'ants Great Aoenger^ fhall we fee 
By thy awn Hands thy Children always cru/h^dt 
Wilt tbbu thy Enemy againfi them arm^ 
The Murderous fa^ur^ and the Perjured bkfs t 
7(w long^ Oh Gody th'hafl irfd us with thy Flaitti 
Lift up thy Hand at length a^ainft thy Foes. 
Far" qff'frm Us turn Mtfery and Death. 
Deliver Us from a King giii'n iri thy Wrath. 
Comtfrom the faming Skies, ahdfh the Proud^ 
Before i'bee, the JDe^oyef Angel fnd'^ 
Conte with Tien ^houfand thunders arm^d, dndfrikt 
Their impims Hojl to Atoms in out" Fiewi 
Let Leaders, Troops^ and both the Kings eicpiri^ 
hlown off as Lea^s are fcatier^d by the Windi, 
Ani Let us. Holy CatholiekSf the t/dgM 
tfpM their bkfdif^ Corps fng Hymiis ^ Ptd^jii 



loo H E N R I A D E. 



Difcordy attentive, as flie roves in Air, 

Hears, and to Hell conveys his hideous Cries. 

From thofe dark Realms {he in an Inftant brings 

The crueirft Fiend that with thlnfcrnals dwck. 

He comes, Fanaticifm his Name abhor'd. 

Unnatural Offspring af Religion^ 

Arm'd to defend, but to deftroy her bent. 

The warming Bofom where He lay, he tears. 

In Rababy where the limpid Arnon flows, 99 

'Twas He, who guided Ammon% frantick Race, 

When from their Mother's Paps they Infants tor^ 

Their reeking Entrails from their Bodies rent. 

And offered them to Molocby their grim God, 

Fierceft and fouleft of the Pow'rs of Hell. 

yeptba\ rafli Vow He didkated. He plung'd 'co 

The Father's Dagger in the Daughter's Heart. 

^Twas He, who op'ning Cbalcas's '^i lewd Lips, 

By him demanded Ipbigenia's Death. 

Thy Forefts, France^ were long his Haunt, He there 

The 



H E N RIAD R. loi 

The fierce ^eutates ^^^ with thy Inccnfe fed, 
Canft thou thofe Holy Homicides forget. 
Thy DruidSy who to their detefted Gods 
The Blood of Men on pubid Altars pour'd. 
He from the Capitols fublimeft TowV, 
Cry'd to the Pagans, root the Chriftians out. 
Strike, cut them all to pieces 1^3, and at length, 
When Rome fubmitted to the Son of God, 
He from the ruin'd Capitol removed. 
And got into the Church, and Havock made. 
His Rage infufing into Chriftian Hearts* 
He Martyrs into Perfecutors turn'd. 
The Sectaries at London ^^^ He infpir'd. 
The Seekers^ MuggktonianSy Familijis^ 
Ranters^ Fifth Monarcbijii and Adamites, 
In Lisbon and Madrid *^ he lights thofe Fires, 
To Perfecution dear, which burn iht^Jews 
Doomed by the Prieft for keeping to the Faith 
To them by their Forefathers handed down* 
He varies his Difguifes, and in all 

H 3 The 



,03 HEN R I AD E. 

Thd Sacred Orngmepts of Pricfis aSfunles, 

Now, ip the Wardrobe of Et^rnjl Night, 
\it ji new Form to work new Mifchiefs takcs^ 
Jlis DreiTers, Artifice and Impudence, 
Put on hini Guife\ Look and Shape and Air» 
Thgt haughty Guife^ who &£bcd in bis Life 
As Mafter of his King, and Tyrant of the State, 
Who ftill is terrible in Death, who draws 
All Friitfce to Battles ftill, to Strife and Blood, 
A dreadful Helmet on his Head he wears, 
A I^ftggci'} ready df awn, is in his Hand j^ 
Gaping the Wounds that he received at BIms j 
Afr^ih, the crimfon Fountains feem to flow, 
Aecufe Valois, and cry aloud. Revenge. 
Tq Cfmmt in this ghaftly Plight He comes. 
When Sleep upon his Eyes his leadea Wand has \^\ 
Preaming amidft the cloyfter'd Drones h^ lay. 
A Watch was at his Door, Cabal^ Falfe Zeal^ 
An4 $¥^^rjiitiqn^ who with r?ady ffand 



H E N R I A D E, 103 

Threw it wide open to Fanaticifm. 

Enters the Mimick Guife and fpeaks in Tone 

Fierce and Majeftick thus, Th'Omnipotent 

Has heard in Heav'n thy pious Vows and Pray V. 

But fliall he ne'er have more than Pray'r and Vows ? 

Weak plaintive Worlhip, impotent and poor. 

Are thefe fit OiPrings for the Leaguers God? 

The Good thou afkt> He at thy Hand requires. 

If Juditb ^^ had to fiive her Country brought 

No Sacrifice to Heav'n but Pray'rs and Tears, 

To perifh in his Service had ihe fear'd^ 

Juditb had fcen BetbuSa's levelled Walls. 

Such are the fan<^ify'd Exploits thou oughtfl: ^ 

To imitate, and to th 'avenging PowVs 

Such is the Sacrifice (hou oughtft to bring. 

Deft thou not blufh to have fo long delayed ? 

Thou doft; run, flye, and confecrate thy Hand 

In Blood; revenge on an Unworthy King, 

Rome^ Part\ the Great Univcrfe, and Me. 

Theie Wounds Fahis by his Ai&fiins made i 

H 4 Punifli 



I04 HENRIADE, 

Punifli his Perfidy, and pierce his Heart 

As mine, devoted to the League^ was pierc'd. * 

Shrink not at an Aflaffin's horrid Name, 

In Thee 'tis Virtue, tho' twas Crime in Him. 

AH Things are lawful to revenge the Church, ^^ 

Murder's theji juft and authorized by Heav'n. 

What fay I ? Heav'n commands it, by my Voice ' 

He lets thee know, that he has chos'n thy Arm 

For his pwn Vengeance in the Tyrant's Death. 

Happy, if thou with Him coud'ft joyn Navarre^ 

If to deliver France from both the Kings 

Thou coud'ft— But 'tis not yet the Time, Bourbon 

Is yet to live a while, for other Hands, 

The God he perfecutes, that Work ordains. 

And gives the Glory of his Fall. Do Thou 

Fulfil the Purpofe of that jealous God> 

And from hi^ Hand by Mine this Gift receive. 

The Phantom braiidifli'd at thefe Words his Blade, 

By Hatred in infernal Water* fteep'd, 

lie put it into CIment's willing Hand, 

. 7 . Vaniih'd, 



H E N R I A D E. 105 

Vanifli'd, and downward funk again to HclL ' 

The young Reclufe too eafily deceived. 

Imagined he had Heav'ns Concerns in Truft, 

With Holy Awe the fatal Prefent kift. 

And on his Knees for God's Affiftance pray'd. 

Full of the Fiend, that had enflam'd his Ire, 

Devoutly, He for Parricide prepares. 

How apt is Error to mifguide Mankind, 

Their Confcience blind, and gain upon the Heart ? 

The Soul of Clement^ happy and at Eafe, 

Was with that Confidence infpir'd, which none 

But Saints, in Innocence confummate,know. 

His Rage tranquil, aiTumes the Face of Shame, 

Downward his Look j but when with Eyes up-lift, 

He to the Skies his impious Vows addrefe'd. 

Virtue auftere is on his Front impreft. 

His Frock conceals his Parricidal Steel. 

He goes; his Friends of his Intent informed, '^' 

Strew Flow'rs before him and perfume his Way. 

FviU Qf RefpeA^ condu£b biin to the Gates^ 

Kefs, 



io6 HENRIADK 

Blefe, counfcl and encourage his Defigtt. 
Already they inroU him with their Saints, 
And in the "Raman Fafii place his Name, «09 
Style him th'Avenger of afHifted France^ 
And worship him with Incenfe like a God. 
Le& ardent, left tranfported were at firft 
The Chriftians, Champions of their Fathers Faith, 
When to the Gibbet, to the Crofs or Fir^ 
Their Brethren they acccnnpany'd of old. 
Greedy of Death, aqd of the Martyrs Blifi 
They weeping ki&'d the Ground on ^ich they wstlkU 
Thus in our Eyes, (b voy weak is Man, 
Rafcals iox Saints and Worthies often pafs. ^^ 
True Zeal and ^Ifp we know not to difcem. 
Error her Heroes has, as well as Truth; 
Fanaticks oft and Chrii(ians moil: iincere • 
Have the fame Marks, and undiftinguiih'd (hew. 
Maynf, who^ quick Eye the lifflguen Modons watdiU 
Sees what is doing, feenuog not to fee. 
With paffive Cun»ng hci the Crime approve^ 

And 



H E N R I A D E. 107 

And reaps the Benefit without the Guilt. 

To the moft fiidious artfully he left 

The Care of managing the frantick Youth. 

While to the Gates the JUaguers led the Monk 

Add kept the Ferment of his Fury high« 

The Sixtsenj anxious in their guilty Pride, 

To Sciences Infernal have Recourfe^ 

As Medicu was wont in doubtful Times^ 

And, criminally curious, pradis'd Arts 

Chimerical and foul to learn her Fate. 

AU follow her Example, as in Modes 

The giddy People ever ape the Courts 

And iervilely their Vices imitate; 

Fond of the Marvellous, and Novelties, 

They deal in Spdls and Necromantick Charms^ 

Silence did in the Depth of Night ccmdud 

This lewd Afiembly to a Vault obfcure, 

Where in the Glimmer of a tnagick Lamp 

An Altar cm a Tomb erected flood. 

On this V^kis and Bwrhff^ Images, 

Like 



o8 H E N R 1 A D 







• t-'" 



Like Objefts of. their Outrage and their Fear 
Were plac'd, to Sacrilege accursed, expos'd ; 
And in their Hellifli MyftVies they confound 
The Names of Fiends with God's tremendous Name. 
A hundred Vafes on the Walls are feen. 
With Points of MurdVing Weapons fteep'd in Blood. 
Thus was this Temple furnifli'd, and the Prieft 
A HebreWy one of thofe profcrib'd by Heav'n 
In Wretched nefs to wander o'^r ih^ World, 
And bear their Miferies from Seas to Seas, 
Who with a Mafs of Rules and Rites antique 
Long in Pifperfion have all Nations fiU'd. 
The Leaguers croud about Him, and with Cries 
Like Bacchanals their Sacrifice begin. 
In Blood .they wafli their Parricidal Hands, 
And Valois Image on the Altar Stab. 
With greater Terror, and with greater Rage 
They pierce and trample Henry's under Foot, 
And Hell and Heav'n at once invoke to firm 
Their Vows, and with lifceWounds thofe Kings deftroyi 

Mean 



H E N R I A D E. 109 

Mean while to Blafphemy the Jem, 

Calls on th'Abyfs, the Skies, and Gi 

The Sprights malign, that trouble 

On Thunders, LJght'nings, and the 

Thus in Gelboa the mad Pitbomfs "« 

With Sacrifice th 'Infernal Gods appcas'd. 

When in the Prefence of a cruel King, 

The Prophet Samuels angry Ghoft £he rais'd. 

The lying Priefts in high Samaria >^% thus 

Op'd againft Judab their blafphemous Mouth. 

Th'inflexible jiteius thus at Rome ^^i ' 

Curft Crajfus in the Name of all the Gods, 

The Leaders of the League, the dire Sixteen 

His Magick Accents heard with deep Concern, 

And waited Anfwer ftom offended Heav'n, 

As if- to force him to unfold their Fate. 

He hears them, but to punifh only hears. 

For them the Laws of Nature intercepts. 

A hollow Sound remurmurs in the Cave, 

A thou£tnd Lightaings glitter in the Gloom; 



110 HE N R IAD E. 

And flafh in Night profound a frightful Day* 
Amidft the Fires victorious Henry (hincs 
With beamy Glories round his Royal Head^ 
Seated fublime on a Triumphal Car, 
A Scepter in his Hand, furc Sign of Sway. 
The Thunders bellow, and the Lighttings bkzd 
Again, and all the Cave's involved in Firej 
The Leaguers in Difmay and in Affright thtjew^ 
In Night their Crime and Terror feek to hide. 
Thefe Murmurs terrible, thrfe Thunders, Fires 
Declare Valois inevitably lolt 
By Him, who is in higheft Heav'n. enthroned, 
His Days are numbered, and all Hdp withdrawn* 
Impatient Death his promised Vidim waits^ 
And Heav'n to crufh Falm petmics a Crime^ 
Clement the King's Pavilion dauntlefi fteks, 
Enters, and Audience of his Prince demandi* 
He comes, he cries, by God Alnughty koL 
To reinftate his Sovereign in his AlghtSj 

And Secrets of Importance to reveal* 

Thtt* 



HENRI AD E. iir 

Thus faying. He's examin'd and obTerv'd, 
Sufpiclon from his Habit Fear begets. 
The faithful Servants of their Prmce in doubc 
Interrogate Him much, and much Content 
He gives by fair and full Reply to All. 
All credit his Difcourfe as Truth divine. 
The Courtiers introduce him to the King^^ 
The Monk not mov'd at his Afped, appears 
Humble and calm his iUr, He bends the Knee^ 
And eyes the Place, at Leifure virhere to ftrike* 
Falfliood, vrho has the Guidance of his Tongue^ 
Puts this perfidious Speech into his Moudi. 
Permit, Great Monarch, that my trembling Voice 
Be to that God addrefs'd by v^hom Kings reign. 
Permit, that from my Soul I praife the Pow'r 
That fhow'rs fuch Bleffings on your facred Headb 
Virtuous Vditier^ prudent VilUroi^ '»4 
To you, among your Foes, have kept their Faith. 
'Qarlai^ the Great Uarlaiy whofe fearlefs Zeal 

Still ftruck int« this faithleis People Dreac^ 

» Knows 



112 H E N R I A D E. 

Knows, whilfc in Prifon, to unite all Hearts, 
To fcrve their Sovereign, and confound the League, 
God, who rejeds the Mighty and the Wife, 
Oft fets the Poor and Weak upon his Work, 
And Me, mean Inftrument, was pleas'd to guide 
To that illuftrious Sage, from whom I learnt 
Secrets of high Importance to my Prince, 
And flew to tell him, as this Letter (hews^ 
By Harlai put into my faithful Hands, 
Which lowly I deliver into yours. 
Falois receives it eager, and with Laud 
Bleiles th'Eternal for this fudden Change. 
When fhall I to my Will, he faid, have PowV 
Thy Zeal and Services to recompence ? 
Thus fpeaking gracious, forth he held his Arxti^ 
The Monfter forth his hidden Weapon drew. 
And plung'd into his Royal Bread the Steel. 
Outflows the Blood, th' Attendants and the Guards 
In horrible Amazeoient and Surprize, 

Ruih ifl, and crowd abouc the bleeding King^ 

They 



H B N R I 4 D E. iij 

Tlwyiw^Pr tbfy pyr wd liftcdV ev'ry Arm 

To iacriiit;e th'AiIafivi> who with XyOQ{( 
Darmg an4 ^Q>^ tbeir Meoace$ difdains^ 
Proud of hi$ Parricide he meets their SwQrds^ 
And kneeling waits for Death, his wiih'd Reward* 
Martyr for France smd Rome he thiqks hit die&» 
Anii fei}9 Heav'n qp^, and the flarry Seat 
Prepared to. ^rqn^ him with Celcftial PowVfi^ 
Bleffing the Haqd^ that wound Hioi^ a$ h^ Ue^. 
In Joy, or r«her Rapture be expires. 
Dreadful P(^iji(ion I 3Iindnefs terrible i 

* 

At once it Hprror ^od Compf£ion mQves* 
Perhaps lefs gwUty of his Sovereign's Death 
Thatt tbdie h^fc Dpftors "T, Traytpr? tP th?ir Kingi 
Whole Le0Qns potfoa'd his diftemper'd Mjip^j 
And turned thf! ttia»hUng Head of a |^qiui» 
Vdm j|Irfi«3iy, PR i\» Verge of Life, 
DarWipg Htf ^9?, «mI faint his fajlir^ Vi^ic^ 
His CouiTU«:5 c«d9 JJim, d|ffolv'd in TiRjrs, 

WbilQ ««di Jhls iiitur« Fortune bus at Hc«ut> 



.114 HENRIADE. 

Various their Schemes, but their Laments the fkme: 
The fame their Sorrows, or fincere or feigti'd. 
Thofe, that arc flattered by their Hope of Change^ 
But lightly for their Matter's Danger grieve. 
Thofe^ that are of their Interefts afraid^ 
Pretend the King, but mourn their Fortune paft 
Among their Clamours, and their Plaints confus'd 
Tears, unafFeded, flow from Ifoiry Eyes. 
Valoh had been his Enemy, but Souls, 
As fenflble as Great, are mov'd with Eafe, 
And melt in Junctures, horrible like this. 
BtmrboTiy whofe IntVeft gave to Pity Place, 
Remembered only He was once a I^rietid, 
And hiding from Himfclf the Thought, that Death 
PlacU Valois Crown upon his Head, gricv*d on. 
The King his dying Eyes towards him caft^ 
And joining Hand with his vi^orioufr Hands^ 
Befpoke htm thus. Refrain thefe GenVoiis Tears, 
Let an onworthy World lament your King. 
Fight, Bourhn, Reign, Revenge Me on Our Fb« } 



1 



HRNRIADE, 115 

I die^ and leave you in the midfl of Storms, 
On a Rock feated cover'd with my Wrecks, 

My Throne expefts you 'Tis your Due, enjoy 

The Good fo well defended by your Arms. 
But think, that Thunder ftill furrounds a Throne, 
The God who gives it fear, and may you know 
That God to worfliip in the Way he wills. 
And with religious Hands his Shrines rebuild. 
Adieu, Reign happy, and be Heav*n your Guard. 
Heaven from th*Aflafiin's Sword defend your Heart: 
You know the League^ you fee thefe ebbing Veins, 
By Me the Murd'rers mean to come at You. 
The Time may be when a more barbVous Hand 
Spare fuch uncommon Virtue, Righteous Heav'n ! 

Permit He faid. Death hung upon his Words, 

And clos'd his qulvVing Lips and fliffning Eyes . 
Sightlefey and fiient in eternal Night. 



At P^m, when their Sov'reign's Death was known. 
The League^ to guilty Joy abandoned, fill 

I X With 



ii6 H E N R I A D E, 

With Shouts of V'vStoxy the troubled Air. 
The Shops are ftiut, the Fanes polluted op'd. 
And Wreaths of Flow'rs bedeck their giddy Heads, 
While to caroufe they dedicate the Day. 
Thus madding, for themfclves they dig th'Abyfs, 
In whofe dark Womb they will be foon abforpc 
Forefeebg future Ills, if fuch Forefight 
Had been their Lot, inftead of Songs of Joy, 
In Bitternefs of Grief they wou'd have groan'd. 
The Conq'ror Prince, the Hero they defy. 
Henry comes thund'ring on them from the Throiie, 
More dreaded by the Scepter in his Hand, 

• • • 

And Ruin unavoidable's denounc'd 

To thefe Rebellious in Rebellion found. 

The Chiefs have all to Bourbon bov«r'd the Knec^ 

And own'd him as their lawful King, fecure 

Of Conqucft, when he guides the War, they fw«af 

To follow him in Arms to bodi the Poles. 

HEN' 



H E N R I A D E. 
CANTO VI, 

ARGUMENT. 

the Duke de Mayne holds an j^embly of the States at 
Paris againfl Henry IV. The PrefiJeta Potier'j 
Speech for Him, and againfttbe Priefis. Henry ad~ 
vances with his Army nearer Paris. The State's 
breaking up^ Henry attacks the Rampiers and beats 
tbe Leaguers. ElTex and Aumale engage. As Henry 
gives tbe Word for Pltmder St. Lewis appears to Htm. 
His Speech to refirain Ins Fury. Heaty's Reply. 
He follows tbe Ftfion to Vinccnncs. 

SAGE as facred as antique in France^ 
Impow'rs the People, when the Throne 

is void. 
In Heirs deficient, when the Royal 
Blood, 

I 3 Pry 'J 



ii8 HEtTRIADE. 

Dry'd up in its laft Channel, flows no more, 
Tochoofc a Matter, and to Change their Laws. 
The States affemble, and the Voice of France 
There names a Sovereign, and confines his PowV. »^ 
Thus plac'd our Anceftors by high Decrees 
The Capets on the Throne of Charlemagne. "7 



The League audacious, reftlefs, blind, prefum*d 
To fummon this Aflembly once auguft. 
As if Aflaflination gave them Right 
To choofe a Mafter, and to change the State. 
They thought th'jmaginary Name of King 
Wou'd baffle Bourbon^ and deceive the Croud. 
They thought a Monarch wou'd unite their Schemes* 
That facred Name give Sandlion to their Claims, 
And, tho' unjuftly chos'n, the very Choice 
Wou'd ftrengthen them, and whether wrong orright, 
A Maftei; they 91 leaft (hould give to France. ; 

Strait from all Quarters with tumultuous Noife 
The.Chiefe, to form this mix'd Aflembly, meet 

' Thpfe , 



I ) 



HE N R IAD E. 119 

Tboiie yibx& weak Minds had been feduc'd by Pride, 

i^did made obdurate by continued Crifnes. 

The Lorrains^ the Nemours^ the raging Priefts, 

Th'Arobrfffadoi' of Rme, and He oi Spain, "« 

All to the Lwvre ifta^ch, and by new Choice 

Me^in to infult the Manes of their Kings. 

Proud Luxury of Publick Misery born,*- ^ 

Pompous th^ , States Chimerical prepares. 

No Princes chei e, no puiflant Lords appear, 

Augufl Succei^rP of our Peers antique. 

Who near thif tThrone are feated, and by Birth 

Are Arbiters^of Right and Wrong in France, 

And have th^ApFpcarance ftill, but pot the Pow n 

No Deputies iiie there, difcre^t apd bold. 

Our poor Reiflains <rf Freedooi to defend. ^'9 

The Lillies hdVe ti^t there^ their wonted Look, 

The Lx^i^rii fKgbted with this Foreign Pomp. 

^Jme\ N»tKia ift^ a Seat fublime is plac'd 

Near Mayne^^^y Q*^r whoin a Canopy depends. 

And onthis CatPQpy fupeib ipfcrib'd 

I 4 Thefc 



Uo HENRI AD E, 

fhefe dfe&diul and chejfe daring W«t^ W«f« feadt ^ 
*< You Kings, ^h6 rule the Wdi-id> tiirhdfe giili^ 



** Hancte . • i ••. ;. -j-Xi 

<* Date ev'ry tliifig aitethpc ttA NeKhittg l^n, ' 
*' Learn h<i tb6 Death c^ Valm^ fefow to teiga. 

« 

They meet, the Patties^ aftd CaJbtilfc begin, ' 

Debate, and ii6 ^hey varioQs V<3tces &pldey 
The Room With their infertid Cries reftumb. ^ 
Blinded by Errt* All, but One a SUv*> 
To favour his ambitioiufi Hopes i^iKft^^MNtr, 
The Legate only courts in his Hiirai^gseii, ' 
And, Traytor to Mankind, declares '<mTime 
The Lillies (hou-d to the ^mra »» yield. 
*Tis time that fell »» Triboftal c5 «iie^ • 
With Blood befefiicttr'd, iti P*«*i i».ltt ^kt^ 
That ^ionuAttUt aecei^j'd of ItekiA P«wV, 
Abhorr'd by the Whbfe aietoiblifig; Wftimtfe, 

Difhonour to ^(jfe Akars diey itveflgr; 
Funii&'d^ith Fires, and co|>!^(«(tNr;SVvOtdg 

Mortals 



V ■••-'.» '^ 



i 
KB N R I AD E, in 

Mortals to maflaCfiB by pious Priefts. 
As If in thofc decdled Timai wc liv'd^ 
When the WofiU iMrflnpp'd uaideatiog Gcd^ 
Whofe lyi^toPrapfaecB^ a Fdaulef^v ppeaoh'id 

* 

They placable^by ttood of Mg^ bectama 
Another, by Ueriau Odd de^uch'd, 
WoaVl'^ vyJPi^Hpi whom he hated, fratia. 
But theinixftr[^ow'rfbl Party ^f«r« rdblv'i^ ' 

/ 

And M/^ftu upoo the Cafefs Tluroae bad jpla^U 
Thac Raak fiw coif mntiqg to his Pqw'c, 
A Rank, ifiir^Otftd: o£ h^f^ctet, V0W9, 

- I i 

Abready in hS^, ]^eait had be dfsvour^d 

The dang'roiir^lIawMir, andid^ NaioeHof If^iog. 



f r 



*u^lb^ uf^' ao4 to kt hMrd ripayigdt; 
BMh fclenlo JKkQCA hdd at hk AJpeO. ^ 
Among thefe 'Pe0^b^ rQ«fi^«s)f aad iB^ble, 

Po^ ^tre»:^lKr.Jiift9.)aQ4]rtf fevor'4; 

Oft did his manl/ £|o<|u«iice f^revail 
O'er tbrliot^tioiw iPai7 pf the <MC%gii|«. 



His 






''" 



122 H E N R I AD B. 

His dd Authority he ftill maintain^,' vie : 
And Jufticc widi Impunity cjepkinkl. - 
I fee, fiid he, you to the Rank fupreni*^ 
Have deftin'd Mayne-^ your Error I cohilelr^ 
And I myfelf excufe, for he has WorA 
To all our Wiflics equal : Hid I Ri^t^ 
To choofe a Sovereign, Mayne (hould ht toy 
But we have Laws, arid' that moft worftiyPrifice, 

As foon as to the Scepter he pret^ds^ ',- ^ 

* • • 

Becomes unworthy— As 2ie fpeaks thefe WSwds 

Mayne enters «with th-Appeatance-^of a iQng. - 

HimPo/w, with unal'ifcr'a Look, bcliohfe,-- 

Yes, Princei continues 'hej-^nrftcady^tbn*^ ' 

So highly I efteem you, that I dare 

Agatnfl; you in this daiig-rouii Qufe^<Stei^t 

For France^ and for ouHeI?es.IWha^^Right'haveJwe 

To choofe aMa(lcr,'hwi<-<WMiot'jp(»««5^?'j 

God plac'd you fay your fiit-vfa i fo 'nc^r^cfa&^rohc, • 

Not to ufurp it, Sir, %lft'-•t<s^4efcdd..^ ;.rn eJiI I ., 

Guife^ who's no moKi has nothing 'tb^pMtinL' -• 

A 



HENRI AD E. 123 

A SovVcign's Blood's fufficicnt for his Duft. 

If by a Crime he dy*d, he's by a Crime revengU 

Change you^as Heav'n has chang'd the State d France. 

Let your juft Anger pcrifli with Vahis. 

Your Brother's Blood was not by Bmrhn fpilt. 

Juft Heav'n, by whom you both are favoured, formed 

You Both too virraous to be Enemies. 

But Murmurings I hear, and Clamours loud. 
The frightful Names of Heretick^ Jtelapfe. 

I fee our Priefts with Zeal impure inflam'd^ 

The Dagger drawn Ye Wretches hold your Hands, 

What Law, what Precedent, or rather Rage 

Can, as you wickedly aflert, difcharge 

Your Duty to th'Anointed of. the Lord ? 

Son of Sc. Lewis >^3, perjur'd does he come 

Thofe Altars to demolifh at whofe Feet 

He begs to be illumin'd of our God ? 

He loves, he keeps thofe Laws yourfelves renounce ; 

Virtue, where'er he finds it. He refpefts. 

And ev'n that Worihip you yourfblves abufe. 

•• • . • 

He 



114 H E N RI AD E. 

I 
I 

He to th'AlAighty leaves, vrho (brch^s Hearts, 
The Pitni(hmem of Men, which you ufurp. 
And wlQ be more your Father t]^ your King, 
As he's a better Chriftian than yourfelves^ 
Still ready to forgivei With him all's free. 
And fliajl he only not be fo ? By what 
Auth rity wou'd you ydur Mafter judge ? 
You, faitMeia Paftorx, traiterpus Citi^Kns, 
In what hal^ you the likeness of tboTp Saints, 
Thofe Chri^na f^rimgi^e, who j^'er did bow 
The Knee to Goda of Metal, and of Mud? ^^ 
Yet wirhoot Murmuring, Kings who did, obey'd^ 
And without blaming them oo fiodSfotda bled, 
Blefiing their Bmchers wjdi their lateft fireath. 
I'hey only were true Chriftians, Qone but they 
I own as fuch, they lor their SoT'ixigaa dy'd» 
You murder them, and if the God you paint 
As jealous and implacable, ddigfats 
In Vengeance, He'll avenge himfelf on you. 
Barbarians \ At this bol(| Pifcoudfi n while 

7 They 



H E N R 1 AD E. 125 

They all were bufli'd^ confcundedj and abafii'd. 

His Argument and Eloquence^ fa flroiig. 

In vain they ftrive to ftruggle with the Truth, 

And ward againft its Wounds, their Hearca dnragVi 

Were agitated by Defpair and Fear« 

When, on a fudden, in Confufiofl mix'd 

■ 

A thoufand Voices rend the vaulted Skies« 
Arm, Citizens, To Arms, or weVe all loft. 
Thick Clouds of Duft o'er Henrfs Squadrons rife^ 
And darken, as they nearer draw^ the Day. 
The dreadful Sound of Trumpets, and of DrumSi 
Dire Harbingers of Deaths denounces Storm* 
As from the North outragious Tempefts break 
Thro' C^ves of craggy Rocks, and Whirlwinds raift. 
Which upwards bear the Duft on rattling Wings, 
And thickning into Clouds obfcure the Skies, 
Thunder before, behind them Lighming flies. 
And fpread their Terrors o*r the cremUing World. 
So BauriM's Army breaks from hatfed Reft^ 
Burning with Thirft of Vengeance on the Leaguf^ 



126 H E N R I A D E, 

From Ur thdr formidable Shouts are heard, 
Thejr fill the Field, and towVds the City march. 

Senry tfaofe ufeful Moments did not wafte 
In rendriog wonted Honours to the Corpfc 
Of the late King, an Homage vain the Pride 
And Folly of the Living pay the Dead. 
He took not on Him in a Time of Woe 
The Pomp of rich Maufoleums to prepare. 
Vain Effort of the Great, in fpite of Fate 
Or Wafter Time to triumph over Death. 
Bourbon to Vabis^ in his dark Abode 
Tributes more worthy of his Shade will fend. 
He'll punifh his Affaffins, rou^ his Foes, 
And when his Rebel Subjeds are reduced. 
He'll make them happy in an equal Sway. 

A fudden Rumour of Affiiuk diftrads 
The Council of the League^ in hafte they rife: 
Mtiyne in an Inftant to the Rampiers runs. 



3 



As 



HE N R I AD E. 127 

As foon tli^ Bdldifers to his Standard fly. 

And with loud Cries, th'advaacing Hero brave. 

Airs ready fc» Attack, aiid for Defence. 

Paris was ndc in chofe tumultuous Times, 

Such as iht French^ too happy, fee it noW« 

A hundred Forts by Fear and Fury built 

Confin'd heir Compafs, then of le& Extent 

Thofe Suburbs, fo magnificent and great. 

Held always- open by the Hand of Peace, 

Proud Av'nues to a Ci^ now immenle. 

Where now a hundred golden Palaces 

Uplift their glitx'ring Domes ^bove the Clouds, 

Hemm'd in with Rampiers were long Hamlets, then. 

From P/^/V parted by 4l Fajfe profound. 

Bourbon determined, at hi« Army's Head, 

Makes his Approach on the Levantine Sid^ 

Death flies before him, and in either Hoft 

DeftruiQioii' de^Is inlrdn charg'd with Flrei 

By Hands of ^e Bdfiegers and Befi^'d. 

< 

Their JUmpiers menaciDg, their Tow'rs and Works 

FaU 



128 H EN RI AD E. 

FaU at the Burft of BomMt faoroifigiGaofacs. 
Batallions brdcen and in Roue jire (eea. '..■< 
Far in the Fields the fcacHa'd Squadrons ilye. 
Nothing can fland the Serj Teinpeft^. Shock* 
And BourM» Troops and Maynit with Lightning 

fight. 
Mortab in Slai^hter were !efi {kiU'd of:oU» 
And \tk was then the Furniture of Wai*. . 
The Sword was then fufficieiic i&t their Ryge. 
Their cruel Sons with execrable Art 
Now rob the flamii^ Skies, and Aiog th^r Fires. 
The grumbling of thofe frightful Bombftishe^rd, 
Children deteftable of Btkkk Broils, ^ 
Sulphur prepar'd, and cram'did BsUsof %nl&% 
Divides, heats, fires, and on a fudden tsuii^ . 
Death in a thouiand Flafhes fwious flics. 
Still widi more Art, and more Barbftrigr* 
Have Mortals learnt in Cavw profound iN^ lay 
Fires Subterranean with a Toildk to btii^. 

Fearlefs the Soldier treads the &tifale(« Groyi)d>. 

And 



HENRI AD E. 129 

And o'er the Deaths conceal'd to Carnage runs. 
Ope in an Inftant break the fulph'rous Caves, 
And Clouds of fetid Smoke involve the Skies, 

Squadrons entire are toft up into Air, 

♦ » > • 

And dropping in the gaping Earth ingulph'd. 
Such are the Perils glorious Bmrbm tempts. 
And fijch the Steps by which he mounts the Throne. 
His Warriours, like Himfelf, thefe Storms difdain. 

Hell under Foot, and Lightning o'er their Head. 

« • 

But Glory perches on the Royal Plume, 

On Her they look, and march without Difinay. 

Momay '^, among thefe rapid Floods of Flame, 

Grave, but intrepid, mingles with the War, 

Incapable of Fury and of Fear,- — 

Deaf to the Roar of Cannon and 6f Bombs, 

And calm amidft the Tempeft of the Fight. 

He looks on Battles with a Stoick's Eye, ' 

As necefl&ry Flails of wrathful SUes, 

: Like a Philofopher, where Honour guides 

, He marches, and condemning Fights, avoids 

' K No 



I30 H E N R I A D E. 

No Danger^ pities Henry and attends. 

And now the dreadful Govert-Way they reach. 

Defended by a Giacis fLain'd with Hood: 

Here Peril animates afreih their Toils. 

The Fop with Fafcin$» and die Dead ^y^ fiU« 

They march o'er bleeding Corpiby and gaining GroQfid 

By Sword and Fire alternate mount the ^«ach i 

Henry was firft, a Bockler o'er his Blteaft^ 

And in his conqVuig.Hand a bloody Blade, 

His Standard's, wbcrq the Leaguers ftoody diiplay'd. 

And on the Rampier's Height bis LilKes wavc» 

The Rebels, in Amazement and Affright 

Seem to refpe^t th^ir Conq'ror ^pd their Kiing» 

And on the Walls give Way. J^vc li^iu veviir^s 

Their fainting Spirit?, a^di by Wpni, and PeftJ 

That Flam^ which to Bjebelliou vroiRgbc lihwr Rxge 

Rekindles, and. r^CfiUs. Uj«0P to tb»ir CfilftQ^ 
Strait on all Sides, tjij^ir Qrm QatsiUiqoB profs 
The King's, whffCs U>Qk th«y bftye qoc Heart to bear. 
DifcorJ, yah^.^n (he Rampi^ gw4cs Mr $008, . 
./; .:« Bathes 



1 



H E N R I A D E. 131 

Bathes iii ^c Blood that in her Caufe they fpill, 

Pleas'd^. v^hkn in Combat dofe the Parties join» 

And ev '17 Stroke tliey ftrike \& furer Death. 

Now xseoie the Thunders, that from brazen Mouthi 

Bellow'd aiiidih^ and terrify'd the World. 

A iavage Silence, Child of Fury reigns. 

And Slaughter domiy around the Rampiers ftrides. 

With defp'iate Hands, and Eyes that flattie with Ire; 

Each cnoWes^ throT deepen'd Piles of Foes fek Way, 

They takr, retake, th^ win, andloi^ by Turnd 

The Works, the bloody Theatrs of Deaih*^ 

Uncertain Yi&ty in her fatat Hands, 

StiUnear theLSlies holds th« Banner of Lottolrii. 

Th'Affiiilants every where iurpriz'd, repols*d. 

Again prefs ibrwacdy and t|dir Oround regain, 

Vidon and Tanqodfli'd thr^/ dffc^ttbtfut Day. 

Thus CX:ean in an ^biftant drW*n by Storms,- 

Breaks p^er tits Battles, and bts^rkwards roUs^ hii Wmres; 

Nc er was this Kingy Eis Riwtt ne'er fo gfea^,* ^ 

As in this t«-^ibW A&u)<-s tlSfybotk 

• K 2 Firm 



J32 H E N R I A D E, 

Firm in the midft of Slaughter and of BloCd 

Were Matters of their Reafon- and their Wrath. 

Both counfell'd, order'd, aded, cv'ry wher? 

Both had their Eyes, and guided with a Glanoff 

The fatal Movements of that dreadful Da^^. 

The formidaye Band of E«|f/(/£ Aids 

Was led by valiaflt E^x to the Storm. 

This the firft Tone a Band of J&^/^ fought 

Under French Banners, ft range to them it feeoocd 

In our once Hoftile Fields to fcrve pur K^gs. 

They come.their Country's H<Miour to maintaio. 

Of Battle proud, . and laviih of their Lives, 

On the fame Rampiers, aiid thofe Plains, where ooce 

The 5«W beheld their Anceftors enthroa'd. *»* 

EJfex meets Aumale fighting at the Breach, 

They both Were gallant^ young, and full of Fire, 

Such as the Poets paint tht^ Demigods. 

Forward their bleeding Friends about them prefi» 

French^ EngU/h^ Lorainers^ by Fury joined, . 

Pcrifti in Fight prpmifcuo»s on, the Worfes^ 

Advance 



H E NR I A D E. 133 

Adtrance together, Combat, Pight and Dye. 
TlioU) Angel, who their Rage and Arms doft guide. 
Thou, the Deftroyer Angel, Soul of War, 
Say^ on what Side thou art chyielf engag'd. 
To which the Sky's Eternal Scale inclines. 
Bmrhn^ Mayne^ Effex^ and his Rival long 
Befi^ers and Befieg'd an equal Carnage make. 
At length the jufter Side prevails ; Bourbm 
Vidorious on the Rampiers nrawes bis Way. 
The Leaguers tir'd, no more Refifiance make. 
But quit the Walls, and in ConfuiSon fall. 
Thus from the Pyrenean oft we fee '^9 
A Torrent rolling down the fteepy Clifcs, 
Threaten the Nymphs and Naiads of the Vales. 
A hundred Mounds oppofe the furious Flood, 
And bear a while the loud impetuous Shock. 
But fooQ the feeble Barrier's overwhelmed. 
And rothful Inundation waftes the Plains. 
Noife, Death and Terror ride upon the Wares^ 
^P*R)otiog as they roll the tow'ring Oaks 



134 HENRI AD E. 

Which braved thcWintcr-Storms,tnd toucVd the Skies, 

Huge Rocks they from the Side of Mountains ren4 

And flying Herds with hideous Roar fuiriue. 

Thus Henry with precipitate Defcent 

The fnioaking Walls that he had n^if^r'd qu^Hf* 

Thus thund'ring on the Fugitives h^ driv^t^ 

And opes his PaiTage to the guarded G^^%. 

iFaft the Sixteen before th' Avenger fly 

Straggling, confounded and difpers'd by pear. 

At length within the City Mayne^x^xr^^i^^ 

Abandoning the Suburbs to Boufrbqn^ 

* 
The ConqVors rove with Torch^ in th^ir Jfefld* 

From Place to Place, their ValoUr turu'd to Rjigtf, 
And give themfelves. to pillage aod to fi)oU, 
This Henry fees not, but by Veng^Wfii! wing'4 
Purfues the routed Rebels to their Q^x^ 
Conqueil inflames, and Courage d»v^ hifflL qb. 
Come, Fellow-Soldiers, tnouoc thft Walla, hi Cfica, 
And carry Sword and Fire where'er yoo oomc* 
While thus he ipesks, a fining Vi^n brdb» 

From 




H E N R I A D E, 135 

From put a Cloud, Majeftick was u$ Form, 

Defcending on thfe Wings of gentle Winds, 

It ftopt yfhttzBmrbm ftood, like Rays of Light, 

Upon its Ffx)nt iitamortal Beauties (hone. 

An Angel it confefe'd, or Saint of Heaven, 

His Eyes at once of L(S^ and Horror full. 

Hold, too unhappy Ctinq'ror, HoM thy Hand, 

He i^ys, what is it thou Wou^dflgive to Fire A^ 

And Sword ? What is it but thlnhcritance l^^ 

Of thy great AnceftorS^ a Huftdi;ed Kirtgs? .'"^ 

Is not the Country fhdu wou'dft wdfte, thy o^Vn ? 

Are not the People thou woudd flaughter mine^ 

And thine the Trcafures, that to Spoil are giv'n? 

Haft thou not bid to cut thy Subjeds Throats ? 

> 

Hold At thefe Words more terrible than Claps ' 

Of Thunder, Fear the Soldiers Hearts pofleft, 

Proftrate they fell^ and left the promised Sack. 

I* 

Henry di that Hef otck Ardor fuU ■ 

Which heated him in Fight, and heats him fl91» 

« • 

Like Ocidn calmingi grumbles as he calms. ' ' 

TlxoU.Dwcllcr of the World invifible, . 

JC4 The 



136 H E N R I A D E, 

The King reply'd, why com'ft thou hither, % 
Didft thou from Hell's Eternal Night arifc? 
Or from Eternal Day in Heav'n dcfcend? 
What Mcflagc bring'ft thou? What have I to do? 
Am I to worfhip thee or to abhor ? 
Art thou my evil Genius, or my Good > 
Thus faying, he thefc tender Accents heard. 
Thou fccft that happy King whom France rever'd, 
Lewis, who fought like tfcee in Days of Yore. 

« 

That Lewisy whofe Religion thou haft left, 

ThAt Lewis, who compaffionates, admires. 

And loves thee ; God will guide thee to thy Throne; ' 

And ConqVor flialt thou enter Paris. Heav'n 

My Son, wUl give my Crown, which now is thine, 

Not to thy Courage but thy Clemency, . 

Tis God who teUs thee this, 'tis God who fcntmc 

The Hero at thcfe Words flicd Tears of Joy, 

Soft Peace, all Wrath cxtinguifli'd in his Breaftv 

He wept, he figh'd, he fell upon his Knees, 

Ador*d the Vifionj faia wou'd have etohrac'd. 

Thrice 



H E N R I A D E. 137 

Thrice to the (acred Shade he holds his Arms, 
And dirice his Father his Embrace UludeSj 
Like a light Cloud, that's (catter'd by the Winds. 
Mean time at Night's Approach the Hero quits 
The Place, and follows Jaewis to Vincenaet. ^y> 
Thither the Vifion hies, his ancient Haun^ 
'Where in tAA Times beneath a branching Oak 
Lewis to diftate his juft Laws was wont. 
How chang'd Vincenms from what ihe was of old! 
Now a detcAed Dungeon, Jail of State, 
Where Minifters, and mighty Men, when fiript 
Of Pow'r, in Dearth and Darknefs arc immur'd : 
The Great, who in the midft of Tempefts live. 
At Court, Oppre&rs and Oppreft by Turns, 
Are proud and humble, fupple and fever^ 
By turns the Feof^** Horror and chdr Lore. 



BBN' 



H E N R I A D E. 
CANTO VII. 



ARGUMENT. 
Henry fM int» a dtef Slap in tie Ftnjl cf Vm- 
cennes. St. Lewis appean tc bim in a Dream^ 
Jpi"!" of bt! Cmvir^on, carriis him up to Htiaen. 
They torn to tie Place inbaiitej iy diparlei Smb. 
A Di/iourfe of various Religions and Safety in them 
all. Henry, Am a View of Hell, and of the Regim 
of Blifs. He arrives at the Palace of the DeftuiicS) 
and isjhewn the Kings and Princes, that are topC' 
ceed bim. The Cbataam ofLevrit XUL tewisXIV. 
Richlieu, Mazarine, Prince of, Coode, Torennt, 
CatiMC, Loxembufgli. St. Lcwis'i Speech to Car- 
dinal Fleury, not to engine in Wars. St. Liwis 
anxious aiout the SpmiOi Succefim. The late Duit 
of Otlciia'tClaraSer. 

OD ill his Gocxlnefs iniinice to Man, 
Tlic ftv'rite Worlc of his Almighty 

Hands, 
To finooih the rugged Paths of our 
fliort Life, 
■"• Two 



HENRI AD E, 139 

Two Beings plac'd beneficent q6 Earth, 

Sweet Sleep and Fl^tc'r log Hope ^aej^e^ds his Wings 

Of Dow^, and one his gbldcQ PIuomk o'er Care^ 

And pour$:,e9t Treaiares in the mtdft of Waat., 

Sleep lulls ^ili^iofi tO Repoft, and Hope 

Supports our Spmt$, and Our Wiih confirms. 

Lewh to Bourbon calls jtbis j^thfolP^irj 

Sleep heacd his YoicCj and from his ftcrec BowV 

Soft marches (o Vinc€im^% reffdlhing Shades* 

The Winds at his Approach their Whiip'riogsceafe, 

And happy Preaois coiM after led by Ho{)e« 

They hover ofer the Pri&ce, arid on his Head 

Olive and Laurel mistt wish Poppy place. 

Lewis then tikes the Captfs Royal Crowny 

And pOti it on vi£)x)rioiis SkMryts BrovR. 

Reign^ conquer, and ah all lliings be my SoSt 

He faid ; my Race no Hope has^ kfi: but theei. 

Oh Bouriott^ do not think a CrcnrnenoB^ 

My Empire is xhe kaft o£ aUL nigr Gifife» 

To be a Hero^ ConqVor^ and a King 



140 H E N R 1 A D E. 

Is nothing, if to Truth thou ftill art blind 
If! Heav'n illuoiines »ot thy Mind, a Throne 
And all thofe Honours are but barren Goods, 
The fragil Recompenceof Worth humane. 
By Care accompany'd, by Death deftroy*d, 
A tranfient Greatnefi, perilous and faUe. 
Empire more durable I come to (hew. 
Much lefs to recompenie thee, than infthift 
Follow, obey me, and by Ways unknown 

Afeend to the moft High, learn of Himielf 
Thy Deftiny, my Son. He iaid, and Both 
Mount in a Car of Light, and fwift as Thought 
Traverfe th'^herial Wafte and reach the Skies. 
Thus glaring Light'nings in a ftormy Night 
Cleave the thick Air, and flye from Pole to Pole. 
Thus on the Banks of Jordan'^ frighted Flood 
Edijab >3< in a flaming Cloud involved. 
Was rapt from his Difciple's wond'tii^ Lool^ 
And in a fiery Chariot bom to Heav'n, 



AOMOg 



HE N RI A D E. 141 

Among the .Worlds; '32, which with a plenteous 
Hand 
Th'Etcmai firft at the Creation fram'd, 
niuftrjous in the. higheft Heav'n .was raisU 
A Globe not vifible.to Sight, profane. 
In his. own Likenefs there th' Almighty > formed 
Immortal Spirits of his Eflence pure. 
Theie o'er his new created Worlds difpers'd. 
Did Bodies animate in ev'ry Globe. 
And thus the peopled Univerfe began. 
Thither our Souls, as thence they came, rettim. 
When from the Prifon of the Fleflx they're freed. 
By God, who made and fent them, when recali'd, ^ 
Thither again with rapid Wing they flye. 
As in wild Forefts from the Tops of C^s 
Leaves £ided fiiU away with Noife confus'd. 
When, Harbii^QT of Winter, Boreas blows. 
Brings back the Cold,. and whifties in the Sky> 
So daily to that; ISanpyrean^ Death 
Innumerable Flights of Souls reibres. 
' * 7 There 






142 H E N R I A D E. 

There rules a Judge ufMright with equal Lawd, 

Kings at his Feet, and Nations wait their Dooa& 

This is the Being infinite we ferv^ 

This He, whom, tho*. w« know not, we adorn 

A diffVent Name in diifrent Worlds he bedrs, ' ■ 

Thron d in Effulgence lugh, hs hears our Cries, 

Widi Pity ices Us wisod'ring from the f irtiif b, 

And in a Lafajtiinth of Errors )o^ 

Our pious Follies be with Pity fites, 

The Pidures which our Ignorance iinv^n 
To repreient bis Wiidom infinite. 

Death, at his Feet, to his Tribunal brings < 
Indians KAl!urkSy.^t. Jew 9Jad^^i^Chmefi, ■ 
The Mufti 1a ^mazienient rolls around 
His greedy Eye Jtx Eaqwftaiiaa rain,. 
At God's Higibx Ha0d to fee his Prophee throa'd. 
The BrtKbrnoA with his neagre tuywif£iiA l,kibl(r. 
Vaunts ■ o£ \m Vows and painfiil Fenkoioe/ r 
Their Penitence, their Vows, die&r %aoftince. 

Faith, with«i£&ewaid^ 4gr JRtpIflbiittiiR • 

God 



H E N R I A D E. 143 

God for not feemgy will fioc puaKh diofe 
From whfim Jbun&lf fo £ur the Light has fbc'd: 
He will not, like a crud Mafter, Judgp 
Offending Souls by Law% they^ never knew. 
By Chriflian Law$ of which they never hoard. 
Nor by Fanatick Zeal^ nor Holy Rage, 
But the plain Lafv, thdt ifefjcs in ev'ry Heart. 
Nature, his Daughter apd our Mother, guide«» 
Enlightens us,^ and teaches * ys his N^unc^ 
The Virtues, in our Mind infti^ift, flie liiQVcSi 

% 

And learns us in our earlieft Yoars |o blu0). 

* 

Pure in our Infancy,^ in ^^ deprav^'d, 
She for her Children weep^ . who kopw hftriMt^ 
She weeps, and what we dp not hpar, 'hci;Ciw» 'i 
Will rife againft us in, the ^ay of Peaib. .; 



• • • / 






But harkl Ikpinwhsnge, Qreac Qed, ^^ hoiril' 
Thofe Floods of fi!i%)iI;fQ9i)frSi|K>]^^ imi^l^A^BimA 

And 



144 HE N R I A D E. 

Andah) what fiery' Gotphv beneath nie gape ? 
To Him. the Saint: The. Greir Abyfi you (ee 
By Juftice dug's inhabitcid by 'Crime ; 
Come foUovir Me» the' Ways are ever ope. 
So faying^ -co the Gates of Hell they caniie. 
There gloomy Eiivy lay with Look afkance 
And timid, pouring Poifon from her Lips, 
On Laurels, and on all the' Pomps of Life; 
Light wounds her Eyes/ ihat fparlde in the dark* 
She loves die Dead, as ihe the Living hates. 
Sees Henry i turns her Head afide, and figh» 
Near her -felf-loving, felf-admiring Pride 
And Weakneis, with down Loc& and Viiage wan, 
Wbo ruins Virtue, and to Vice gives Way; 
Ambition bloody, reftlefi, ield6m r^t^ 
IVith Thrones furrounded, Sepuldires and Slayes : 
Hxere foft'tfyi)Ocriry, with Glances fweec, 
Heav Vs in her Eyes, and Hell is in her Ifeart: 
FaUb ZeJd her bairbVousMBuums holding fordi. 
And lDt'c<ift^ Fatber of all Crimes^ were there. 
': \ Theft 



H E N R I A D E, 145 

Thefe Tyrants, lewd Cbrruptefs of Mankind, 
Appeared at- Sight ot Henry in Affright. 
They ne'er had ittn him, ne'er their impious Rout 
Dar'd to approach his Soul, to Virtue bred. 
What Mortal, by {hfit Saint condti(fted, cdmeSi 
Theycry'd, our^defftih'd Dwellings to difturb^ 
And perfecute vis in Eternal Night ? . . ' 

The Hero marthM amid thofe Sprlghts obfcene ^ I ^ 
With tardy ' Pate beneath thofe horrent Roofsi* ^ 
Lewis his Leader— Ah, What is't I fee? 
th'AfTaffin of Valois^ that MonJler fell^ 
Father, the bloody Weapon's in his Hand, ' 
The fame the Tray tor took from tht Sixteen. 
While factious Priefts the facred Fanes pollute, 
And on their^ Shrines the Murd'rers Portrait plaoe, 
While Rome exiols himj and the League invoke : \ . 
Hell difavows him, and in Torments here 
He howls, whom factious. Priefts on Earth adore* . 
Son, replies Lewis^ the fevercft Lawi i 

Princes and Kings in thefe Abodes purfue. 

L Behold 



^ 



146 HENRIADE. 

Behold choic Tyrants wor£hip'd m ottr World^ 
The loftier they were then, the lower now. 
God puniihes their Crimea, the Crimea dKpnnf^ve^ 
Committed^ fuffer'd, and left unreveng^U 
Death robb'd them of their flitting Powers and Pampik 
Their Glare, their Joys, and Hireling Sycoj^iant^ 
Whofe fervile Complaifance, and artful Fraud 
Hid from their dazled Eyes the Face of Truths 
And Trvth fevere 13 d>eir Tornocnior here. 
She's ftill before their Eyes, and ftill in View 
Their Vices fe^s in full Deformity. 
See how the CraqVors tremble at her Voice^ 
They're Heroes in the Peoples Eyes, in God's 
They're. Tyrants- Flaik he ufes in \m Wrath,. 
Whpm Fury fets a Fire, who fclf-inflam'd 
By their own Thunders la their Turn afe era&U 
Next thefe are aU thofe flodiful Kygga redin/4. 
Who loll'd, meer Phantoms, on difhoiMMir'd Throntt 
And near them Umry faw their Mi^ifter^ 
Haughty with Height, and infolent widl PowV. 

4 Coun*^ 



H E N k I A D E. 147 

dounfeiWs ciottUftt 6f Mdnriera and df Laws» 

MHio fold the Digbtties of CoUrtsi and Camps^ 

Who the Rewafds of Virtue^ nobly WoA 

By our Forefathers^ put to fotdid Said. 

There, ih that Place of Sorfow, they beheld 

Thofe, who in LuJniry their Lives confuni'd^ 

And Multitudes of Mortals, vAio were drown'd 

InPleafure^ Idl^efs^ sind winton Eafe. 

The Son of Lewis at this melting Sight 

Wept, and th^ Accents utter 'd, mix'd with SighS) 

Ah wretdied R>ice of Men^ if dobni'd to dwell 

In Horrors everlafting for the Crimes 

Of a ihdrt Lifb^ for temporary Faults 

To fuffcr an.&ernity of Woe* 

Were it not better they had never been^ 

Had ne'er ieen Light, nor breath'd die vital Air } 

Happy, r£ Cod fo Great, and &f fevere^ 

From Mtfoi too frc^ Alas! at Icttft had ta'ea 

The fatal Pow'r of DHbbdience. 

Think ncK (he Sufferings of tiiefc coii&urm% 

h 2 %* 



148 H E N R I A D E, 

Says Lewis to his Son, furpafs their Crimes* 

Think nb? that God, Creator of Mankind, ' * 

Delights the Works of his own Hands to tear. 

No, if he's infinite 'tis in Rewards, . i 

Profufe of Gifts, Hut fparing of Revenge. : , 

On Earth he's painted like a Tyrant, here ' . , 

He like a Father puniflies his Sons, 

And foftly with his Hand avenging, ftrikes, 

The Frailty of bur Nature, Faults humane . 

Sallies of Paffidn, hafty and unthought, 

Falfe Pleafures, full of Trouble and Reniorfe, A 

Such as from fated. Imperfedion flow. 

Brought not Perdition on thcfe damn'd, for fuch. 

None fuffer Pdns Eternal like Himfelf. 



Mean time, purfiiing ftill their wond'rous Way 
They reach the Realms of Innocence knd Blifs^ 
They fee no more the dreadful. Dark of Hell, . 
But the pure Luftre of Immortal Light. . 
Hfnry th<^ happy Manfions fees, and feels 



E E N R I A D E. 149 

Afudden Joy within till then unknown,. 
No Cares nor Paffions there difturb the Soul. 

There peaceful Pleafure, ftilt difpencin^ Sweets, 

■ 

There Love in full Extent of Empire reigns : 

But not the Love by Luxury infpir'd. 

That Torch Divine, that Holy Heav'nly Fire, 

Pure Infant of the Skies, on Earth unknown* 

Of him all Hearts are in thofe Regions full, 

Inceflant they defire, and they enjoy ; 

And warm'd within eternal Ardor tafte 

Joys without Griefs, and without Languor Reft. 

There Kings, once ^Fathers of their People, reign $ 

True Heroes there, and there true Sages live. 

There Charlemagne and Clovh fit fublime, ^33 

On Golden Thrones, and have their Eye on France. 

The greateft Enemies, the ficrceft Foes 

Are there united, all are Brothers . there. 

There the Twelfth Lwn ^34, Wife above all Kings, 

Above all Kings is thron'd, and gives them Laws. 

That King to our Forefathers giv'n in Lbve 

L 3 By 



%K 



« 



I50 H E. N R I A D E, 

By Heav'n 'propitious, Jufticc by his Sid« 

^ate always, and h«r Ballance equal hdd. 

Ready co p^r^on, in his Peeves Hearts 

He reign'd, and, when in Sorrow, dry'd their Tean. 

Amboife '35, his faithful Servant at his Fee^ 

^France as He lov'd alone, fo She bv'd hind. 

A Fav'rite without Pride, who high in Pow'r, 

IMe'er foul'd his Hands with Rapine or with Blood. 

Oh Times! Oh Manners I worthy deathleii Fame, 

Happy the People, glorious was the Princp, 

^11 tafted of his grateful Laws the Sweets^ 

And may another Lewh in the length 

Of Time, another 4gc of Gpld reftorc. 

Our gallant Warriours farther oS arc feen. 

Men by their Duty not their Fury fir'd, 

Foix i3<5, Mmtmremy »37, T'rmQuilk ^i\ CH^^ 

The virtuous Biiyard^^^ GuifeeKn ^^^thc Bold, 

Whp ruin'd Kings, and Kings by turns reireogU 

Thpr« the redoubted Amazon they &w, 

^itgknd's DiTgraec, and the Support pf Fi-^^cc 



HENklADK 151 

Thefe Heroes thou beholdeft in the Hetv'ns, 
Says Lewis^ flione on Earth like thee, my Son, 
Virtue to them^ as to thyielf was dear. 
But Children of the Church, with filial Love 
They icheriih'd her, and heard from her the Truth. 
Their Worfliip was the &me with mine, and why 
Haft thou forfitken it ? As thus he fpoke 
With Voice lamenting ; Lo, before their Eyes 

i 

The Palace of the Deftinies appears ; 
He iJiither leads his Son: A hundred Gates 
Of Brais fly opm at his Look, where Time 
Forwards and backwards keeps inceffant Flight, 
And thence on Earth with plenteous Hand pours forth 
The Good and 111 the Sifters have in Store 
For humane Race, and without Wafte difpenfe. 
A Book inexplicable they behold 
Plac'd on an Iron Altar, the Contents, 
The future in irrevocable Fate, 
There our Defires with God's own Hand are mark'd. 
Our cruel Sorrovrs and our feeble Joys. 
I L 4 There 



152 H E N R I A D E. 

There Liberty, that haughty Slave, is held 
A Prifoner, invifiblc licr Chain. 
She bears, and is for ever doom'd to bear 
A Yoke unknown, by God himfelf imposed. 
Who keeps her in Subjedlion unconftrain'd. 
Th? more obedient to the Laws divine. 
The more her Chain is hidden from her Eyes. ' 
Obedience is her Choice, or fo (be thinks. 
And that the Sifters have from her their Laws. 

My Son, f^ys Lewis^ thence 'tis Grace divine 

I 

Benevolently works in human Hearts, 
And from thefe faprpd Pl2^ces in due Time 
§hall dart a Ray pf Light tp piercp thy Spql. 
Thou can'ft npt haftpn nor delay, nor know 
That precious Time to Qod alone reveal'd. 
Far off, too far alas ! 'tis yet to come \ 
Put come it will, and Gopdnefs infinity 

4 

Shall with her Children number thee at kft. 
Buc Ah, What Trials act thou yet' tp pafs ? 
W^at ihameful Wcjikncfles art yet %o prove, 



An4 



HENRI AD E, 153 

» 

And yet in what miftaken Ways to walk ? 
Shorten, Oh Gracious God, thofe ievil Days, 
That at a diftance from, thee Jceeps this King. 



But fee what Crowds in Ibng Succeffion prefs 
For Paflage too and from this Place immenfe. 
Behold, fays Lewis, in thefe bleft Abodes 

Portraits of Mortals dcftih'd to be born, 
The various People of the future World, 

Jmag'd as* they in Times to come (hall live. 

The Days of Men are counted e'er they pais, 

And ever prefent to th'Omnifcient's Eye. 

Here Deftiny the Moment of their Birth 

The Rife of fome, the F^ll of others marks. 

The feveral Changes incident to ail. 

Their Vices/ Virmes, and their Laft of Life. 

Praw nearer, Heav'n permits thee to foreknow 

What Kings and Heroes from thy Root fhall fpring. 

The foremoft in thy View's thy Son auguft, H» 

yfho long ouF Lillies Qlory ihall maintain. 

Triumph 



IT' 



154 H E N R I AD E. 

Triumph o*er Spain a&d BeJgia^ but be ftili 
Unequal to his Father and hisr Son. 
That Moment Henry near die Throne obferv^d 
Two Mortals with the Lillies in their Arms, 
And at their Feet a Nation lay enchain'd^ 
Both widi the Roman Purple doath'd, and Both 
With Guards furrounded and a Warriour-Train, 
For Kmgs He takes them. You are not decehr'd, 
Says JUwh^ Kii^s they are without the Name; 
Bicblieu ^^ and M0zarini^ both rule the Prince 
And People, Favorites of Immortal Fame. 
Both from the Shade of Altars ro(e to (hine, 
High-feated near the Throne of Cbarlenuigne. 
Children of Chance and Policy, who made 
Large Strides, advancmg to Defpotick Pow'n 
Ricblieu, fublin^, implacable, and grand, 
Suppte, and crafty Masforine^ and faHe. 
One flics with Art, and to the Storm gives way j 
The other refotutely ftcms the Tide. 
Both to the Frineej of our |loyal Bl0«| 

V 

Are 



■ —I 



HENRIADE. ijy 

^e Enemies avow'd, woA Mt «t qocq 
Are hated by the People^ and adoairU 
Thus th«y beoom^i hy Induftry «tnd Ait, 

To their Kings U&61I, to their Country Plagues. 
Heav'n, what a Crow'd of SlaTes are on U)eir Knees 
Befcn-e that King ^^» and tremUe at his Nod I 
VHiat Honour, what Reified ihey pay, ao Pdoco 
Jlis Ptople e'er in fuch Obedience kept 
By Gk>ry> He, like You, I fee'$ iQf{Hr'd> 
More lear'd, and more obc3^d, but left belovU 
The Good of Forcuii^ uui the Bad }m knowi, 
\[i that too haughty^ refi)liite id this» 
Himfelf, a hundred Nations feagu'd, de^ 
Great in his Life» but greater in his Dea^ 
Happy this Ag^ an Age hy Nature blei^ 
Jmnieafurably with her choiceft Gifts. 
Thouy Lewis^ bf QU^^t'ft the finer Am to Frmci^ 
pn thee Futurity fh«U caft her l^jet^ 
The Mufee Empire ibere by thee was fixU 
^[^ere mov^ ihe ^{(urble, and th^ Caiwas tveathes^ 

A tho«» 



ij6 H E N RI AD E, 

A 

A thoufand Artifts there with curious Toil 

. Meafure the various Orbs, ' and f ead the Skite. 

Defcartes ^45 took his Flight with hardy Wing 

From Earth j aijd guided by his proper Light 

Launched into Air, and other Worlds explored. 

I hear on ev'ry Side enchanting Sounds, 

Sweet Harmony of Vcric, and Songis divine; 

The Language of the Gods, And how, ye French, 

You kno^y to conquer, and your Conquefts fing, 

• . ♦ ... 

AH Laurels now are for your Temples wreath'd,^ 

I A People of Heroick Mould are formed. 

And fated for theie happy Climes. liee 

The Bourbons foremoft in the Chace of Fame, 

And Conde ^^^ fighting midft a thoufand Fires^ 

By Turns his Mafter's Terror and Support. 

^urenne ^47, his genVous Rival, feems lefs warm, 

But wifer and his Equal, if not more. 

In Catinat ^4^, rare Hap, are reconciled 

The Talents of the Warriour, and the Sage. 

FauBan «49, a Compafs in his Hand> furveys 

> From 



H E N R I A D E: 157 

From RampLsr 6r; from Tow'r th'approaching Fpc^^ : 
Andiat:^h$ .to t hear a hundred Cannons roar. 
Thou, I^ixemburgb ^P, invincible in War,' 
And fam'd Abro^, ihalt find Neglcft at Homc^ 

Diljpucing Thunder with' thfi Bird of Jwf, 
Worthy iis Matter to fupporr, and be . , , 

Great ;jE%^w's Rival, on his Laurels waits 
The peace fp.wifli'd, fd wanted by the World. 
What Royal Youth ^^P is that in whofc fair Front 
Swecinefs and Majefty together (hine ? 
With Look indifferent He regards the Crown. 

Heav n, in what fudden Night is He involved ? 

- • ». 

Death hovers o'er his Head, and fee He falls > , 

At the Throne's Foot as he to mount it moves. 

And with him ^53 fell the jufteft Man in France^ 

Of your own Blood, my Son; ye righteous PowVs !• 

Why did you only (hew hini to Mankind ? 

That Flow'r of your own forming why fo; foon 

To fade ? If longer it had flourifh'd, France 

Had 



tf% H E N R t AD E. 

Hid been too tuppy» buc aki t 'ds toft. . 

Whiit wou'd fioc fu<^ a virtuous Soul have damt 

Pient\y and Ptacd had twftH 1^ fdv're^d Cisttf 

Like-lChiklreti, He hie People wou'd have Wd, 

And counted ^f his dtnefitS) hit Daya 

But «h. What £re Alarfiae have ^'d the J^eiKs^i 

Whajt loud Laments I hear, what Weeing 

In tl-ie &me Gta¥e at <H)ce> hard Pate, ate htid. 

The Huibandi Wife, the Mother, and dif Son. ^ 

Among thcfc Royal RuiM fpr ings a Sprig 

That branches from the Tree, the Root cut ofl^ 

The Sons of Lewis in their Tombs inclosed, 

Have left to govern France a cradled King, ^f^ 

Sweet, but fraH Hope of an onfitcled State. 

Oh prttdcm Mturj ! watch his Infant Years^ 

Guide his Pirft Steps, aiul cuhiyate with Carer 

Tliy precious Charge, the pureft of my Blood 

As much as HeVa Sov'i'eign. Let him leant 

To know Himfelf, and what few Kings ate taught, 

To know, diat tho' he's Mafter, He's a Man. 

Tcadi 



HENRIADE. tS9 



Teach him to love fait Sidgeds: la hisL MitA 
Imprint this Tn;»th» that but for them JBb'ii King, 
And but for them wa$ boro : And thou oh France, 
See under him thy Maje% reftorM. 
Break thro' the Daidoiei^ that has veitid thy Ligh^ 
And let thofe Arts that to have left thee ieem^ 
Return and crown thee with their ttfefiil Hands, 
Old Ocean in hit Cave profound deoiatds^ 
Where do the Lillies in thy Flags appear. 
Comnnerce from Nile^ firom Emcine^ amlfriom Ifti^ 
Calls thee, and opens ts> thee all her Scot^s, 
Keep Peace and Order^ and ieek War ncr ttor^ 
Be Arbiter of King8» letthat Office 
Thy Glory^ diott hail laflelgr paid too mock 
For bnriflg been ifek Tenor and. their H«tt« 



Near. the yauag Kiiq;.m Ri^sikSpkiidor ilMet 

A Heao^ moch. hf Qskaaeaef, purfu'd^i ... 

Eafy not weal^ .iniiiftriowi and.waf na^. 

WithPleaAtt^ a n i wiih Jsioreliicaio Laye^ 

Himfcif 



i(Jd H E N m AD E. 

Himfelf in Luxury's Embraces fe«s 

The . World in' Motion, Orleans his Name/' 

Alli Europe his confummate Policy 

Keeps in Sufpence, divided and. tranquil. 

Arts under his Protedtibn thrive once more. 

For various Toils, with -various Talents bor».^ 

Always unhappy He^ in nothing more 

Than the vaft Genius he received from Heav'n. 



i » * 



Then in the Blaze of Lightnings and a Storms 
The Banner of the Bourbons wave in Air^ 
Beforeic ftand a bold Iberian B^nd^ 
Who brave the German Eagle's haughty Head. 
Father, fays Henry ^ What new Sight is this? 
To Him the Saint— In cv'ry thing there's Change, 
And ev'ry thing that's mundane has its Grave. « 
Adore We I|eav'n, whofc Ways to Us arc hid. 
The Line of the Fifth Coarles ^S7 is now cacfhorb 
Spain on the Knee comesr now to b^ a King, 

^ 

And one of our own Lineage, gives her Law& 

Pbi/ip 



BENRtADE. i6i 

P^//ij^rrThU Sight aWea?:d Hearfi Soul, 
Sweet tho Surprjfe, and ravifliing the Joy, 
This firft Emotjpn mpderat?, my Son, 
Says X^e^if, ftiJJ thece's Room enough for Fear. 
Th'Event is grand, the Cpnfequenfe the fame^ 
Paris will give a Matter to Madrid, 
An Honour, whid^ pi^y fatal prove to both. 
Kings of ip.y Bipod, 01^ Philip, Oh my Sons, 
Can you tb^ Sfqni(ir^s with the Fretich unite? 
How long will Jaft ihe FueJ you provide 
To feed the Firp of Difcord in your Race? 



He faid, and in an Inftant Henry faw 
Nothing but Objefts in Confufion loft. 
Fail fhut the Deftinies their brazen Gates, 
And Heav'n, and the whole Vi^on turn'd to Shade. 

Aurora rifing in the rofy Eaft, 
Opes now the Golden Palace of the Sun, 
Nigl^t h^i black Mantle ipreads o^er other Skies $ 

M Dreams 



i62 HENRIADE, 

Dr^ms flye with Darkners at th'Approach of Day; 
When Bmrhon waking felc within his Breaft 
New Vigour^ and celeftial Ardor glow. 
His LooKs more Fear^ and more Refped infpir*(( 
And on bis Brow &ce Majefty divine. 

Thus, when th'Avenger of the chofen Tritws 
Of IJraet on the Mount with God conferr'd. 
The frighted Hebrewi proftratc in the Duft^ 
Durft not look up, but of his alter'd Eyes 
Th'intolerable Brightness trembling Ihun'd. 



HEH- 



H E N R 1 A D E. 
CANTO VIII. ^ 

ARGUMENT. 
The Leaguers declare the Duke de Mayne Lieuteriattf 
of Francd. Difcfifd promifei tbeat Succours front 
Spain. Coutit Egmonc brings them AJJifiance froni 
the Netherlands. The Battle of Ivry. The Lea- 
guers beateny and Difcotdfies to Love to implore hit 
j4id. 

H E States at Paris frighted and cdiW 

fu»'d, 
Th6' fwoln, fo late, with Arrogart6l( 
— . and Pride, 

Foi^et they had been call'd to chufe a King. - 
Diftra^on ftizes &yem at HgHrfs Name, 
Their Fury '% puskd, and their Pride perplex'd. 

Ma Pr«* 



16+ H E N R ! A D E. 

Nor dare they or degrade their Chief, or crown f 
But yet they firm their infamous DecrecSj 
And give him PowVs and Honours, not their own. 
Thos Mayue becomes a King without a Crown,. 
And without Captain a Lieutenant, ftill 
Prefcrving o'er his Party Pdw'r fupreme. 
He calls himfclf their Prop, and they obey, 
Promifc to combate for him, and to die. 
Full of frcfli Hopes he fummons tliem to fit; 
In Council, and they come ; Lorrains, Nemtmrs^ 
Canillac^^\ and.St. P(?/, prefumptuous Peers, 
La C&arfre, giddy Joyeufe. and Brifac^ 
Pride, Fiercenefs, Vengeance, Fury and Defpaif 

- Are painted oh their Fronts, fome fcarce have Scrcnglh 
To move, by Lofs of Blood in Fight brought low. 

^ But neither Fighi», nor Lofs of Blood, nor Wounds 
Have quenched their Hiirft of Vengetnoes Mfjfii 

prefidej. 
And all, agreed in Faction, row Revenge* 

Thus <m Oiymfits Top dbe Bkcs paioq . . 

The 



HENRI AD E. 165 

The 5or\s of Earth in War againft the Skies. 
Rocks upon Rockc they pile, and Hilk on Hilt% 
And proudly menace to dethrone the Gods. 
Difcord at th'Inflant breaking thro' a Cloudy 
Prefents herfejf before them In a Car 
Blazing with Light, and thus befpeaks the States : 
Courage, my Children, Succour comes, 'tis now 
The Time to conquer or to die. Aumale 
Rofc at her Words, and from th'Affcmbly ran* 
Far off he fees the Spanijb I^nqes fhine» 
There, there, he cries, the promised Succours come 
So long demanded, and delay'd fo long : 
At lafl has Spain AjETiftance fent to France. 
He faid, and Mayne advancing to the Gate% 
Sees frcMn the Walls \!ti Iberians on the March* 
Near where '59 the breathleis Bodies of our Kings 
In confecrated Monuments confume. 
That formidable Blaze of burnifh'd Arrns^ 
Helmets and Harnefs glittering with Gold, 
Defy'd the beamy Brightneis of the Suiu 

M 3 To 



r66 HEN R I AD E. 

^o meet dicm flye the faftious Crowd with Joy, 
'/bid bjefe the Leader £bnt them by Madrid^ 
^^oung Egmofti ^^, Warriour obftinatc and fierce^ 
frh* ambitious Son of an unhappy Sire. 
fn Brujfek he firft breathed the vital Air, 
His Father blinded by his Country's Love, 
py'd oa a Scaffold to maintain her« Right, 
And free the Flemings from a Foreign Yoke. 
jHis Son, a fawning Courtier, bold in Fights, 
]Long kifs'd the Hand, by which his Father bled. 
And for Court-Benefits h|s Country fold, 
Pppreit the Flemings^ and relieved |the League \ 
By Philip to the Seined fair Borders fent, 
A Tutelary God to fuccpur Mayne^ 
Who joyn'd with Egmont in his Strength excels, 
^nd ^nly menaces the Royal Tents. 
With Slaughter in his Turn and Fright to fill 
Piefi^ce iq their Looks, they both advance, 
^lell pl!eas'4, the King, that Air audacious fees, 
ffu yp^ andcipgte a Figbr, fo like 



Tg 



HENRI AD E, 167 

To prove decifive to the Fate of France^ 



Nestf JEiUre^ and IttQrC% filver Screams, a Vale^ 
The Love of Nature, fpreads her flowry Lap. 
Flora their Banks with beauteous Hand adorns. 
And Zephyrs with their balmy Breath perfume. 
The Shepherds, happy in theie peaceful Shades 
Liv'd undifturb'd amid the Din of War, 
And long from hoftile Ravage had been free^ 
Their Poverty protedled by kind Heav'n, 
Seein'd to defy the Rapine of the Sword. 
Safe in .their haulmy Huts they fweetly flept. 
Ne'er by the Noiie of Drums or Trumpets wak'd. 
Here the two Hofts adverie extend their Wings, 
And Defblation marches in their Front. 
Frighted the Floods pf Bure and Itton creep, 
And to the Wxjods the trembling Shepherds flye. 
The dear Companions of their Loves and Lives, 
Lamenting in their Arn^ thjsir Children bear. 
Ah vvxQtched Pwellers in tht^fe charming Fields^ 

M 4 Impute 



i68 H E N RI AD' E. 

Impute not to your Ring this Plow or Tears, 
He feeks not War but for the fake of Peace 5 
Happy ye Frthch\ lie*ll make you, end your Woes. 
When f6rc-d't6 fight, he pities you, and loves. 
But precious' are hfs Moments, fwifc he rides 
JFropj Rank to Rank upon a fiery Steed, 
Flitter than X^rids, and of his Burthen proud, 
He (phamps the Golden Bit, and neighs for Wan 

• r 

Ncftf hiid his Wji'rriours ranged In ftiining Anns, 
Flufh'd with "his Fame, and with his Laurels wreath'c^ 
jyaumont ^^\ who fcrv'd five Monarch^ in the Field, 
^irm '^3/ whofc Name compels the trickling Tears: 

• • • ■ 

His Son then young, impetuous, warm and bold. 
Who fince— Puf then in Virtue^s f aths he trod. 
^uHi »H Grillon ^^s, Nangis^ whom, Foes to Crime, 
The l4ea^e ap once detefted and efteem'd. 
ff^inne ^^^ who fince ^omllon brcath'd his laft, 
Ppfety'll hi$ Name and PuifTance in Sedan ^ 
$*|ilil40C9 pnhappy, and but 111 maintfiln'd, 
P^o^'d ^ fpQp as raif'dby Armqn^&'^^7 Haw J 

ham 



H E N R I AD E. 169 

Amidft thcfe ChieTs ambitious UJex Ihonc 5 

-. . , 

As in our Gardens lifts the 'lofty Palm 

His tow'ring Head above bur ttifted Elms, 

' • • • .• . - 

And in his Foreign Beauties feems to pride. 
Sparkling his Helmet as Cat brigliteft Fire, 

• t • 

Where Gold and Gems the Maftery difpute, 

Dear, precious Pirelents by his Miftrefs given 

In Honour of his Courage, or his Love. 

Thrice happy, and renownM of Mortals thou, 

lUuftrious EJeXy to be thus at once 

The Lover of thy Queen, and the Support of Kings. 

Farther are Tre^ouilky Clermont ^ Feuquieres^ 

r 

Th'Unhappy Nele^ and happy Lejdiguieres ^S. 
Daillyy to thee was this a. fatal Day. 
Thefe Heroes wait the Signal for Attack, 
Impatient, and on Itenry^s Vifage read ^ 
Hope and Prefage of glorious Viftory. 
Mayne anxious and dejeded, fought in vain 
His wonted Valour in his reftlcfs Heart. 
Or, confcious of th*Injurtice of his Caufe, 

Forbidding 



rjo H E N R I AD E. 

Forbidding animating Hope from Heav'j^^ 
Or, as 'tis often in the Soul^ there rofe . 
Thoughts, ill prelaging, in his laboring Breaft. 

» * 

Mean Time, the Heroe hid his high Concern^ 
Difguis'd his Tropble with the Mafk of Joy, 
Awakes the iieepy Courage of hi^ Troops, 
And ftrives to warm them with that gen'rous Hope 
Him(elf affedts, but has not of his own. 
Egmont ip Confidence of Conqueft dares 
The Danger, heated by that youthful Blopd 
%yhich breeds Imprudence, -and in Rafhnefs ends. 
JEager to put his Valour to the Proofs 
iMay^'s 4ilAtory Motions he condemns. 
As a proud Courfer feeding in the Fields 
Of ftbrace^ the Trumpet's warning Clangor hears 
Indocile, fierce, and full of Martial Fire, 
He lifts above his Head his waving Mane« 
Jluns, bou)[ids, curvetts, and rages like a Storm. 
A npble Fury fo did Egmnt feizc, 

"Ui his Eyes f^rkle, ip bis Ji^iofti burn ; 

Caor 



H E N R I A D E. 171 

Conceiving vain, diat Vidory had wove 
The Garland for hi€ Brow, with ardent Voice 
He prefles Battle, thoughtlefs that his Pride 
In Ivrfs (anguine Plains prepares his Grav?. 



Great Henry tow'rds his Foes advancing, thus 
^efpeaks his Sddiers, whom his Prefence fires: 
French Mca are y oil by Birth, and Fm your King) 
Your E^nenciies are there— March — follow Mc. 
Keep in the hotteft of the Fight in Ken 
This Plume, and fee it o'er ray Helmet wave. 
The Way to Honour, where it fhines, is there. 
Thpfb Words with a vidlorious Air pronounc-d. 
His Tropps aftefh with manial Fire inflamU 
Marching, the God of Armies he invoked. 
The Combatants of either Party flew 
To combat, . as their Chiefs infpir'd and led. 
Thus where jl^ides deft the Mountain Crag, 
The blufl'ring North breaks furiousrthro* the Cbifiir^ 
§|i^en the foamj W^TC$ fioip doublefeas 

4 Me?? 



1 



J72 HENRIADE. 

Meet and fhdoc upwtiids with impetuous SHocId 
Earth groans from fer, Dayflicj, «ndgi»oWl Uid Skies, 
WhUe tredabliiig ^A»i feare a f»Uuig World, 

The Mulkct with the Sword for Slaughter joiny, 
Deatln £rci9 all Qmrteiifi files with double Wiags. 
The Demon, that o'er War prefidcs, conmv'd 
The Weapoo at Sayanne »* in elder Tinder 
To fwcep from Earth the living kace of Man^ 
At once refe«Uing: Pcodua it 4)f Hell, ^ - 
What is in Thought nMft dread&I, Sword and Fin 
Both Sides Dexremy aikl Courage fliew, 
Tumuic and Eea|-> blind Furjr, Cries and Groans, 
Carnage, Deipair, ad ardent Third cf Bood^ 
A mingled Maft of Horrors hoth confound. 
Here one purfues to Death a Kindred Foe, 
And there a Brother *s by a Brother ilaifl« . 
Horrent to Mattwe^ is the liloody Strife, . : ! 
And Fields, rduCtianr, ^kik 4iie Crlmfon iSWd. 
Great Hifmj preflce on, aiid4iidws))is Way,; . 

* 

A Forete 



H E N R I AD e: 173 

Forefts Af S^it (o ttin impede his Courier 

Before him bleeding Squadrons fljre afld fall. 

The faithful il45ws/4fy Mows him lerene» 

And calm gmidft che Tetopeft of the War 

Waits on, cud Watches o^er him cHro' thb FieU^ 

Like his good Gttim in that dreadful Day. ' 

See there, iayp he, that (hock'd Batttlion ilies^ 

Mayne^s Troops ere to Arreft near yonder Wood. 

AumaU advances, kt us cneet his March. 

Thus he alfifts him in the Fight, and guards} 

More than one Blow, while yet he fpeaks^ wards off^ 

But Stoical, will not permit his Hand 

To flay, or Ihcw the Stain of human Blood. 

His Soul i^ only for his King conccrn'd. 

He only to defend him draws his Sword. 

Combats he hates^ but knows not what is Fear, 

Dares Deaths and oevter gives die Death he dares. ; 



TyAumont as valiant as fuperb, to Rout 
Puts Ncmouri fnjhied Troop \ wl|erc er he corner £ 

X Horror 
5 



174 H E N R I 4D E. 

Horror afld Slaughter Dailly with him biatfiHi 

The Leaguers flye before him in Difmay 

Daring a thoufand Darts, a fudden Check 

From a y6ung Arm'difdaming he receives^ 

Faft. on eadi other £di die founding Strdces, 

And o'er them hover Vifltory and Death. 

Inceflant is th'Attack, an(i the Repulfe^ 

Keener their Courage grows, and blunt their Swonkji 

Their Helmet and their Buckler ward off Wounds^ 

And bear the Batt*ry of the dreadful Steel. 

Surpriz*d at fuch Refiftance, each refpedi 

His Rival, and his Gallantry admires. 

At length old Daillyhy a Stroke ill-hap'd, 

Feird the young Warriour breathlefs at his Tttt 

Off flew his Helmet, and his Vifage bar'd. 

The Father faw, > killing Sight, his Son. 

He takes him to his Arms, and bathes wkh Tears^ 

Then turning to his Bread: his bloody Sword> 

Wou'd on himfelf his iParrickle revenge. 

His Hand is held j in Agonies of Grief 



H E N R I AD E. 17; 

He quits the Place, detefts his Vidory, \ 
And takes eternal Farewel of the Coun; 
Of Glory and Mankind; himfelf he flies' 
In diftant Defarts from the World to hide 



is Woe. And whether in thofe Wilds he dy'd. 
Or in the Bofbm of the Deep was loft. 
As long as he had Life, his moanfiil Voice 
Taught Echo to repeat his Son^s dear Name. 



:\ 



Heav'n, what dread Cries ftrike cv'ry where the Ear! 

» ^ 

What Torrents of French Blood o'erflbw the Fiejds I 

Who fcatters thus the Leaguers^ and confounds. 
What Hero, or what God this Havock makes ? 
Young Biron^ with refiftlefs Fury breaks 
Their ftun'd Battalions, and in Flight purfues. 
lyAumaky his Choler boiling, fees them flye. 
Stop, ftop, ye Cowards ! Whither wou*d you run. 
He cries. Are you Companions worthy Mayne 
And Guifef Are you Avengers of the Church, 
QiParisy and of Rmief --— Stop—— FoltowMe, 

And 



J76 HENRIADE. 

And fight by my Example-" — Fight w4 Gon(|ijcr, 
Soon to his Succour flye BfofiVtaUf pQJfttiff*. ■ 
The fierce St. Pci, ani ficWeV^ J'^^fdi/f, 
Rally their broken Tcoops, and bid a &qod4 WWi 

Airnah reanknoce^. bis fiery LP9k 

Infedts them with his Brc, fivlft Epftunf tyrm 
Her Face,, and -to the Fof ward -ip»kes b?r- Court 
Biron in vain die x%^\xsx\ Torrent litems, 

And with intrepid Courage toils in vain. 
He by his Side fees Vf^rab^re ^ix^^ 
Among the Crowd of De^ he ioes Feuquiens^ 
Clermont and Nek^ and Anj^enne bite the Ground. 
He's ready, all o*er Wounds, tp drop himfelf. 
And thus, Ah Biron I thpu flwu^d'ft thus ha«» dyU ^f 
A Fate fo famous, aad fo fair a Eall^ 
Immortal tad ^ ijlpripps Meni'ry made. 

Do's not iby Mafter corae to thy Relief? 

, . .... 

He knows the Peril that iayplves tjiy JLife^ 

And flies to thy AiSftaiicc, ^pits Pwfuit 

To CQDij''rors graceful Labour \ iike.a ppd 

Wrath 



H E N R I A D E. 171 

Wrath menacing, Aumale avoids his View, 

Trembling recoils, and Biron leaves with Life, 

, I- 

All give to Bourbon way ; thy Ring, brave Youth, 

Thy^King hai Ciatch'd thee bleeding from the Hands 

• • • ' 

Of butchering Sbldiers, by his Aid thou liv'd'ft. 

And to be fatithful to hina is the leaft* 

That Gratitude detiiinds, and thou can'ft pay. 



r 

L 



Soon were to Mdyne the grievous Tidings- born. 
And where moft bloody was the Field he runs. 
Where Henry spreads Difotder, Fear and Death: 
Who can the Slaughter of the Day exprefs, 
Which ftain'd with Blood the flow'ry Banks of Eure^ 
The -Blows, the Wounds, and ihining !^eats of Arms ? 
Who can the Dying and the Dead relate. 
Now hidden in the darkibme Night of Time? 



Oh Thou, the Manes of a bleeding King, 
The Created in the World, th'Eternal Shade, 
Thy facrcd Dwelling for a Moment leave, 

N Enlighten 



178 H E N R IAD E, 

■ 

Eolighten my dark Mind, and guide my Voices 



Preft on all Sides, hia foraiidable Sword 
Iri Spamjh Blood and French^ is deeply drench'd, 
A thoufand heagiAeri by his Arm expire. 
While Egmont raflily tempts^ his profpVous R^^. 
Long had that Alien of his Valour vainy 
Sought Hemy where the Carnage deepened moft. 
The Glory of ^ Combat with the King 
Inflames him, and precipitates his Fate. 
Come,. Bourbofiy heighten thy Renown, he cries,. 
Fight We. 'Tis ours the Viftory to fix. 
He faid, and forward (Iriking reach'd his Sid^ 
No Mortal Wound, but fuch as fwell'd his Pride, 
To fteep in Henrfs Royal Blood his Blade. 
The wounded King his Peril unappal'd 
Beholds, and with redoubled Fury fights* 
It flatters his Great Heart amongft his Foes^ 
To find a Warriour worthy his Renown. 
Far from retarding him, his Wound provokes,. 

He 



H E N RI AD E, 179 

lie falls on Egmmt with amazing Force^ 

And whelms him to the Ground ; his glitceritig Sword 

t)eep in his Breaft immerging rives his Heatt^ 

He's trampled undler Horfes bloody Feet^ 

And in Death's Shades his fwimming Eyes are wrapt* 

Thither in angry Mood his Soul takes Flighty 

Smit with Remorfe at th'Afpedl of his Sire. 

^eltVing in Blood his breathlefs Body lies^ 

And onward Henry preffing reaches Mayne^ 

m 

AfTatilts himy and With flrong up-lifted Arm 
O'er his pLum'd Head the brandifh'd Death fufpcnd* 
Wax wan the Leagufrs^ in his Fate is theirs* 
IfAumale^ St. P(?/ to hltf Afliftance flyy 
Surround Him, and frotfi Bourbori% Sword defend 
Whither, Oh Effepc ! doft thou furious run ? 
And whither bear the Teihpcft of the Field? 
The xomtdi Flemings He to Slaughter gives, 
VfKiXt Daumortty Jcyeufe Md Nemours pwfis^s^ ; 
There Barbazan by valiant Nangis fellj 
And evVy where ihft Leaguers fall or fly,r 

N 2 Aban 



i.8o: ti EN.R I AD K 

Abandoninig xbeir B^flhers, and their Arms. 
SJome yield withotit'Refifhnce, andbn Earth ./ 
Suppliant the ConqVcrs eafy Chains implore. 
Others to fcape Pur(yit, fey rapid Flight 
Are hurry'd to. thia fianksof-E^r^i/ and pitmgc . 
Precipitate into the Fteod, whofe Wayies 
Choak'd bythc erknfon^'Carnage retfueftt run, 
And thus they noect thtf Death they woU'd avoid. 
h thoufand hideous Gries far off rpfoundj 

• • • J 

And Mantes ^7^ and A*iet frighted fhaike with Fear. 

9 

To Paris Mayne retreats, within her Walls 
Shut up he ftriveS'in vain to hide his Shame, 
While on all Sides vi^iorious Henry fees 
The Leaguers at his Feet imploring Cracei 
Opes in that Inftant the high Vault csf -Heaven, ' 
The Shades of the Bourdons deicend in Air ; 

« 

Amidft them Lewis from th'^theriaj Skies 
Surveys Great £&« 7 j^itH Parental Love, 
To fee what Ufc of Vidtory He makes, 



How 



HE N R lA n E. i8i 

How worthy of hTs Glory in this War. • 

His Sqldiers on the Vanquifli*d gaze, wlf h Ere ; 

The Captives in;his Prefcncc trerriWing wiait 

Their Poom ftY^cnded, by their Guilt made dumb;' 

In their wild Looks, Shame, Terror and Defpair 

Im^ge their perfedt MisVy to Bourbon^ 

Who gracious towVds them turns his Eyes, where reign 

Sweetnefs at once, and Bddn^ tempered fwcet. 

Be free, he cries, and now *tis in your Choice 

To live my Subjefts, or remain my Foes. 

A Mafter you muft have, or Mayne^ or Me ; 

See, which of Us to be fo, merits moft. 

Choofe which to be yourfclves, the Leaguers Slaves^ 

Or the Companions of a King ; with Me 

To triumph, or beneath their Yoke to tremble. 

Thefe Words from Him, fo late with Conqueft crbwn'd. 

Spoke on the Spot, while fcarce the Batde's fpent, 

Struck with Aftonifhment the Captive Bandsi. 

Content with their Defeat, they blefs their Chabs ; 

Their Eyes are opcn'd, fcftned are their Hearts, 

N 3 His 



. ' 






182 H E N R I A D E. 

His Valour conquers ihtva^ bis Virtue charms. 
Now of the Name of Bourhn's Soldiers proud. 
They mingle with his Troops, and march with Jof, 
The King, relenting, bids the Slaughter ceafe. 
And ftr^it bis Warriours drop their lifted Arms ; 
He's now no more that Lion fmear'd with Blood» 
Who carry'd Fear and Death from Rank to Ranis* 
He's now a God beneficent, who throws 
His Tbynder by, and finks into a Calm. 
The Vanquifli^d with Heart-healing Words he wiijs^ 
The Viftors with endearing Praife confirms. 
Comforts, Rewards, and binds them all in Bond^ 
Qf Love ; to fuch as on the Verge of Life 
Stood tottViqg, He Support and Succour fends. 
O'er all itheir Dangers, and o'er all their Wantf, 

■ 

He like a Father kind e^ctends his Cares, 



The i:eady Mcflenger, that thro* the World 
F]^ics with light Wing, encreafing in her Flighf, 
IVitl) daily- Traverfe pafles Hjlls apd Scas^ 

And 



H E N Rl AD E, ««3 

And founds in ev^ry Ear the Deeds of Kings, 
Fame, in the Rebel-City Tidings fpreads 
Of J5o«r^(w's mighty Deeds and Mayne\ Difgrace ; 
Who, vanquifli'd as he was, feems full of Hope, 
And pradifes his Craft to hide his Shame. 
A hundred falfe Reports he feigns to raife 
The drooping League^ and reinilame their Zea!« 
But maugre all his Pains the cruel Truth 
Bely'd, ev*n in his View, thlmpofture vile. 
And flew from Mouth to Mouth, and froze their 
Hearts. 



Difcord affrighted, all her Rage colle(3:s, 

I will not fee my Woric 4eftroy'd, She cries. 

Within thefe wretched Walls. I have not pour'd 

So many Poifons, lit fb many Fires, 

Of Blood fo many Rivers ftream'd to fix 

My PowV, at laft to leave on Henrfs Head 

The Crown of France ^^ as fierce as he 

If I can''t break his Spirit, Y\\ diflblv^. 

N 4 Refitting 



i84 H EN R I A D E. 



Refifting fuch try'd Valour is in vain. 
No Conq'ror will h? ever Jiave but Me. 
His Heart is what \ fear, and I'll to Day 
Attack i^ Combat, Contjucr by Himfclf.. 
She faid, and fudden from the Banks of Seine 
Flies in a bloody Chariot, drawn by Hate, 
In a thick Cloud, atwhoft Appearance, Day 
Turns pale, and fwi^ to Love (he -wings her Way. 



H BN- 



H E N R I AD E 



CANTO IX. 



ARGUMENT. 

The ^etapU of Love defcrib'd. Difeord'j Speech to 
Love. Lovelies to her Aid, and leading Henry to 
Aner, captivates him with Gabricle d'Eftrce, Daugh- 
ter of the MdrjH/j d'Eftree, and he abandons inmfelf 
to Pleafure, St. Lewis fends the Genius of France 
to recover him^ and that Genius employs Mornay to 
bring him from Anet to the Army, Henry 'j Difcourfe 
with Mornay, and their Departure from Anet. 



N Old Idalias ^li Borders, happy 

Climes, 
Where Europe's End, and Afa's Bounds 
begin, 
An antique Palace ftande, by Nature's Hand 
. , With 



lU H E N R I A D E. 

With fitnple ArchiteAure firft erefl;, 
Sinoe Beighten'd by the hardy Toils of Art, 
It (hines with Beauties not in Nature's Stores, 
With Myrtles peopled are the neighb'ring Plain, 
Strange to the bitter Blafts of Winter Winds^ 
The mellow and the budding Fruits are there. 
At once the Gifts of Autumn, and the Spring. 
Nor Seafons regular, nor humane Vows, 
Wants Earth to feed the vegetative World, 
And with riich Harveils blefs th'indudrious Swalq. 
Man tafted jthere in Peace profound, or feem'd 
To tafte, whatever Nature gave when young. 
With Jland beneficent in happicft Times 5 
Repofe eternal, pure unclouded Skies, 
The Pleafures of Abundance, and the Sweets, 
The Blcflings ^of the Golden Age, fave one. 
Save Innocence^ the greateft of them All. 
Soft Inftrumentg jtp charming Voices tun*4 
In ev*ry BowV, in ey'ry Shade breath'd Love ; 
The Chants of Lp.v^rs, and the Songs of Nymphs, 

Wh9 



1'^ V -^ 



HENRIADE. 187 

Who boaft their Shame^ and in their Weakne& pride» 

Are daily feen widi flow'ry Garlands deckt, 

IiQploring Favours of their Infant-God. 

They croud his Fane to learn the dangerous Arts 

Of pleafing and feducing tender Hearts. 

Hope flatters them with ever fair Afpe£t» 

And leads them to Love's Altar by the Hand. 

Not far the Graces to their Voices join. 

The lively Motions of their lovely Limbs, 

In Dance half-naked, fuch as charm'd the Gods, 

Soft Pleafure on the verdant Turf iupine 

Lies liilning to a thoufand Melodies ; 

Silent fits MyftVy by her Side, her Train, 

penials tempting. Cares, Complacence mild^ 

Tender Defire^, and amVous Joys, leis fweet. 



Such the gay Entrance to this Temple fiun'd. 
put when beneath its inner Vault you come. 
And with bold Steps the Sandhiary reach, 
iVhat h^tci^ Sjght^ di&u|$ the frighted £ye I 



$•5^. 



Np 
4 



'•- 



i88 H E N R I AD E. 

No more ibft Pleafijre, and \^tx playful Train^ 
The Melodks, the charming Dance no more. 
The Scene taPkints, Uifgufls and Fear It changed, 
Thisi fair Abode becomes th^Abiding foul 
Of Horror. There dark Jeabufy of pale 
And livid Hpe by dim Sufpicion's led. 
Faith lefs'her Foot, before her Hate and Rage, 
Poignard in Hand> and (bedding Poifon march. 
Malice behplds them, and with treacherous Smile 
Their Homicides applauds ; Repentance next 
Sighing and with disjed^d Look appears. 
Their Fury She abhors, and weeping wails. 

Here jn the midft of this detefted Crew 
Companions horrible of Joys humane. 
Love his eternal Dwelling chofe to fix. 
Child /dang'rous he, fb tender, fo fevere. 
In his wQ^k Hand the Fate of Mortals holds. 
And only with a Smile gives Peace or War. 
He quickens the whole Univcrfe, and lives 



In 



» 1 ' * 



* « ^f ^< 



HE N RI AD E. r89 

In cv'ry Heart s up(m hisriKining Thfoiw/J : . .'•u!\ 
HisComjueite cottODGi^fttts, anid uikb^ Foot r^ O 
Tramf4c«i tbie^praudeft JHkads.^ hiinictf mbreproKid II 
Of Cruelties, than Kmdriftflwto M«i, r :.: ; •/:::: :A 
Seems, wheahie'sdoiBgMifchii:f, tobcpleasU ^ 

' * f ■• '\ ' 'x *'' T 7 

* 4 " 

Difcordj by Rageoonduddd^ focidbn coined 
Scatters tbe; Train of Pkiftice^ land tdlxxbe': , : q 
Free PaiTage makes, htf.nE*6ndies in berHamdo;. ) c O 
Her Forehead foul withJSlood, her Eyca:on fire,,' .: ^l 
She {hakes h^r flaming Torches fierce,, and &ys, ; , ^ 

« 

Where now, my Brother,- are thy dreadful Dart&? : 

For whi)m thefe Arrows., id day Quiver kept ^ 

Ah, if thou e*er didftlcindte-D^^vrif s Bra^, 

If ever mix my Pcdfon with thy Rage, . ■ 1 

If I, fuU oft, all ^Nature hiuve for thee . . 

Difturb'd, Come/ take wkh xne thy Flight, ttific^^m 

» 

My Wrongs, a Viftot King my ^Snakes )ias. bruised* ' 
Olive and Laurel in his Haijfds are joiny, 7 
Mercy with him walks imitihg and tranquil;. 

2 Amid 



» '1 



«, V 



i^o H E N Rl AD E, 

Amid the Tumult of incefUne Broils. 
Go chen^ and where thou feeft his Enfigns wavif, 
Enfiiare chofe Hearts, that are from me eftrang'd; 
Another Viftory, my Throne's in Duft. 
Farts upon her Rampires iifews Bouridnj 
Who fights for Peace, and conquers to forgive. 
For me he has a hundrdd brazen Chains 
Prepared, and only thou can^ft flop his Cobr&l 
Go theo, his .Glory poiibiiiin'its Source. 
Huml^e and fix him in thy Fetters faft. 
Go, pierce this Enemy in Virtue's Armsy 
And i^hat J:try in vain, Jiis Courage tame. 
Thou, as thou well remonbreft, once compeirdft 
jilciJes at OmpbaJe'^ ^75 Fettfo falL 
Did not Mark jfytbony '7^ by ^ Moharchs^fbrv'd 
The conquered World abandoh JFor thy Charais^ . 
And, Slavic to thee, before jiugujius fly^ 
Preferring Ckdpatra to a World ? 
Henry ^ thy greater Labour, dill remains ; 
Kill thou his Laurels in his conq'ring Hand : 

Wlib 



HENRI AD E. 191 

With am*rous Myrtle bind his haughty Head, 
And lull his Courage in thy Arms afleep. 
Thine is my fuffering Caule, thy Kingdom mine. 



Thus fpoke the Monfter, and the trembling Vavlt 
Her Voice refounded thro' the Court of Love* 
The God upon his roiy Bed reclin'd. 
With Kindred Pity hears his Sifter's Plaint, 
And anfwers with a Smile, fevere and fweet. ^77 
His Quiver he with golden Arrows fills. 
And cleaves th'iStherial Wafte, before him fly 

4 

The Sports, the Graces^ and ten thouiand Joys^ 
And Zephirs bear him on their Wings to France. 



Well pleas'd beneath hkn in his Flfght he iees 
^imm v\ and the wafted, fields of 5/>»y. * ; , 

He fmiles as he iliat Wafte renown'd fwcYGp^ 
The Palaoes in Duft his Hands conf um'(i ' " ' : ' 
In the fame Moment oi^rs to his View 

The famous City founded in the Sea^. 

yimice 



- , -J • ■ 



X ■* 



igi H EN R^ t AD E:^ 

Venice ^J9, whofc Fate the watVjT PowV «drbif es. 
Fair Miftrefs-fcif^liis tributary Waves. 
And'Toorf Re^^fees' the .living Stream Himfelf * * 
Has eternis'd in Petrarchs ^^^ happy Song, 
^^ficli inliji'lSpnng'of'Bife^ii its Bfahks'I^ '''- 
He Xsanttfavig] triorc'beatitdous dian the Spring. 
The Walls of An^t^n thc'Banfe ol Etire. ' '■ ' 
He fees, hiiMTclf'the ftately^Struiaure Ah'Ai " 
Wrouglk tjjrhK'Hahd' aSidfe'rvc^ovc wfth'Art; 
D/tf«<j's > «' Cypher there ina^ fell t)b 'tr*6'(f;- -'- 
The Graced kntf the Joys in' paiffing (hed 
Flow'rs on'-her Toncrb, tip-ipringing as they pais. 



« • « 



'■ • 'Mr' 



Now in the Plains of Ivry Love arrives, 
As Hin^y ««« oil 'fdJnii^'grana tfcfign Was bent, ' 
Semblance of'.Wa.r h in his S^ts preTerv'd,' ' 
He, for £ Moiftcnir, lays Im-'I^ixnAt^ bjJ, 
And in wild Fcjrefii^ htaiKs= thie batting l^mA. 
A thoufand valiant Toudhft' attend their King, 
Companions of the\Chace, Him Love ftirvevs 



• «»>•» 



Amid 



tl E N ft I A D E, 193 

Amid his Warrioufs with inhumane joy. 

And whets his ArroWs, and prepares his Chaiii. 

Around him th' Elements he raifes, arm'd^ 

And vexes as he late had calm'd the Skies. 

From both the Poles he Calls the wand'ring Stdrmf, 

He bids th'obedicnt Winds coUedk the Clouds, 

And down the Floods in Air fufpended pour, 

And Thunders, Lightnings, and thick Night bring on, 

The North his ail-comttianding Voice obeys. 

In the dark Hcav*ns difplays his heavy Wings, 

The dreadfulPfk Niglit fucceeds the brighteft Day, ' 

» 

Shakes Nature, and confefTes Love her Lord. 
O'er the wet Furrows of the waftiy Field, 
The King in doubt without or Guard, o^ Gdlde, 
Strays in the Storm, unknowing where he goes. 
Love in that Moment lights his fatal Torch, 
Which fhines before him like a guiding Star, 
The Monarch unattended j(hapes his Way 
By that falfe Glitter thro' the ftarlefs Gloom i 
As oft bewilder'd Travellers in Night 

FoIIqw 



194 H E N R I A D E. 

Follow the livid Fires from Earth exhal'd, 
Thofe Fires that flitting and malign alike 
Light, and at once to Precipices lead. 



Late to that lonely Place had Fortune brought 
A Nymph diftinguiih'd by her Birth and Charms. 
There in a folitary Caftle, far 
From the loud Noife of War, (he waits her Sire, 
Who, faithful to our Kings, and old in Arms 



Had foUow'd Henry\ Enfigns in the Field ; 
Her Name UEJiree^ by Nature's Hand adorn'd 
With evVy Beauty of the beauteous Sex. 
Not Helen was fo charming, nor the Queen, 
Who glory'ng in her PowV, at T^arfus {hew*d 
The Mafter of the Romans at her Feet, 
When down the Cydnus row'd in all the Shine 
Of Love and Empire, {he £or Venus i^^H. 
This Fair was in her Bloom, an Age to Youth 
So dang'rous, fo refiftlefs then the Charm. 
Her Heart was form'd for Love, but had not yet 
l' Rcceiv'd 



HENRIADE. 155 

Received a Lover's Vows, or known its Pow'n 
Thus a fweet.Rofe new-budded in the Spring 
Within herfelf her native Beauties keeps, 
From amVous Winds her Bofom Treafurcs hides. 
But opens to a Sun ferene and warm. 



Love, who to take her by Surprize prepared, 
Approach'd her under a fidlitious Name, 
Without or Torch, or Quiver, or a Dart, 
He comes, in Figure and in Voice a Child. 
The Conqueror of Mayne^ he cries, draws near. 
And to this Caftle bends diredl his Courfe. 
So faying, fly into her Heart he flid. 
A ftrong Defire to pleafe fo great a Prince, 
Defire till then unknown, which fluih'd ber Face, 
And painted with a rofy Blufh, her Check. 
Love with Delight beheld a Form fo.fajn 

# 

What mayn't he hope, aflafled by fpoh Charms? 
To Bourbon be condudtsher willing Steps. 
The Graces to her Looks and Air, he gives, 

O X Wiih 



195 H E N k 1 A D E. 

With Eyes feduc'd, for Nature's Prefents pais. 
The Golden Ringlets of her flowing Hair, 
The Play of wanton Winds do fometimes hid?». 
The Snow that on her Breafts begins to fwell. 
And fometimes in their Flow thofe Beauties bare, 
That Fancy cannot form, nor Words cxprefs, 
Made ftill more beauteous by her modeft Mien. 
Nor a wild Modefl:y, or Look auftere. 
Forbidding Love, and leff'ning Beauty's Charms: 
But foft and harmlefs like an Infant's Smile, 
It fpreads Vermilion on the bafhful Front, 
Infpires a tender Awe, inflames Defire, 
And fwells to Rapture happy Lovers Joys. 

More ftill does Love, What is't he cannot do? 

The Place, and all around it, he enchants, 

And fudden, branching out, the Myrtle grows, 

Mingles in all the Groves her leafy Boughs, 

And fets the Lovers In their bliisful Walks, 

Unpaflabte the Way, by fecret Stops, 

2 Plcafing 



B R N R I A D E. 197 

Plcafing Impediment, not feen but felt. 
It pleafes, and it troubles, dill detains. 
Am^dfts thefe Shades a Stream enchanted flows : 
Here Lovers, thirfty in their amVous Fits, 
Oblivion of their Duty, deeply drink. 
JLove in all Places here exerts his PowV, 
All here is changed, here fighing ev'ry Heart, 
All poifon'd with the Charms he breathes around. 
All here fpeaks Love. ThMnfeftion in the Birds, 
Their Kifles they redouble, and their Songs. 
The lufty LabVer, bred to patient Toil, 
Walks on. Heart-heated, where his Labour calls. 
Stops, wanders, fighs, is reftlefs and amaz'd. 
New to the Pains and Pleafures of Defire, 
Under Love's Power he loiters in the WopdSj^ 
And leaves th' imperfect Harveft in the Fields. 
The Shepherdefs, forgetting Sheep, feems ftun*d. 
And drops the Spindle from her trembling Hand. 
How C9U*d UEJiree refift a PowV like this? 
Invincible the Charm, and (he at once 

O 3 Had 



198 HEN R I AD E. 

Had Youth, her Heart, a King, and Love to cope 
Sometimes the Hero feels his Valour flame. 
And then to lead his conq'ring Troops he longs. 
But foon that Fire is,* as it kindles, quenched. 
And he, by Hand invifible, detained, 
Seeks in his wonted Virtue vain Support. 
Virtue forfakcs, Intoxication finks 
His Soul, and now he nothing fees, nor hears. 
Nor loves, nor knows, nor wifties but UBftree, 

Mean time his Chiefs, far off, demand their PrincCi 
And miffing, Confternation chills their Hearts. 
They tremble for his Life. Who fo cou'd think? 
They rather ought to tremble for his Fame. 
Fruidefs their Search, dejefted, all the Camp 
5ecm v^n^uiih'd when they have not him to head. 

But the good Genius that prefides o'er France^ 
JIls dang'rous Abfence wou'd not long endure, 
^t Ifitpii Call, defcending from the S|des, 

To 



bi 



HENRIADE. 199 

To his Son*s Succour, fwift as Light he flew. 
When in our Hemifphere he ftretch'd his Wings, 
Earth, he, with Eyes inquifitive furvey*d, 
To find a Sage to minifter his Will. 
He fearch'd not gloomy Hails, nor Cells rever*d 
For Study, Silence and afFedled Faft. 
He fpeeds to Ivry^ and amidft the Rage 
And'Riot of licentious conq'ring Troops, 
Watchful o'er France^ this Angel fixt his Flight 
Divine among the Tents of Cahiris Sons ^^5". 
To Mornay he addrefles, thus to fliew 

« 

That Reafon 's oft fufficient for our Guide, 

As (he the Pagans guided, Romans ^ Greeks^ 

Marcus Aurelius ^86^ Plato ^87, Shame to Chriftians, 

A Friend difcreet, Philofopher fevere. 

At once knew Mornay to reprove and pleafe. 

More than his LeflTons his Example taught. 

He knew no Loves but folid Virtues ; Toil 

To him was Pleafure, and Fatigues, Delights.. 

Firm was his Foot on Precipices wild, 

O 4 / Not 




200 H E N k I A D E. 

Not the Court Air> a fojft infedious Breath, 
E'er changed or touched his Purity of Mind. 
Fair Aretbufa ^^8 thqs her happy Waves 
To WQfvlVing Ampbitrite's Bofom rolls ; 
Her Cryftal Waters, pure as at her Spring, 
Corruption never ff om the $ea receive. 



Soon genVous Mornay^ Wifdom's felf his Guide, 
Departs, and to thpfe Woods enchanted flies. 
Where Pleafure in her Arms the CopqVor holds. 
Miftrcfs, in Uenry, of the Fate of France^ 
Love ev'ry Inftant there vidtorious proves. 
And Henry ev'ry Inftjint happier mlakes. 
His Glory more to blcmifh, more debaf?, 
Thofc Ple^fures, oft fo fliorten'd in their Courfe 
Piyide his lyioments, an^ fill up Jiis Time. 

Amidft thenj Love.dcfcrics, and is enrag^, 
Wifdopa fpvere |)y faithful Mqrnafs Side, 
A Daft avenpin^ at hj§ Heart he aims^ 

To 



HENRI AD E. 201 

To lay it ope to his alluring Baits. 

Morriay contemns his Choler and his Charms. 

And blunted from his Armour falls the Dart, 

He fecret waits the Coming of the King, 

And contemplates with irritated Eye 

The various Beauties of th^enchanted Place. 



Far in thi deep of thofe delicious Shades, 
On the gl-een Margin of a Silver Stream, 
Beneath ah am'rous Myrtle, fit Retreat 
For Lovers, fit for Love's my fterlous Rites, 
lyEJlreey on Bourbon lavifh of her Charms, 
In Langulfhment around him twines her Arms. 
But wh6 can paint what happy Lovers know. 
The Cooings, the Careffes, tender Vows, 
And all the foft Societies of Love, 
The Tears, loofe hanging on their humid Eyes, 
Grateful to Lovers, their alternate Fits 
Of J^ury, Languiftiing, Confufion fwect. 
l^r<; wiinton iPleafures and the playful Loves 

Pifarm'd 



202 HENRIADE. 

DUarm'd the Hero, one his Carcafs took 
Still ftain*d with Blood, another feiz'd his Sword^ 
And fmiling, bj;apdifli*d in his feeble Ifends 
The Throne's Support, and Tenor of Mankind. 



Difcord far off infults the Love-fick King, 
And grins and grumbles with Delight obfcene. 
She manages thofe Moments he mifpends, 
Her Snakes again (he lafhes o'er the League, 
And while Bourbon is melting in Repofe, 
Or on D'E/iree*s Love-breathing Bofom fleeps, 
Difcord awakes the Rage of all his Foes* 
Loft in a Labyrinth of Love, at length 
Henry fees Mornay in thofe tempting Groves, 
And feeing blufhes, in Confuiion both. 
And of each other's Prefence both afraid. 
Nearer tl^e Sage in fuUen Silence draws. 
Enough that Silence, and his down-caft Look 
Explain his Thqught, and Bourbon knows it well. 
In his Hern Countenance, where Sadnefs fate, 

HI* 



H E N R I A D E. 103 

His Mailer reads his Weaknefe and his Shame. 

Ill had another taken M?r»tf/s Care, 

For few in Faults love Witncfles, and leaft 

In Faults of Love : Dear Friend, fays Henry ^ Come 

Thy Prince's Heart's ftill worthy thee, 'tis done, 

I fee thee, that's enough, Fm now Myfelf, 

The fame I was before th'Inchanter Love 

On my unwary Heart had laid his Spells. 

Let's fly the Shame of thefe two charming Shades j 

Let's fly this plcafing Place, where ftill I hug 

The Chain that held me Let it henceforth be 

My greateft Victory myfelf to vanquifh. 
Hence, let us Love, in Glory's Arms defy, 
Strike Terror into Paris^ and eflface 
My fatal Error in Iberian Blood, 



To gen'rous Mornay there his Mafter fpoke, 

He heard hini and he knew 'Tis you, he cries, 

J fee again, 'tis you yourfelf I fee, 

Th' auguft Defender of the Throne of France^ 

King of your Heart, and M^ftcr of yourfelf 

Lovft 



204 H E N R I A D E, 

Ix>ve a Bcw Luftre to your Glory adds ; 
Who knows not Love is happy^ who fubdues, 
Illuftrious---Pa(s this Sally like a Dreano. 



He iaid — The KLing prepares to part, ye PowVs, 
How tender, and how many his Adieus? 
Full of the Beauty he adores and flie8> 
He blames himfelf for weeping, but weeps on. 
This Way by Momay drawn, and that by Love, 
He goes, he ftops, and in Deipair departs. 
He goes, and in that Moment fwoons D'EJiree^ 
Faints without Motion, Colour, Speech or Life ^ 
In fudden Night her fwiroqaing Eyes are veil'd, 
And Love, who fees her fwoon laments aloud. 
Her lovely Eyes he fears for ever clos'd, 
A Nymph fo charming from his Empire rapt, 
A Nymph, who might have lit fo many Fires 
][n France^ and done fuch Mifchief to Mankind. 
He takes her in his Arms, and foon the Fair 
Opens her dying Eyes at J^ove*s fwe?t Voice, 

Calls 



HENRIADE, 205 

Calls on her Lover^ but fiie calls in vain. 
In vain (he looks to fee him, and then fliucs 
Her Eyes, as hating ev'ry other S^ht. 
Ix>ve bath'd in Tears recalls her as die illes. 
Both Light and Life, and widi feducing Hope 
Sweetens her Sorrows, he himfelf the Caufe. 

Mornayj whole ftubbora Virtue nought could bend. 
Draws after him the King, ilill loath to leave 
Thofc dear Abodes, but ftill more loath to ftay. 
Courage and Virtue ihew the Hero's Track, 
And Glory leads with laurels in her Hand. 
Love in Dizain that Duty had prevail'd. 
To Pap&es'^9 hits, and Jiides his Wrath and Shamft 



^ ^ ■ HEN" 



H E N R I A D E. 



CANTO X. 



A R G U ME N T. 

Irttf League in Confufim. Aumale defiei Henry'j jlr- 
my.. Turenne accepts his CbaUer^e and kills kirn in 

JingU Combat. Henry mt of CompaJJion to the Citi- 
zens rejihes not to ayault Paris, hat to reduce it by 
Famine. The Famine defcribed. Henry offers them 
Supplies. They incline to fubmit, but are dijfuaded by 
the Priefis. 5/. Lewis addreffes to the moft High for 
his Son's Conversion to the ,Cfut:cb of Rome. He is 
'miraculoujly converted. 'The'Sdint comes to him, and 
conducts him to the Walls o/Taris, which open a Way 

for his Entrance. 'The LcAg\icTS fubmit, and Mayne 
becomes his good SubjeB. 

HOSE dang 'rous Moments, loft in wan- 
ton Bale, 
Gave the League Leifure to recover 

Strength. 

And 



J 



H E N R I A D K 207 

And for new A6tion, and new Crimes prepare. 

Mayne fails nor to rekindle Difcord\ Fires, 

And with fre& Hopes intoxicate the Croud. 

Thofe Hopes deceive them, Bourbon 's at their Gatcs^ 

Impatient to compleat his Vidtory. 

Again is 'Paris in affright, and fees 

His Banners waving o'er her batter'd Walls, 

Himfelf is at the Rampiers Foot, where late 

His Lightnings biaz'd, and ftill the Smoke remains. 

When the good Angel of the French appeased 

His Wrath, high rais'd,- and held his conqVifag Arm, 

And Ranfipiers and the Town from Ruin fav'd. 

Already in the Royal Camp are heard 

Vidlorious Shoutings and tiiniukubus Joy. 
The Fadlious in their Fright tcJ Mayne repair. 
Their Leader, Mafter of hihlfelf, conceals 
His Doubts, his Dread, and deep Anxiety. 
To timid Cbuhfels Enemy, UAUfnak, 
Thus fpeaks, intrepid in' his Words and Air. 

We know not yet to hide i bur F&es advance, 

And 



2o8 B E N R I A P p.. 

And vfhsx have we to do then» but to march ? 

To meet and fight them coop'd within our Walls 

Our Valour, as we're French^ will droop and die. 

pur Nation, fierce at Onfet, flag in Fight, 

If firft attacked ; but if attacking firft. 

They drive before them all the fwarming Field. 

Defpair has oft gain'd Battles ; from our&lves 

Much I expert, but nothing from our Walls. 

Hei'oes, who hear me, wing to Wjit your Way, 

People who follow us, upon your Chiefs 

As your beft Rampiers look: He iaid^ his Speech 

As rafii as bold the filent Leaguers (hock*d. 

He blufh'd with Shame, and in their Eyes confiis*d 

Trembling he read their Fear and their RepuUe. 

Well, fince to follow me you all refufe. 

Said he again, too great is the Reproach 

To bear it, and to live, you Danger dread. 

The Danger I myfelf will tempt, and teach 

Your Chiefs and you to conquer or to die. 

Strait to the Gates he runsj the Gates are op'd. 

And 



I 



H E N R I A D E, 109 

And far behind him He his Followers leaves. 
Then to the Royal Tents advancing nigh, 
A Herald, Minifter of War, he fends 
Defiance to denounce in Henrfs Camp, 
And tho* with Stcntor Voice his Herald cries. 
You, who love Glory, meet renown'd Aumale^ 
And on this Ground difpute the Victory. 
He here attends you. Enemies, appear. 



All Henry\ Heroes fir'd with Thirft of Famc^ 
Againft Aumale to try their Courage urge. 
All prcfs the Pref 'rence in this high Conteft, 
All well deferve it, but Turenne prevails. '*^ 
His Mailer by his Valour importun'd. 
Knew not fo brave a Servant to deny. 
And trufted in his Hand the Fame of France. 
Go, Bourbon fays, abate the Boafter*s Pride, 
Fight for thy King, thy Country, and Thyfelf, 
And ufe this Gift thy Sovereign's trufly Sword* 

P The 



no HENRIADE. 

The King thus fpcaldng gives it, Thus turerme 
Replies, Great Prince, you (hall not of your Truft 
Repent, by thb good Sword, by you I fwear. 
He then eoibrac'd his Knees, and then received 
The King's Embrace, and flew to meet Aumale, 
Who waits impadent, and exuldng fees 
A Combatant approach, the Royal Hoft 
Near Henry's Tent in Order meet are rang'd> 
And to the Rampiers the Parifiam run. 
On th/B two Champions fix'd is ev'ry Eye, 
Each his Defender fees in This or That, 
And animates with Gefture and with Voice. 



Soon the two Rivals in the Lifts are feen. 
And Henry open to their Entrance bold 
The Barrier of the Field of Honour lays. 

• - 

They cumber not with heavy Shields their ArmSt 

Nor under Iron Helmets hide their Heads^ 

Proud Ornaments of Chivalry anti(^u^ 

Bright 



H E N R I AD K 211 

Bright and impenetrable, fram'd to make 

The Combat longer, and the Danger lefs j 

This Equipage of Battle they defpife, 

Their Swords at once their Weapon and Defence. 

Other they fcorn, and thus expois'd entire. 

Advancing fierce in mortal Combat join, 

As bidden by the Trumpet's martial Sound, 

Whatever Courage or Addrefs cou*d do. 

Whatever Ardor, Refolution, Strength, 

Adtivity, thefe Combatants effay'd. 

In th'Inftant on each Side a hundred Strokes 
Are aim'd and warded off, amazing Sight. 
The Camp, the City with Surprize behold 
Their Fall each Moment, and their Vidory. 
More ardent is UAutnaky more ftrong, more rafli, 
Turenhe more dex'trous, wary, more Himfelf, 
Warm without Rage, and Mafter of his Mind. 
Intent to tire his Adverfary proud ; 
lyjumak in Efforts vain his Vigour drains. 

-P a His 



211 H E N R I AD E. 

His weary Hand no more can help his Heart. 
Tiurenne^ who watches him, his Weaknefs fees. 
And quickning his own Courage with frefh Flame, 
He pu(hes9 prefles Jiim, he takes fure Aim, 
And pierces with a mortal Stroke, his Side. 
Down falls UAumale^ and from his widening Wound 
Streams the warm Blood ; a lamentable Cry 
Enfues, upon the fanguine Sand he rolls, 
And threatens with his dying Eyes T^urenne^ 
But threatens now in vaiii. He drops his Sword, 
Wou'd fpeak, but in his Mouth all Utterance dies ; 
Abhorring to be conquered, wild his Look^ 
He rifes, falls again, his Eye, fcarce ope. 
He cads towVds Paris^ fighing, and expires. 
Thou faw'ft, unhappy Mayne^ thou faw'ft him die; 
Thou (hak'ft thyfelf, and thy approaching Fall 
Was in that Inftant prcfent to thy Soul. 



And 



HENRIADE, 213 



And now the Soldiers to the City bear 
In fblemn March unfortunate Aumale. 
This bloody Speftaclc, this fatal Pomp 
Enters amidft a People in Defpair. 
Stupid with Grief they gaze upon his Corpfe, 
His Forehead fmear^d with Blood, his gaping Moudi, 
His Head down-hanging, and his ghaftly Eyes 
With Duft all covered, terrible to Sight. 
No Wailings do they hear, no Weepings fee, 
Shame, Pity, Sorrow, Fear poflefs their Souls, 
Stifle their Sighs^ and inly keep their Plaints ; 
Mute all, and trembling : Soon a horrid Noife 
Still added to that dreadful Silence Dread. 
The Shoutings in the Royal Hofl they hear. 
By Clamour for AfTault and Vengeance rais'd ; 
But Bourbon tempers with fair Speech their Heat, 
Ingrate his Country, yet he loves th' Ingrate. 
rFrom her own Rage to feve her is his Wifh, 

P 3 Tho* 



214 HENRI AD ^.. 

Tho* hated by his Subjcfts, prompt to fpare. 
They wou'd be loft themfelvcs, he feign wou'd win. 
Happy, if he by Clemency cou'd melt 
Their harden'd Hearts, and bring them to implore 
The Mercy he fo readily wou'd grant. 
Secure of Conqueft he fufpends the Storm, 
And, circled by his Troops, inverts the Town, 
To leave them Time to cool and to repent. 
Famine and Hunger, keener than the Sword, 
Forbid the Slaughter and the Toil of Siege ; 

« 

And promife, bloodlefs to reduce the League. 

For what can Men, made Daftards by Difgrace^ 

To Plenty, and to Lux'ry u§*d, endure? 

Vanquifli'd by Misery, tam'd by Indigence, 

What can they do, but fuppliant on their Knees 

For Pardon to their injured Sovereign fuc? 

Falfe Zeal, faft Friend to Difcord, who n'cr yields, 

Teaches to fufFer as to hazard AIL 

The King's forgiving Temper, they ipiicall; 

With 



UENRIADE. 2ie 

With them 'tis Weaknefs; the Rebellious fpar'd 
By Bourbon's Arm avenging, fcarce are Freed 
From their juft Fears, but infolenc and vain, 
They dare their Conqueror infult, and brave 
His idle Vengeance, from their Head withheld. 
But when at laft the Captive Seine forbore 
To bring the neighboring Harvefts to their Honae^ 
And with his wonted Tribute load his Waves ; 
When in the Streets of Paru Famine pale 
And fierce, with grifly Death behind her, ftalkr, 
Then hideous was their Howling, proud and flarv'd. 
With trembling Hand, and hollow Voice, they begged. 
But begg'd in vain, the loweft Wants of Life, 
Raging for Scraps, not worthy, late, their Dogs. 
The Wealthy were not then by Famine fpar'd. 
But felt amidft their Store the Vultur's Gnaw. 
Where now the Feafts, the Revels and the Sports, 
When, crown'd with Myrtle and the Rojfe, they drank 
The richeft^ Wines, and gorg'd deliciow Food, 

P 4 \ Lolling 



> 



2i6 H E N R I A D B, 

Lolling, luzurianc, under gilded Roofs, 
And irritating Tafte, with Arts rcfin'd. 
Lo thefe Voluptuous, frightful npw to view. 
Wan, walking Skeletons with craving Maws, 
Perilh, while wallowing in Gold, by Want, 
And curfe th' Abundance that denies them Food. 
The Father, driv'n by Fanoine to his Grave, 
In Cradle, famifli'd, leaves his dying Son. 
Here a whole Family convulfive dye. 
And Wretches, ferther groveling on the Ground. 
In the lafl Moments of their Lives, contefl 
The vikft Rcfufe pickt from Kennel Filth. 
The Famifh'd outrage Nature, fearch the Tombs, 
And feed upon the Relicks of the Dead. 
Bruis'd Bones of CarcafTes to Gellies boil'd, 
With horrid Gufl, they greedily devour. 
Whar will not^hunger in its Rage attempt? 
Sons on their ^-ather's facred AOies feed. 
Pcath, forwarded by this detcfted Food. 



Comes 



H E N R I AD E: 217 

Comes quicldy after ; and this Meal's their laft. 



Mean time the Dodors, and Fanatick Priefb^ 
Have in the Common Mis'ry no Concern. 
Their Care Paternal 's to themfelves confin'd. 
They riot in abundance at the Foot 
Of Altars, and grow fat with Sacrifice. 
To keep the People's Courage warm, they praiic 
The Mercy of die God whom they offend. 
To fome expiring they with liberal Hand 
The Joys of Paradife difpenfe. To fbmc 
They (hew Heav'ns Thunder aim'd at Henrfs Head, 
Ready to cruih a Prince Heretical : 
Paris by mighty Armies they relieve. 
Armies defcending from Confederate Skies. 
Thefe fleril Promifes, theie flattering Dreams, 
Abufe their eafy Faith, a Prey to Priefts, 
By them feduc'd, and fcar'd by the Sixteen. 
Submifs, and almoft fatisfy'd^ they die, 

Their 



2i8 H E N R I A D E. 

Their Life^ poor Offering, to their ghoftly Guides. 



Of mingled NaticHis Parts then was iull» 
Tygers our Fathers in their Bofom bred. 
Some from the Belgick Plains^ fome from the Roc 
And Mountains of Hehetiay thither fwarm'd, 
Barbarians! War 's with Thefe^ their only Trade« 
To the firft Purchafer they fell their Bloody 
Greedy of Rapine, as they lift, they live. 
Force ev'ry Houfe, and what they find is Spoil s 
But not in Queft of ufelefs Treafures now. 
Not in the trembling Mother's Arms to feize 
The ftirieking Daughter with adult'rous Hand^, 
They menace Death by cruel Famine pref^ 
All other Luft but Aliment is loft. 
Their Search is for a Morfcl, haply hid. 
No Rack, no Torture does their Fury fpare 
To force their Hofts to brbg their OfTals forth* 



HENRIADE. 219 



A Wotn^ji : He^v'n, mtift ft^ch a Tale be told 
In future Times ? A Woman had been r d)'d 
By thefe Barbarians of her laft of Food 
Hard Face had left her Nothing but a Son, 
A Child, for lack of Suftenance, as near 
As She herfelf to Death s this harmlefs Babe 
She feis^es with a Dagger in her Hand. 
The Boy to meet her fond Embrace held out 
His litde Arms ; his Teodernefs^ his Voice, 
His Smiles, his Hunger, and his Infani-Charms, 
Diflblye her Fury in a Flood of Tears. 
Shfe gazes on him with diftraded Eye, 
Mixture of Lov?, Regret, Companion, Ri^;. 
Thrice dropt the Dagger froqi her fainting Hand, 
But Rage prevailed at laft, with trembling Voice, 
Detefting Hymen and his Fruit, She faidi 
Dear wretched Babe, whom in my Womb I bore. 
Vain w^ the Life I gave, if loft fo foon, 

A 



220 HENRIADE. 

A Sacrifice to Famine or the Sword. 

Why (hou'dft thou live to wander in the Streets 

Of Paris^ and amidft her Ruins cry ? 

Dye e'er my Mifery and thine thou know'ft ^ 

The Being and the Blood I gave give back. 

And let my Body be thy Birth and Grave ; 

At leaft let Paris a new Crime behold. 

Thus (peaking, in the Babe's dear Breaft She plung'd 

The Steel, with Fury and with Famine mad. 

Then to the Chimney bore the bleeding Corpfe, 

And greedily prepared the dreadful Meal. 

The Soldiers, whom the Scent of Food aetrads. 

Swift to refearch the guilty Houie return, 

Contefting by their Speed, who firft (hall eat. 

In Joy as cruel as a rav'nous Bear, 

Or hungry Lion bounding on his Prey, 

Again they force the Door. But Oh Surprize ! 

Oh Horror ! near the bloody Corpfe they fpy 

A Woman, with wild Look, devouring TltHeu 

Yes, 



H E N R I AD E. 221 

Yes, Icis my Son, ye Monfters, my own Son, 
She cries, and in his Blood you fteep'd my Hands^ 
Be Son and Mother both your Food, ye Fiends ! 
What fear you more than I, was I fb deaf 
To Nature's Call, and do you hear her Voice ? 
What Horrors, Me beholding, feize your Souls? 
Tygers, fuch.Fcafts for fiich as you are fit. 
Thus fpeaking, furious in her Breaft (he ibikes 
The Dagger J in a Fright the Soldiers flye. 
Nor longer on thatHoufe accurft dare look. 

« 

They fear the Heav'ns will on their Heads rain Fire, 
The People frighted at this Woman's Fate, 
Lift up their Hands, and beg of Heav'n to die. 

Soon^id the Rumour reach the Royal Tents, 
Touch the icing's Heart, his yearning Bowels wound, 
And o'er the miferable Town He weeps. 
Oh Thou, he cries, the Searcher of all Hearts, 
And what I can, and what I dare, who know'ft; 

Divide^ 



222 H E N R I A D E. 

Divide^ Oh Godj the Leaguers Caufe froai'txf ine. 

Bewailing thtfe Calaimiucs^ to thee 

I can in Innocence lift up my Hiindd. 

Thou know'ft, to thefe Rebellious I have oft 

Held out an Arm of Peaoe> and do not thou 

To tM imputetheir Cruelties ahd'Crimes, 

To me the.Vidims to their Fury vbwU 

If Mdyuei Nemours^ Pistteve^ MendozakvA 

My Pcopk^ithout Pity to their Graves; 

By Faminci Sword, by ev'ry Pcft of War, 

Tyrants are they, thbir Father lihou'd be. 

I am their. Father, and 'tis mine to feed 

My Children^— But fhou'd they againft me turn 

My Benefits ? Shou'd I to fave them lofe 

My Crown ? Coft ivhat it will they muft be ||y*d 

Spite of themielves, from thefe devouring Wolves, 

Their real Foes, I muft my People fave. 

If Empire is in too much Pity lofti 

Let this at leaft be read upon my Tombt 

5« Henrj 



H E N R I A D E. 223 

" Henry to Rcbcl-Subjefts Gcn'rous Foe, 

'< To fave them rather cfaoie, than over them to rdlgo. 

He faid, and at bis.Word the^Royal Hoft 
Approach without Alarm the famifli'd Town. 
They menace not the League with new Afl^t^ 
But come as FellowrSubjefts^ and as Friends. 
So wills the King» and fo his .Troops obey. 
They talk no more ^ Vengeance, but with Mien 
Complaifant, footh the Citizen's Defpain 
Wjith livid Lips and trembling Limbs they crowd 
The Walls, amaz'd to fee th' Aflailants march- 
In Pace and Ai(pe£t mild, Prefage of Peace^ 
To thefe, like Spectres, are the lifelefs Crew, 
Such as Magiciana in old Times were wont 
To raife, reUi^nt, from the Realms of Night. 
When from, the Banks oi.Leth^s pitchy Lake, 
The wandring. Ghofts with Voice abhor'd they callU 



How 



224 H E N R I AD E, 



How did Aftoniihment and Joy traofporc 
Thefe dying Wretches, when they faw dicir Foes 
Qfier, inftead of ftarving them, to feed } 
Their Leaders rack them as they pleas'd, and rob^ 
Their Periecutors pity and relieve. 
Scarce can they truft in what they fee and hear. 
Before them they behold thofe dreaded Spears, 
Thofe Swords, and various Inftruments of Death, 
Inverted in their Ufe, and moving now 
To bring them Life, to bring them Food and Friends. 
Are thefe, fay they, thofe Monfters, Is Bourbm^ 
That Enemy to God, io painted by our Priefis ? 
Ah, He's like Heav'n beneficent and Rind, 
The (hining Image of the King of Kings, 
A Model for all Monarchs; worthleis We 
Under the Laws of fuch a Prince to live. 
Triumphant be forgives, offended he relieves. 
Ah, cou'd we with our Blood his Pow'r cement» 

Too 



HENRIADE. 225 

Too worthy of die Death, from which we 're {av'd 
By his compaffiofiating Heart and Hand, 
Can we for hkn^ who do's ib much for us, 
Refufe to iacrifice the Lives he gives? 



Such was die Language of their Hearts, but wha 
Can of the Many fix the ficMe Mind ? 
Their Friendfiiip in vain Words evaporates^ 
Weak in its Birth, as feon as born it dies. 
The Prieftsj who& lewd Harangues an hundred times 
Have 6t their Country in a Blaze, appear 
In foleoui Pomp againft the Palm of Peace. 
Why bear you Arms without a Heart to ufe. 
Why without Virtue are you Chriftians call'd ? 
By what bafe Arts feduc'd, what fieftdy Veii 
Hides from your Eyes the Martyr's glorious Crown ? 
Are you not Soldiery of the Living God ? 
And fear you fw your heav'nly King to die f 
Fear you not rjith^c to defy his Wrath? 



126 HENRIADK 

Will you renounce the Joys of Paradicc, 
And for a Tyrant's Pardon, forfeit Hea v'ns ?. 
He'll force you to confefs his impious Faith. 
Take you his Gifts, but to deftroy him ufe, . 
Let us the Rights of Mother-Church defend. 
And fave her ffpni ithe. Rape of Hereticks. 
Thus fpoke the'Prieifts^' and their Fanatick Voice, 
The Rabbie's MiftreS,^ anditJie Dread of Kings, 
Silenc'd the Voice of Bourbori% Benefits, 
And fome refuming their fufpended Rage, 
Condemned themfelves fcr holding Life of Hiim. 



Maugqe their Qamours, and their odious Crics^ 
Henrf^ tranfcendent Virtues reach'd the Skies. 
Le^isy who from his Seat celeftial ey'd 
TRie Bourbofis fpringing fronpi his Root divine. 
Knew that the Accomplifliment of Time was now. 
To bring, loft Sheep, within the Shepherd's Eold^ 
His Son, adopted by the King of; KiDgj, 



< » 



H E N R I A D E. 217 

His Heart from Fear deliv^sr'd and Alarms, 
His Eyes, by Sorrow moiften'd, dry*d by Faithj 
Full of fwcct Hope, and of Paternal Love, 
His Stepi Wfere guided to th' Eternars Feet. 



/ 



Amid a Blaze of pure and laftibg Fife, 
The HIgheft fix'd before the Birth of Time 
His ftarry Throne, Stability the Bafe. 
Beneath his Feet is Heav'n 5 th'iEthereal Orbs. 
Declare him to the wondVing Univerfe, 
By radiant Circles regularly whirKd. 
PuilTance, Love and Knowledge infinite 
United and divided form his Eflence. 
His Saints with beatifick Vifion blefti 
In fweet Fruition of Eternal Peace, 
Are born away with Torrents of Delights* 
Full of his Glory and Himfelf, they hymn 
His Praife, their PKafure, and their fole Employ; 

ft 

This God, his Majefly offended, oft 

Q^a Vials 



izS H E N R IJD K 

Vials of Vengeance upon Nations pour^^ 

But always on the Juft propitious looks. 

His Arm out-ftretches to him, when he walksr 

On Precipices, and forbids his Fall, 

His Virtue by Adverfity refines j 

He fights for hi» Defence, and marches by his S^d^* 

The Sire of the Bourbons prefents himfelf 
Before him, and widi trembling UttVance ipeaks^ 

Father of th' Univcrfe, if e'er thou deign'ft 
To caft thy Eyes on People, and on Kings, 
Behold the French, rebellious to their Prince, 
Who, to be faithful to thee, break thy Laws^ 
Who difobeyjthee, blinded by their Zeal, 
And think, when they betray thee, they Feveogd. 
Behold that Ring triumphant. Great m War^ 
The Terror of Mankind, and the Delight. 
With fo much Virtue haft thou form'd his Hearty 

In 



H E N RI AD E. 229 

til £rror*s Labyrinth to let it ftray ? 

Muft the mod perfed Work thy Hand e'er wrought 

Bring thee no Sacrifice but criminal ? 

Ah, if thy Worihip's to Btmrbon unknown^ 

Who then fliall worfhip thee ? Oh King of Rings! 

Deign to illuminate a virtuous Heart, 

Created for the Knowledge of thyiel£ 

Give France a Mafter, and the Church a Soa) 

Confound the vain Devices of the League. . 

Render the King his Sulgefts, render them 

Their King, united let all Hearts adore 

Thy Jufticc, in one Worfhip all unite. 



Th* Eternal Gracious heard his pious Pra/r, 
And with a Word the fuppliant Saint aflur'd. 
Tremble the Stars at his tremendous Voice, 
Earth leaps, the Leaguers fhudder, and the Kin^' 
Who puts his Truft in Heav'n, is full of Faith, 
That Heav'p will be his Help in all his Needs. 

Sudden 



23<i H E N R I AD E: 



Sudden the long-expeded BlefHog, Truth; 
So dear to Men, and oft fo little known^ 
Defcended from the Skies to Henrys Tents,- 

Hid , in a Veil at firft, bvt by Degrees 

» < • 

That Veil withdrawn, before his Eyes She ftood^^ 
Confeft, and with Celeftial Beauty charm'd- 
Ne'er had his E)fes fuch Brightncfe fccn till then,' 
He faw, he knew, he lov'd th' Immortal LighL 
The Leflbns of Seducers he renounced. 
Their new delufive Dogmes fincere abjured. 
The Church acknowledged^ militant on Earth, 
The Church one always, in all Places Gx% 

Free, but fubjefted to a fovereign Chief, 

« 

Adoring in the Happinefs of Saints 

The Greatnefs of her God, whofe Son belov'dj 

Chrift, for our Sins a willing Sacrifice, 

■ 

The Living Food of his Eleft, defcendsi 
And on an Altar to his woad'ring Eyes 



In 



H E N R I A jy E. 231 

In Bread ^ God difcovers, but 'tis Bread 

No more - The King's obedient Heart fubmits. 

And Faith receives what Reafon cou'd not rcack 

.. JLewiSy the peaceful Olive in his Hand, 
From Heav*n revifits his enlighten'd Son, 
And leads him to the Rampiers. At his Voice 
The Ihaking Rampiers open Paflage free. 
He enters in the Name of God, by whom 
Kings reign, Amaz'd the Leaguers quit their Arms, 

Fall at their Sov'reign'^ Feet, and bath them widi 

». 

their Tears. 
The Priefts arc mute, and frighted the Sixteen^ 
Who fain wo\i'd hide their Heads in diftant Caves. 
The People are no more the fame, AH now 
Their King, their Conqueror, their Father own. 
Above all Reigns is bleft his happy Reign, 
Too late as it begins, it ends too foon. . 
Spain trembles, Rome difarm'd adopts Bourbon. 

Rome 



232 H E N R I AD E. 

ttm' is at lift, whcR bated once, belov'd. 
Di/corJ niOMn in eternal N^t, 
Maym ii reduced to own his ^ghtfbl Prince 
And yielding, with his Provinces, his Hear^ 
Proves the Beit Siiljea.iDtheBeftaf Kup. 



PINTS. 



( 233 )' 



NOTES. 



i I SING the Hero 

B Henry IV. of France^ Son oiJn-i 
S tbony King of Navarre, who de- 
W Icended in a direft Line from iio- 
sl ^fr/ Gjunt iif Clermont, youngeft 
Son of Lewis IX. or St. Lewis, King of France. 
The Pofterity of his eldeft Son Philip the Bold, 
failing in Henry III. King of France, three hun- 
dred Years after the Death of St, Lewis, Henry 
of Bourbon became Heir to the Crown, as dcfcen- 
ded from the abovemention'd Count de Clefmontj 
who married Beatrix, Daughter of jfgms de Bour- 
hn. Heir oS Arcbemhaud, Lord of Bourben, in the 
Middle of* the thirteenth Century. 

! ^^oMayne,^i&^ League, and jiroudlhsrla. tarn* d, 
Charles iJuke de Mayne, Brother of Henry 
buke de Guiji, who form'd the League, a Fac- 
tion in France ; who under Pretence of the Dan- 
ger of the Church, made Head againft Henry llh 
King of France, and after that King's Death 
R i^nft 



234 NOTFS, 

againft Henry of Bourbon^ who obtained great Ad- 
vantages over tht Spaniards or IberianSy in Con- 
federacy with the League. 

' GodJffs jtvert ! Tb^^ Truths /Now implore. 

I doubt not the Now there will he taken for 
a CbevilU^ as the French term it, fomcthing to fill 
up the Line, like Straw or Paper in Package ; 
but it is in ^ OriginaU 7^ fimfhre mjeurdbwfj 
which I obferve to caution the Reader not to be 
too ralh in cenfuring me for my Author. 

* Then reigned y^lois, 

Henry III. of France defcendcd from Charles 
Count de ValoiSj younger Brother to Philip the 
Fair, King of France, Philip VI, of France, 
farnam*d otFalois^w^s the firft King of this Branch -, , 
and his Sucfccflion occafionM the long Wars in 
the Reign of Ed^^ard III. King of England, 
who in Right of his Mother Ifabel, Sifter and 
Heir to Charles the Fair, claimM the Crown of 
France, and the Houfe of PlanPagenet were kept 
out of their Right by the Houfe of Vdois, who 
reignMfrom the Year 1326, to 1589 j in all, 263 
Years, 

^ When the North cait'd him 

Henry de Valms, or Henry IIL of France, had 
made himfelf fo femous before he was King, and 
before he was twenty Years of Age, that the Poles 
thought . him worthy of their Crown » but, iays 
Bayle, they foon repented. 

^. ^eluSf 5/.» Maigrin, Jayenfe^ Epernon^ 

Favourites to Hemry III. of France, who was 
fo much govern'd by them, that Mezerai calls 
his Reign, the Reign of FavourUcs. 

^elus^ 



NOTES, i235 

^eluSy Marquis de^ of Note chiefly for being 
l^'avourite to Henry III., and for a Duel he fought 
with the Marquis d^Entragues, whofe Second was 
Monfieur de Schomberg. And this was the firft 
Tirne, Anno 1 57% y that Seconds fought. 

St. Maigrin^ Caujfade de St. Maigrtn^ a Gentle- 
man of BourdMs. He became one of the King^s 
greateft Favourites, purely on account of his 
Beauty. He was {o impudent, as to boaft he 
had lain with the Dutchels of Guife, to revenge 
which Affront, the Duke de Mayne, and othef 
Kindred and Friends of the Duke of Guifey fell 
upon him one Night as he was coming out of the 
Houvre, and murder 'd him. The t)nkQdeMayne 
was faid to be known by his Hand, like a Shoul- 
der of Mutton. 

Joyeufe. The Duke de Joyeufiy on whofe Wed- 
ding, Varillas fays, this King fpent four Millions 
of Livres to do him Honour, and fliew. how much 
he lov*d him. We Ihall fpeak inore of him in 
the Sequel. 

Epernon. So great a Favourite, that he was 
ftird limply Monfieur at the Court of Henry III. 
notwithftanding that King's Brother the Duke 
SfAlencon was then living, and the Stile of M?»- 
fieur belonged only to the Son or Brother of the 
King. He was the firft of his Family, La Valette^ 
that had the Title of Epernon , from the Place 
which he purchased. He was haughty, covetous, 
and oftentatious, and efcapM fo many Hazard^, 
that the Vulgar believ'd he was aflifted by fotue 
Demon. 

7 Mean wbiU the GmSss • 

Francis Duke de Guife and his Sons, Henry Duke 
de Guife J the Dukes de Mayne; and d^Aumale. 

R2 »?i 



236 NOTES, 

• To bis Face 

A fes yeux in the Original. 

9 Now to the Walls of Paris 

Henry III. of France, and flenry King of Na- 
varr£^ laid Siege to rariSy which the Leaguers 
held out againft them. 

*<» Eirrdfpe interefted. VEurtpe interejfee. 

1 quote the French here, and in other Places, 
to (hew that if the Phrafe is Profaick^ Mn Foltain 
is to anfwer for it. 

" 5^/J, Proteftants, and Papflls. 

!* Tibtf Father of the Bourbons, 

$t. Z/tw> or J^ii, die ninth King of France. 

'J Pitying; bis Errors. 

Mr. Voltaire is pleased fo to term the Proteftant 
Religion, notwithftanding he was fo well recei- 
ved in a Proteftant Kingdom. Upon which fee 
what a French Author, or an Englijh Man who 
wrote in French^ writes : On le recoit a bras ou- 
verts. He was received here with open Arms \ the 
Court made bim Prefents^ and Perfons of the greed- 
efi ^ality encouraged the Imprejion of bis Book^ 
it was who Jbould contribute mofi towards ity from 
the higheji to the loweft. I think after thisj no body 
Jbould charge the Englifli with being inhojpitable to 
Strangers. Suppofe an Englifliman Jhould go to 
France with a Book againft Popery^ wherein be 
treated the Romifli Religion as erroneous^ Can one 
ima^incj that the Cardinal de Fleury would take 
him into bis Houfe? This Critick was a Hugonot^ 
or pretends to be fo, in other Places. 

!4 fVben 



NOTES, 237 

'* When Vdois to Bourbon 

He calls Henry III. Valois, and Henry IV. Bour- 
bon. 

*^ yiovmy^shi^fole Companion^ his hefi Friend^ 

Monfieur 4ie Pleffi Mornay^ one of the greateft 
Men of his Times, whether with regard to his 
Piety, his Virtue, his Learn,ing, his Capacity or 
Courage. The Poet here breaks in terribly upon 
the Truth of Hiftory . Henry of Navarre never 
came to England^ but he did ind^ced fend Mon^ 
fieur Mornay to Queen Elizabeth^ to defire Suc- 
cours during the Siege of Paris. Mornay did 
not then fucceed in his Negociarion j and the Ba- 
ron de Maurier^ in his Hiftory of die Princes of 
Orange^ gives a very odd Reafon for it, that Mon- 
fieur Mornay having carried to England with hin> 
one Mr. BazenvalU the latter took the Liberty to 
rally the Queen for fpeaking ill French^ particu- 
hrly paar Bieu^ 3,nd paar ma Foi^ infteadof /^r; 
Which being told the Queen, Ihe took fuch an 
Averfion to Bazenvally that on that Account on- 
ly the Negociation mifcarriedatt!hatTime, which 
probably is not true. But this Circumftance con- 
firms what we read in other Hiftories, that Queen 
Elizabeth wou'd fwear, when provok'd to Paflion. 
Monfieur Mornay was fent by the King of Na- 
varre to Henry HI. King of France^ to procure 
Favour for the Proteftants. He wrote feveral 
learned Trads againft the Papifis\ particularly 
againft the famous Coefeteau^ whom he refuted. 
His Book of the Eucharift is reckoned unanf\frer- 
able by the Hugonots. He iiad a very fine Li- 
brary, which at his Death he gave to the Uni- 
verfity of Saumur. Vajfor fays of him, je nefcay 
yU fe trouve un GentUbomme comparable a celuici. 

R 3 I know 



«38 



NOTES. 



I know no Gentleman to be compared to him. 
And indeed the French Critick is of Opinion, 
that Mornay is properly the Hero of the Henriade. 

l^ Dieppe offers to bis EyeSy 

A Port of France oppofite to Rye in SuJJhc. It 
was almoft deftroy'd by Bombardment, in King 
Wllltam^s War with France. 

»7 Ev^ry where will be thought another CbevUle^ 
or Botch, but it is the literal Verfion of far teut. 

ftbusj hut lefs GenWous^ fid the Roman Chief. 

When Cafar Was polled at Apolloma in Epirus^ 
waiting for his Forces from Bruudufium^ he en- 
tered on a dangerous Entcrprize to go in a Veflel 
of 1 2 Oars to that Port, though the Sea was co« 
ver'd with fomfef^ Fleet, He embark'd in the 
Night-time in the Habit of a Skive, and throw* 
ing himfelf down like fome inconftderahle Fellow, 
lay along at the Bottom of the Veflel, The Ri- 
ver Linus was to carry them down to Sea ; and 
there us*d to blow every Morning a ffentle Gale 
from the Land, which nude it very calm toward? 
the Mouth of the River, by driving the Waves 
forward; but that Night there blew a (bong 
Wind from the Sea, which over-power*d that from 
the Land \ fo that betwixt the Violence erf* the 
Tide, and theRefiftance of the Waves againfl it, 
the River was very rough, and fo dangerous, that 
the Pilot could not make good his Pa0age, but 
order -d his Sailors to tack about, Cafar upon 
this difcovcrk himfelf, and taking the Pilot by 
the Hand, who was furpriz*d to fee him there, 
fa id. Go on boldly j my Fwtendy and fear nothings 
thou carriejl Cspj&jr and. bis Fortune aUng wiih ^ee. 



NOTES. 239 

■* Its very being awing to Caprice. 

We faw it born^ and we Jhall fee it dye. 

The Criticks condemn Monfieur VoUaire for 
putting a falfe Prophefy in the Mouth of this 
popifh Hermit, when there was no Occafion for 
it, and a Poet who wrote 150 Years after the 
Thing prophefied of, Ihould have foretold no-, 
thing but what had come to pafs-, as the Perver- 
fion of Henry IV. He ^was to be a true Prophet 
there. Cela n^efioxt fas difficile a deviner ; il cban- 
geoit de Religion corftme de Maitrejfe. That was not 
difficult to foretel \ he chang'd his Religion as he 
did his Miftrefs. As to the Caprice of the Rrfor^ 
ptation, he fays, J* applique ces Vers au Paptfme^ 
&c. / apply tbefe Verfes to Popery. For neither St. 
Paul, nor St. John, nor St. Peter, ever /aid Mafsj 
nor prayed to the Dead^ nor had ImageSj tior knew 
auricular Confejfton^ nor Tranfubjiantiation^ &c. all 
which owe their Being to Man^s Caprice. But the 
Being of /A^reform'd Religion is owing to the Sim- 
plicity of the primitive Times, which is proved at 
large in my Hiftory of Chrijiianity^ now ready for 
the Prefs. 

'9 That bloody Theatre 

Alluding to the Wars between the Houfes of 
Tork and Lancafter for the Crown of England^ as 
well as to the Civil Wars, fo finely delineated in 
Clarendon's Hiftory. 

^ By Intereji divided j 

Divi/es d^ Int£ret^ reunis par la loy. 

A Year and Half was not long enough , i; 
feems, for Monfieur Voltaire to know the Nature 
of our Conftitution^, by which the three Eftates 
of Parliament have fuch a Dependency one upon 

R 4 the 



J40 N TE S', 

the other, that their Interefts are infeparable, anc[ 
indeed are but one Intereft, which in other Words 
is that of the Commonwealth. The French Re- 
marker thinks this Image of England the fined in 
the firft Canto •, and it may be fo, without being 
admirable, as he terms it, that of the Hermit ha- 
ving many Defefts in it ; and there is no other 
Fainting in the Canto. 

^ He fees the Tow^r by Britain'^ Conqueror huilt. 

It is fabled by fome, that Julius Cafar built 
the Tower of London ; others fey, he only built 
the Habile Tower, which is equally falfe : Nor is it 
more certain that William the Norman built that- 
White Tower, as fome Authors write. But it is 
fupposM that he firft built a Citadel where the 
Tower now ftands. Queen Elizabeth, and other 
Princes before htr, made it often the Place of 
their Rcfidence. 

** ^h ! Madam, muji I call to Mind 

Taken from Virgil ; 
Jnfandum, Regina, jubes remvare dolorem. 

Thus tranflated by Mr. Dryden, 

-Great ^een, what you command me to relate. 
Renews the fad Remembrance of our Pate. 

« 

Which does not feem to have in it the Spirit of 
the Original, no more than Segraifs Verfion. 

^le ton Commandement, incomparable Reine^ 
Renouvelle en mon cceur une cruelle peine. 

A cruel Pain, incomparable Queen, 

What you command does in my Heart renew. 

f^ir^il literally, 

Greai 



NOTES. a4i 

Great Siueen^ you hid my cruel Grief renew. ' 

The Liberty of the two other Verfions war- 
rants all that I have taken in the Tranflation of the 
Henriade. 

*' JVhat was this Medicis, you may demand. 

Catharine de Medicis was'Daughter of the Duke 
of Florence^ and Niece to Pope Clement VII. She 
was married to, Henry then Duke of Orleans^ af- 
terwards Henry II. of France^ at the Interview 
of Marfeilles in 1533. That Pope mtt Francis!. 
there on this Occafion. Henry his Son being but 
fourteen Years old, his Father would have had 
the Confummation of the Marriage deferred two 
or three Years, but the crafty Pope fearing if the 
Duke died before the Marriage was confiimmated, 
the King of France would fend his Niece back to 
Italy^ fo managed it, that there were fufficient 
Proofs of the Confummation. Des Marques cer-- 
tainesy fays Varillas^ and Paulus Jovius -, ex Fir- 
gine mulierem prima noSle reddiderat. The Duke of 
Orleans and Catharine de Medicis^ were of the 
jame Age, about fourteen Years, with only four- 
teen Days Difference. 

*^ Her Hujband dying in bis Prime of Life. 

Her Hufband Henry II. was kill*d by the Count 
de Montgomery in a Tournament, June 13. 1559. 
Almoft all Accounts given of this Queen, except 
Brantome's^ agree in her Charafter, that Ihe was 
vicious, cruel, intriguing, ambitious. Brantome 
begins her Eulogy with faying, that the Houfe of 
Medicis was one of the moft illuftrious in Chrt- 
fiendom^ and tells us the Origin of it in a Manner 
that cannot but divert the Reader. When Bren- 
nus the Gaul over-ran Italy and Greece, about 50a 

Year^ 



242 NOTES. 

Years before Chrift, he had in his Army two 
French Gentlemen'^ they are Monfieur Brantonu^^ 
own Words, the one nam*d Felonius^ the other 
Bono^ who abhorring Brennus^s Defign to rob 
the Temple of Delpbds^ left him, and pafs*d into 
yijia with their Ships and Men, where they car- 
ried on their Conquefts as far as the Countries of 
the Medes and Perjians \ after which, they re- 
turned to Europe^ and coming into lialyy on their 
Way home to France^ Felonius flopped in that 
Part of it, where now ftands Florence on the Ri- 
ver jirno i and having obtained many great Vic- 
tories in the Country of the Medes^ his Compa- 
nions call'd him Medicus \ juit, iays Brankme^ as 
Paulus was call'd Macedqnkus^ for conquering 
Perfeus King of Macedon^ 300 Years after •, and 
from that very fame Medicus defcended the Fa- 
mily of Medicis at Florence. Bono-hyixXt Benonia. 
Such Hiftory as this is made as well in a Dream, 
as out of it ; and notwithftanding it was gravely 
mentioned by an Archbifhop in a Funeral Sermon 
on this Queen, 'tis hardly good enough for School* 
boys or their Mafters. 

** A Slave to Pleafurey to Ambition more. 

She kept young Girls about her on purpofe to 
tempt the Princes, and by that Means to get out 
of them their Defigns. She brought fome of 
them with her to the Conference at St. BriSy where 
afking the King of Navarre what be would have ? 
Nothing tbere^ faid he, pointing to her Maids; 
though he did not want Love for the Ladies at o* 
ther Times. Two of her Maids of Honour were 
brought to Bed in two Years. Madan) de Lune- 
ville was delivered in her Wardrobe. A French 
Author fays of this Queen, " Her Maids of Ho- 
** nour had the beft Time, in the World. . They 

" enjoy'd 



NOTES. 243 

«« enjoy'd all the Pleafures of Matrimony with 
^* as much Credit as if they abftain'd from them, 
*' provided they had the Dexterity or Induftry to 
^' prevent being with Child. As the haceaenuh 
** mans did not punifli the Theft, but the Difco- 
** very of itj fo this Queen did not turn away 
** her Maids for being with Child, but for letting 
** it be known. 

*^ A Bigot to the Se5l which fie hetray*d. 

The Colloquy of Poijfy was held by her Coni- 
mand, andfhe, her Son the King, the Princes of 
the Blood, and the great Court Lords, aflifted at 
it. Theodore Beza was the chief Speaker for the 
ProteftantSy and he fpoke with great Force and 
Eloquence, as may be feen in Ramus'^ Account of 
that Colloquy. Beza^ among other Things, faid, 
^bat Chriji^s Body was as far from Breads and 
Wine^ as Hiaven is from Earth. The Bifhops. 
made a great Noife, crying out, he UafphenCd \ 
and Cardinal Tournon^ Dean of the Cardinals, de- 
fir*d the Queen to filence Bexa^ which fhe would 
not do. And probably this is what is referred to 
here. Maimbourg fays, Herejy enter*d in Tri- 
umph the Palaces of the moil Chriilian Kings, 
to efbbliih there the Throne of her Empire ; and 
one may fay, it was then that fhe exercis'd a full 
and entire Dominion, fupported by the Authori- 
ty of the two firft Princes of the Blood, Navarre 
and Conde^ and the Favour of the Queen, who 
however had as deep a Hand as any one, in the 
Maffacre of Paris. Maimbourg adds, " The 
♦« Queen not pnly permitted the Minifters to 
^* preach in the Royal Apartments of the Prin- 
** ces, whither the Country crowded to hear 
f ' them i while the poor Monks preached to the 
^^ Walls; But -fhe her felf, with the principal 

♦' Ladies 



24+ NOTES, 

" Ladies of the Court, aflifted at the Sermons of 
*« the Bifliopof Valence^ who preach'd the Doc- 
«* trines of Luther and Calvin.^* This was about 
the Year 1561. when the Colloquy of Potffy was 
held, Varillas fays it was procurM by means of 
the Cardinal of Lorraine^who did it out of Vani- 
ty to fhew his Learning and Eloquence ; in which 
Theodore Beza was, however, more than a Match 
for him : Yet the latter faird not to extol the Car^ 
dinal in an extraordinary Manner, and was him- 
felf cxtoU'd by the Caxdmal, with whom he con- 
ferred privately, 

John Caracioly Bifliop of Troye^ Son of the 
Prince of Melpbi^ Marefchal of France, affifting 
at this Colloquy, was fo well convinc'd of the 
Truth of the Proteftant Religion, by what he 
heard there from Beza, Martyr; and other re=- 
fornj'd Divines, that he quitted his Bifhoprick, 
and retained only the Charadter of a Prejhyter. 

*^ The feconi Francis 

Succeeded his Father Henry IL of France in the 
Year 1559. While he was Dauphin, he marri- 
ed Mary, Daughter and Heir to James V. King 
of Scotland, and Margaret of Lorrain, Sifter to 
Francis Duke de Guife. He reign'd two Years, 
and then died of Poifon, as was faid, given him 
a long Time before. 

^* The Guife'i were his Gods. 

Sons of Francis Duke de Guife. The DuKes^ 
Gmfe, de Mayne, and d^Aumale, before-mention- 
ed, governed all Things in this fhorr Reign, 

*9 Charles more a Child, 

Charles IX. Son of Henry IL and Catharine de 
Mcdicis, fucceeded his Brother Francis II. Jnnd 






NOTES. H5 

1561^ when he was about twelve Years of Age, 
his Mother being Regent during his Minority. 
Brantme fays a great many fine Things of him in 
his Life, but it is impoflible to give Credit to 
them, when he owns the deep Concern he had in 
the Butchery of St. Bartholomew. I ufe his own 
Expreffions, y fut plus ardent que tous. *' He 
•' was the hotteft of them all, infomuch that as 
foon as it was Day-light, he open'd the Win- 
dow of his Chamber, and feeing the Hugonot$ 
•* in theFauxbourg St. Germain running away from 
*« the Murderers, he took a Fowling Piece, load- 
*' ed it, and Ihot at them, as if they had been 
*« Game\ crying, as loud as he could, tuez^ tuezy 
•« kill, kill. Some Days after Admiral Coligny 
«' was maffacred, and carried to Montfaucon by 
*« the Mob, wh6 hang'd him on the Gallows 
«' there, by the Feet, the King went thither 
«« to fee that deteftable Speftacle ; and the Body 
«' beginnbg to corrupt, fome of the Courtier* 
*« held their Nofes, on Account of the Smell : 
*« Charles obferving it, faid, I don^t^ like ym^ bold 
•^ my Nofe^ for nothing is fo fragrant as the Smell 
^^ of a dead Enemy. Having caused Monficur 
<«• de Brunquemanty and Monfieur Cabagnes, to be 
«« hang*d in the Night-time, he ftood near the 
^^ Gallows, and had Flambeaux held up to the 
<* Faces of the dying Gentlemen, that he might 
*« delight himfelf with their Looks in the Ago- 
*' nies of Death.** All that Brantome fays to it 
is, Et que plufteurs ne trmverent beau ; which fe- 
veral thought was not handfomely done : Indeed 
nothing could be more brutal and bafe. 

Though this King had feveral Concubines, par- 
ticularly Mary Touchetj an Apothecary's Daugh- 
ter of Orleans^ and though we are aifur'd he died 
of a Diftemper contracted by amorous Embraces, 

7 yet 



I 
C€ 



246 NOTES. 

yet Mezeraij the beft Hiftorian the French halre^ 
affirms, he had an Averfion to Women. Bayk^s 
Reflexions upon it are juft and pleafant : *« So 
*' that we find he had three Miftreflcs befides his 
*^ wedded Wife •, and confidering he died before 
** he was twenty-four Years of Age, and after a 
*' long Sicknefs, and left two natural Children 
** behind him, one can't very well comprehend 
*' on what Bottom Mezerai founded that Saying 
•' of his. That be had an Averfion to Women, 
** Brantome^ who knew better, tells us, that ha- 
ving Commerce with his Queen during his Sick- 
neis, il sy echauffa tant qu*il en ahregm fesjaurs. 
** He heated binifelffi> that he Jhortetfd Ins Life by 

*^ itr 

i 

JO and War 

As fierce as Civil always is enfii^d. 

The very next Year after the Colloquy of Poif- 
fy. Brantome informs us, that the Dukes deGuifi 
and Nemours left the Court foon after it broke up, 
becaufe they fi w la nouvelle Religion entrer enfleur^ 
the new Religion flourifh'd there, upon whicft 
the Duke de Guife^ the Conftable Montmerenci^ 
and the Marefchal de St. Andrf^ who wer« ftil'd 
the triumvirate^ rais'd a Popifh Army, and fell 
upon the Proteftants in the Year 1562. when the 
firft War, on Account of Religion, commenced 
m France. 

3« Dreux firfi hebeld their fat d MnJ^ns fpread. 

The Battle of Dreux was fought in the Year 
1562. the femous Minifter Theodore Beza was in 
it. The Town of Dreux is fituated on the River 
Slaije, in the Chartrain or Neighbourhood of 
Chartresy about thirty Miles from Paris. *Tis 
fekl to be oMer than Chartres ; and Robbeprc- 
* tends 



^ 



NOTES. 247 

tend5 it takes its Name from the DrtddeSy but that 
is not the only Dream in his Geography oi France. 
The Mar^fchal de St. Andre^ one of the Trium- 
virate, was kill'd at this Battle of Dreux. Bran- 
tome fays he was taken Prifoner, and afterwards 
kill'd by one AuVtgny^ probably \ Scotfman ori- 
ginally, who thought, he had been injurM by him 
in a Procefs at Law. 

^* Old M (Mitmercncy, near the Tomb of RngSy 
A Leaden Deaibj a fFdrrkur^s Prefent^ met. 

Anne de Montmerency^ another of the Trium- 
virate. He was Conftable of France^ and fo zea- 
lous againft the Proteftants, that he in Perfon de- 
molifliM their Temples, and took Pleafure in 
making Bonefires of the Pulpits and Benches, for 
which they calPd him Captain Burn Bench. He 
was very aftive in the firft Wars againft the /&- 

foftots in the Regency of Catharine de Medicis. 
it was kill'd in the Battle of St. DeniSj 2l Town 
near Paris^ where the Kings of France halfe thq| 
Burying-Place, and Monuments, in the Abbey- 
Church. He was kill'd by one Stuart j of one of 
the nobleft Houfcs in Scotland^ who afterwards 
was barbaroufly murdered in cold Blood at the 
Inftance of the Marquis de VtUars. 

"The Leaden Death j the Plomb mortel^ rders to 
the Circumftance of his Death's Wound. *Tis 
faid this Mr. Stuart had Bullets of a particidlar 
Make, that would pierce Armour, which other 
Ball could not penetrate ; but this Story is, doubt- 
kf?, thus told, to do Honour to the Conftable, 
who was not to be kill'd by any common Means* 
The Conftable de Montmerency had been a great 
Favourite of Henry II. King of France ; but he 
loft his Favour by the Lofs of the Battle of St. 
^(eritin 5 and 'tis thought he would never feive 

reco- 



24^ 



Notts. 



recovered it, had it not been to fet him up a- 
gainft the GuiJe'Sy who were grown intolerably in- 
folent. However, he join*d with Guife in the 
Triumviraiey for the Deftruftion of the Hugotuas. 

5» yA Orleans Guife was Jlain 

Francis Duke of Guife was Son of Claude Duke 
of Guije^ Son of Rene Duke of Lorrain, He 
was Uncle to Mary Queen of Scots^ and began his 
intended Deftruftion oF the Protefcnts in France 
with the MaflGicrc at Vajfy^ where he fell upon 
them as they were finging Pfalms in their Tem- 
ple, and cut them to Pieces, notwithftanding an 
Edift had been lately publilh*d in their Favoun 
This bloody Attempt was about the latter End 
of the Year 1561. and opened the firft tragick 
Scene of the Wars and Slaughters in France on 
Account of Religion. Several loyal Papills fided 
with the HugonotSj when they-perceiv*d that this 
Duke of Guijij and his Son after him, made the 
Church only a Pretence. Their true Defign be- 
ing to ufurp the Kingdom, and fet afide the right 
Heirs in France \ and they were in a fair Way 
to fucceoi in it, if the Feather, Francis Duke oi 
Guife had not been ai&ifinated by Poltrot at Orte- 
ans^ in the iTear 1563. and the Son //if»ryDukc 
of Guife had not been put to Death at Blois^ by 
Command of Henry III Anno 1588. 

34 ^y wretched Fatherly 

Anthony King of Navarre^ Father of HenryVT. 
King of France and Navarre. He married Jeanne 
d^jmrety in whofe Right he was King of Navarre4 
She was a Lady of great Wit, from whom 'tis 
thought her Son Henry IV. King of France^ in- 
herited the fame Talent, his Father Anthony de 
Bourbon being not endowed with it. He was a 

weak 






NOTES, 249 

weak inconftant Prince, fometimes favouring the 
Proteftants, and fometimes fighting againft them. 
He received his Death's Wound in the Trenches 
before Roan^ then in Proteftant Hands, when the 
Papifts befieged it. Anno 1562. 

" Conde, Myfelf^ bis Brother's only Son^ 

The Prince of Conde was Brother to Anthony 
de Bourbon^ King of Navarre^ Father of this 
Henry de Bourbon^ a Prince of a very ordinary 
Chamften 

^^ Ah I ftill mourn^ and ever Jh alt I mourn 
His Murder by a vile AJfaJJin^ s Hand. 

'Twas at the Battle of Jarnac^ Anno 1569. 
where the Prince of Conde was taken Prifoner by 
Monfieur ^Argentee^ to whom he furrender'd him- 
felf, as he was about being taken by one ^pzier ; 
foon after came up the Baron Montefquiouy Cap- 
tain of the Duke ivAnjou*s Swifs Guards, who afk- 
ing who the Prifoner was, and being told the 
Prince of Conde, he cry*d. Kill him, kill him^ 
and with a horrible Oath fired his Piftol, and (hot 
him dead •, for which good Service, he was, not 
long after, made a Marefchal of France, though 
he deferved a Halter much more than a Batoon^ 
Quarter having been given to the Prince, by Rsh 
zier and Argent ee. 

Ah I ftill mourn. 'Tis literal, 

Je fleure encore, 6? pleurerai toujour s. 

37 / (me him. Madam, All, the Debt I own \ 
If this is Profe, Voltaire is accountable for it. 

Je luy dois tout, Madame^ il faut queje Pavoue. 

S '^ fVbatever 



?So NOTES. 

58 Whatever Rome has in my Deeds efie.ew?d^ 
Si Rome d fiuvent eftime mes ^p^plats. 

Tiie £i)3eem he met with at RrniCj did not hin-* 
der Anathemas being denounc'd agaiiUl him thene, 
and this Vcrfc might very well have i)een omit- 
ted. 

5' Mofi Grand^ and mqfl redoubted in D^feats^ 

Hgi ipojfcks of J^Jpr de CoHgny^ Admiral of 
France^ the greateft, but not moft fortunate, 
Capuin of the Age he liv'd in. It was remark- 
able in him, that he had fcarce ioft one Army be- 
fore he had another ready to oppofe his Enemies. 

^ Which ndtber Q2Sk,Qii wcr-Duoois coi^i haaft 

Two famous Warriors of France^ GaftondeFm 
G^;neral of the French Army in Italy^ in the Reign ^ 
qI Charles VIII. the Count de Dunais f^naUz'd 
bimfelf in the Wars againft the Et^lijhy in the 
Reign of Charles VII. His Charafter is fo illuf- 
trioi^s, that he is one of Ch^lain^& chief Heroes 
in his Poem La Pucelk: Hie; makes hiofi in Lpve 
with Joan £Arc^ the Maid of Orlea^S;, the Hnvini 
9lf his Poem, as by thefe mifer^ble Verfi^: 

• -'—^Cvnjiimns nous d^me Flame fihelky 
Brulons en hohcaufte auxyeux de la Pucelk. 

Let us^ confuming in fo fair a Flame j 
Fall a burnt Sacrifice to her bright Eyes. 

ft 

♦• Ten Tears in winning and in hftng fpentj 

The fifft War between^ the Prot^ftants and Pa* 
pifts^ brcJkc out in the Year i5^. und the lifci* 
facre of Paris was in the Year 1572, 

^ His Sifter Ivnift wc&y 

Margaret 



. Ji4affgara of FMsj Da^ughter of /&«rj^ ll. amT 
Caibmn^ de Atkdicitj SiHer to Francis if. Carles 
IX. and /&;i^lIL ^d to &e the mofl: beautiful 
vmtyr^ and g^Uant Prkicefs ef her Time. She 
wag msirri&d to* jHif^ry King of NafOarte^ a fe^r 
Days before thd Maffacre\ and the Celebration of 
that SolenfUihy was the Pijetence to draw the F'rb-^ 
teftantLord* lOPnw, where their Throats were 
cut in the midft of their Security and Joy. 

This Princefs Margarit was » great Enem^ ta^ 
the Hugomu ; and as we' find very few of their 
Enemies to be Perfens of goojd Morals, (6 this,^ 
moft e»c^ltatt Cktholick is dius defcribM by M^;-' 
tserak ^ifej at Fauxbourg St. Germain, Jht 
kepi ber liirtc Courts This was after fhe had been* 
divorcM ftoito. Heftry IV. by her own Confent and^ 
Requeft, at kaft in Fornn where her Lifs was d 
tJbbmJicai Mixture of Volupttmfnefs and De^otion^ 
a iJwe of Letters and VanUy^ ofCbriJiian Charity 
and' InfuJHa. For as fhe valuta her felf upon bein^ 
iftenfeen atCbutcbj on her difiourjing with learned 
Men^ Md giving ^ Tenth cf her Revenues io tbel 
Monks^ j0 Jbe gloried in Gallantry and Intrigues^ 
inventing nevo Sports^ and Diverjipns , and^ in noi 
payit^ her BebPs. 

^ My AOather^s Death 

Jtantm dfjSbret^ Queen of Navdrre^ a Princefe 
of gdeat Piety, Wifdom, and Zeal, endowed with 
all myai and virtuous Qualities^ and a fteady R'o- 
teftaat. 

:♦♦ 0^ttb Hdrrorsyfuch asHelieotddfurmfhi winfdi 

This iiitroduces a Defcription of the MaffacrB 
in Paris J an Aftion which renders the French 
Name odious and abbminable to all Nations, and 
will fo rendtet it tQ ^ £nd of Time.^ for no Na- 

S i tion 



?S2 NOTE S. 

• • • • 

tion in fhc World has the like Infamy in Hiftoiy, 
It was contrived by the iQueen Regent, the Duke 
of Guife,, and the chief Popilh Lords at St. CUm^ 
a Palace »bo\it fix Mile3 from Paris, Of latter 
^^^s it has belonged to the Dukes of Orleans 
In the fame Palace, fevf ntecn Yeai* after, was 
rourder'd Henry III. of France^- wliofe Hands 
were deeply dipped in the Blood of f hat Butchery, 

f .Teligny, GaUantrmtb^ • 

'. His- Grandfjidierj Morifieur ie ftJigny^ w^s 
^oycrnour of the Dutchy ofMUoHj when it was 
in the Pofleflion of the French^ in Jthe Reign pf 
l^^s XII. His Father was Guidon to the Duke 
of Qrkans^ and this Mpnficur de Tekgny W rccr 
Ifoned one of the mpft accompliflied Gendejnw 
of his Time, both in Letters, and ia Arms,, 
frantome owns there were few of l\h Rank fur- . 
pafs'd him ; but he adds, he became, a zealotisi 
l^rptfftant^ which, however, was .to his Adyianr, 
cage: For be^ng a Perlbn of great Honour, and 
valued. as fuch by Admiral Cokgny^ he tppk him 
under his Tuition, and fo well tutor*<i him., that 
he was alike qualified for Aftion and Counfel, 
He alfo gave him his Daughter, a very, fine young 
Lady, in Marriage, who might have, matched 
higher, ttut.^he Admiral confiaer*d Merit more 
(haj; Fortune, Br^n^pme^^ddsy '^^ He was (lain 
f' at the N^aflacrc of St Barthdlomew^ and hi* 
" Death was a publfck Lbfs, as was^ the Death 
*' of others there murder'd." His Widow mar- 
ned afterwards the Prince of Otcange^^ and (he has 
the Jionon? to havp been Great-grandmother to' 
ffVliain ill. ICing of En^land^ of glorious Me- ^ 

mory. . 

f 9efmc -waiting for the ViSimintbe Cm^fx . 7 

Thi 



NOTES. 253 

This Ruffian was a German by Nation, bred up 
by the Duke de Guife ; and one may, without be- 
ing uncharitable, imagine that he was fp bred to 
be ready for fuch bloody Work. *Twas this 
Befine who broke open the Admiral's Chamber 
Door, and feeing him, cried. Art thou the Admi- 
ral ? Coligny faying, I am^ he ran him through 
the Body, and afterwards cut him crofs the Face 
with a Back-fword. Guife^ who waited in the 
Court below, cried out. Is the Buftnefs done?\. 
Befmeidid^ Tes \ and to prove it, flung the Body, 
that had ftill fome Breath in it, out of the Win- 
do3V ; but it hung by the Legs, till the Murder- 
er and his Affociates loofenM it, and let it fall to 
the Ground, where the Duke of Guife waited to 
feaft his Eyes with fo horrid a Speftacle. A Po- 
pifh Author writes, To tell what foul Language 
and Ipfults his Corpfe met with, is too fhocking for 
an honejl Man to read. Thcfe called him villainous 
Names, and infulted him when dead, who durfi not 
look him in the Face when he was living, and trem- 
bled only at Sight of him. His Head was immedi- 
ately cut off, and fent to the Pope, or King of 
Spain. Befme, the Aflaflin, was taken two or 
three Years after in Poitou, by a Party of Hugo- 
nots, who cut him to Pieces. He was related to 
the Houfe of Guife by his Marriage with the Baf- 
tard Daughter of the Cardinal of Loraine, a Po- 
pifli Bifhop. 
ft I affeft to infert only fuch hiftorical Paflages as 
^ are moft rare, and not to be met with in general 
Hiflrories ; as what follows. 

Henry Duke d*Anjou being chofen King of Po- 
land, in his Journey thither flopped at the Court 
of the Elector Palatine in Germany, the Year af- 
ter the Maffacre, where he met with a moll roy- 
al Entertainment, One Day the Eleftor took 

S 3 the 



354 N T E St^ 

the King, and two or three of his Followers, In- 
to his Cabinet, where was the Pifture of Admi- 
cal Coligny at full Length, drawn after the Life> 
and very natural ; the Eledor faid, Tou knew that 
Man very wellj Monfieur j you ca44S^d thegreafeft 
Captain in Cbriftendom to he Jlain when he was maf- 
f acred \ which Jhould not have been done^ for be did- 
you and the King great Service. 

Henry went about to palliate the Murder as well 
as he cou'd, faying. If we had not kilted bwiy he 
would have killed us^ and we only prevenkd him. 
The Eleftor replied. We know the Story^ Sin, 
and fo went out of the Cabinet, BrantomewritcSi 
J bad itjrom good Hands thai the King was very 
much furpriz*d at Sight of the yidmiraj^s FiSlure j. 
and fo he might well be, confidcring the mon- 
ttrous Wickednefs of the Aftiop, and that he was 
in the Power of a Pringe who took it fo heinoufly, 

^ Guife at their Head, 

Henry Duke of Guife,^ Son of Duke francisy 
was a Prince endow'd with great Qualities, both 
for Peace and War, but of a Temper fit to form 
an Ufhrper, being equally cruel and deceitful*. 
He was fo pppular, tha,t coming once from Cbamr 
pagne^ of which he was Governor, to Parisy as 
he made his Entry through the Gate St. Jntoine^, 
the People did not only cry, Five Guife^ but fung 
Hofanna BUo Davids and that the States intended 
to dethrone Henry HI, and put the Crown on V^ 
Head, is not queftioned by French Hiftorians. 
In order to it, a Genealogy was pubJilh'd, mak- 
ing him Heir to the Delcendants from CharU- 
magney who were wrong'd by Hugh Capet and the 
Houfe of Valois^ whofe Heir was Henry HI. ta 
prevent which, the King ordered him and hiiBre- 
;hpen to be |)ut to Death in the Cattle of &ds^ 

wher^ 



N T E S^. 255 

wherfe the States werfc then aflembled, Anno 1 588*. 
His Widow Catharine de Cleves^ fecond Daughter 
to the Duke de Never s^ delivered a Petition to the 
Parliament of Paris^ as it was modelled by the 
Faftion. of the Guifes, praying for Juftice •, and 
the Parliament condemned the King by an Jrret 
datdd January 31, i^Sg. to make Amende hono- 
rable in his Shirt J bare-beaded and hare-foot^ to have 
a Rope put about his Neck by the corkmon HaHgmany 
and holding in his Hand a "Torch of 30 Poundy to 
declare in the Ajjembly of the States^ upon his Knees^ 
that he did caufelejly and wickedly commit Murder on 
the Perfoftsof the Duke and Cardinal of Guife, and 
demanded Pardon for it of G^d, of Juftice, and the 
States ; and that as a Criminal Conviil he Jh all for- 
feit the Crown of France, and renounce that Right 
he might pretend to it, be banijh*d and confined du^ 
ring Life in the Convent of Hierononymites, near 
tbei Wox^ of Vinccnnes, thtre to live on Bread and 
fFatfir, 

With what Impudence can the P^/j/?j after this,, 
pretend to be the only loyal Subjedls, and to va- 
lue themfelves on the Adoration they have paid 
crown'd He^5, whether Tyrants or others ? Qur 
Republicans were modcft, compared to the Popifk^ 
and French Regicides. This holy Duke of Guife,^ 
to whom the PaHfians fung Hofanna to the Son of 
David, lay with a Court Lady the Night before 
he was aflaflinated, which was the Reafon of his 
coming lb late to the Council the "next Day, that 
thofe who came to kill him were afraid of mifling 
their intended Blow, 

+9 7X>f Manes of his Father to revenge. • 

Francis Duke of Gidfe, Father of Dakc Henry; 
was flain by Pollrot at Orleans, as beforemention- 
ed, The Papifts, w^uld have extorted a Confeffi- 

S 4 on 



256 



NO r E s. 



on from Poltrot by the Rack, that Admiral Co* 
ligfTf fct on the Affaflin, and the Torture made 
him ufc feme Tergiverfation, which the Papt/ls 
wrefled to a Charge ; but the Admiral infill 
upon it that he might be examined in his Prefence, 
and prov'd that he was fo far from approving this 
Affaffination, that hearing a Whifper of a Defign 
againft the Life of the Duke de Guife^ he fent 
him Word of it, that he might be on his Guard. 
The Perfons who inftigated Poltrot to commit this 
Murder, were the Baron Auheterrc^ and, as PoU 
trot faid, the Seigneur^ Soubife^ whohelpMhim 
to Money to buy a fwift Horfe to make his Ef- 
cape after the Blow was given, which was, as 
Brantome fays, feverely revencM at St. Bartholo- 
mew. After all, Monfieur Boyle tells us, that 
the Duke of Guife*% Hatred to the Hugonots was 
at firft Grimace only, and if he could have made 
his Fortune better by them than the Papijis^ he 
would without Doubt have embraced that Party. 
Varillas denies this, and other Aythors confirm it 

50 Nevers. 

Duke of the Houfe of Gonzaga. He and Hen- 
ry Duke de Guife beforemention'd, married two 
of the Sifters and Heirefles of Jaques de Cleves^ 
Duke de Nevers. 

5' Gondu 

Originally of Florence^ from whence the firft of 
them came with Catharine de Medicis. His Bro- 
ther or Uncle was at that Time Bifhop of Paris^ 
and always ftuck clofe to Henry III. againft the 
Leaguers. The Tamily of Retz defcended from 
the Gondfsy and has produced three Cardinals. 

** tavanne. 

He 



NOTES. 257 

He had been a blcxxly Perfecutor of . the Prote- 
ftants in Burgundy^ of which he was Governor. 
They fent Complaints againft him to Court, but 
had no Redrefs. He was cruel and proud, a 
great Enemy to the Marefchal de Biron, infomuch 
that by his and the Count de Relz*s Procurement, 
Monfieur de Biron was put in the Lift of the pro- 
fcrib'd at the Maflacre of Paris^ though he went 
to Mafs ; but the Papijis look'd upon him as an 
Occajional Conformifi^ and on that Account would 
have murder'd him, if he had not fhut himfelf 
up in the Arfenaly of which, as grand Mafter of 
the Ordnance, he was Governour. He drew fe- 
veral Pieces of Artillery to the Gates and Ave- 
nues, and appeared fo well prepared for Refift- 
ance, that when the Part/tans aunc to attack him, 
ais they were ordered to do, upon his threatening 
to fire upon them, they retired. 

" R^nel^ Marquifs of. 

He was kill'd by Bujffy d'Amboife^ to revenge a 
Frocefs he had againft him at Law. 

^* Parduillan. 

Son of Segui Pardatllanj who had been the 
King of Navarre'% Ambaffador in England j HoU 
landi and Germany^ to procure Affiftance to fup- 
port his Succefllon to the Crown of France in 
cafe it was difputed. One Roger de Pardaillan 
de Gendrisj Marquifs de Termes^ died in the Year 

1704. 

^5 Gucrchi the Brave^ 

The Marquifs de Guercbi was Lieutenant to 
Admiral Coligny^ and murdcr'd in the Admiral's 
Houfe. 

** LLvariia 



a;& 



NOTES. 



*^ Lavardin tbeWife^ 

A brave Officer, who had behav'd gallantly in 
the Service of Charles IX. and had Pretcnfionj 
to the Poft of Colonel of the King's Guards, but 
was refus'd on Account of his being a Proteftant. 
We fuppofe the Marquifs de Lavurdin^ Ambaf- 
iador from Lewis XI V. to the Pope, when the 
Difpute happened about the Francbifes^, which had 
like to have occalloned a Rupture, was^ his Do- 
fcendant. 

if Marfillac and Soubife. 

The former was of the Houfe of the Princes de 
Marftllacy the latter Charles de ^ilUneCj. Baron 
de Pant in Bretagncj married Catharine de Partbe- 
naiy only Daughter of John de Partbenai^ Seig- 
neur de Soubife. When the Maflacre was at Pa^ 
risj he defended himfelf valiantly againft the 
Maflacrers, but was at laH: overpowered and 
butcher'd near the Louvre^ where his dead Body 
was expos'd naked. 

5* Her cruel Favorites with delighted Eye. 
Ses cruels Favorisy d^un Regard curieux. 

ii French *tis with curious Eye:^ ami had not 
the Favourites been Female, I fhould have thought 
it related to a filthy Circumftance m the Fate ci 
Smdnfe. There had been a Pnxrefe againft him 
for impotenpe, and the Curiofity of Catharine de 
Medicis and her Court Ladies was fo ihamdels, 
that his naked Corpfe being laid before them, 
they very curioufly furveyM it, burfting out into 
Laugh4^r at io detelbible a Spefbacle, and taking 
^eat Delight in the pretended Difcoverics they 
had made. She expos'd alfo the naked Body of 
a Woman who was kill'd in Man's Cloaths at the 

Sie^e 



NOTES. 259 

Siege of Roan ; fuch was the Religion, riie Vir-r 
tue, and Modefty, of this .Queen and her Train. 
Of the Queen, however, Brantotne fjpeaks in 
Praife, with refpeft. to. Religion. Afnong aU her 
Perfe^imsy fays he, Jhe was a good Chriftian^ ve^ 
ry devout^ Jhe went often to Confejfton^ and never 
rnifs^d divine Servi^e^ Morning or Evening ; Jhe had 
excellent Vmei^ and the hfi Mafiers of Mujick^ in 
her Chapel, Her Ladies and Maids of Honour wen. 
Patterns of Difcretion ; as has been fufEciently 
ftiewn in this and other Inftances, 

^9 "Th! Adventure of Caumont an Infant then. 
From Mouth to. Mouth in future Times J^all pafs. 

Ira de Bmch^ enBouche a la race future. 

As bald as this Veffe appears in the Tranfla- 
tion, it is certainly equal to the OriginaL 

There were four Btothers of the Caumont s^ all 
Proteftants, but they did not take Arms; for. 
which they were call*d HugomtS'^Royallifts^. and 
by Ibme, even of the Papifts, Poltronefques^ daft 
tardly Fellows. The elder was this Caumont y the 
fecond Brother Monfieur de Cleratj the third the 
Seigneur de Feville^ and the fourth Monfieur h 
Forcey who was maffacred at Paris^ by means of 
their half Sifter Madam d^ArcbauSy and his Son? 
near him. Another Son was left for d-ead^ but 
fav'd himfelf in the Arftnal, where the Mare- 
fchal de^ piron hid him. He was afterwards pre- 
ferr'd to feveral great Employments, and much 
in Favour with Henry 111. and IV; The eldeE 
Brother Caumont was murdter'd in his Houfe bjj 
Monfieur de Hnutefort^ and Captain le Pezil^ ion 
^ private Quarrel, 

fo Sut Deatb flkw dev the Bed with random Wtt^. 
Sur ctl^ ma&ettretcxltt M^rt vole au bawrd. 



26o NOTES, 

Is mcwe profaick than the Tranflation. 

^ Mean tinUy in tbefe fad Moments^ What did I? 

The Original is not better. 
Cependant^ quefaifinsje en ces ajfieux Momens. 

^ If Storms arofe to find a Port in Mey 

Soit qu^enfin ^affurant fun fort durant VOrage. 

^ And ev'ry Province was with Slaughter Jpread. 

A well-meaning Countryman of ours in the 
laft Century, thank'd God with his laft Words, 
that he was bom a Man, a Chrijlian, and an En- 
glifhman. It is enough for one to be thankfuJ that 
one was not born a Frenchman^ to efcape a Por- 
tion of the Infamy which is fix'd upon that Na- 
tion above all Nations upon Earthy for this mer- 
cilefs diabolical Mafl&cre, of which Canibals and 
Hottentots would be a(ham*d. News of it was im- 
mediately difpatch'd by John Bouracbioj a Courier, 
to Spain, and the Courier made fuch Hafte widi 
his welcome News, that in three Days and three 
N ights he arriv*d at Madrid from Paris, feven or 
eight Hundred Miles. Brantome adds, that he 
never flept all the Way ; and truly he had very 
h'ttle Time for it. The King of Spain would not 
believe him, till he had read the French King's 
Letter, informing him, that all the principal H«- 
gonots, except the King of J^avarre^ the Frince 
of Conde, and the Count de Montgomeri^ were 
murder'd. The King of Spain telling his Cour- 
tiers the News, faid, the King of Nmjarre was 
favM for his Wife's Sake^ the Prince of Conde for 
his Nonage, and the Count /i^ Montgomery by a 
Miracle of the Devil, per grand Miraglo di diablo, 
no de Dios. The King ordered Bouracbio to car- 
ry the News, and the French King's Letter^ im- 
mediately 



NOTES. 261 

mediately to the Admiral of Cajlille^ with whom 
was at Dinner the Duke de l^Infantado^ a young, 
Lord, who aik*d, when he had heard the News, 
Whether the Admiral cf France and his Followers 
were Chrijiians ? And being anfwcr'd Tes^ he re- 
plied, Como diablo puedefer que fues que Jon Fran- 
cefes y ajfy Chrijlianos fe tnatan como bejtias. What 
a D — 1, faid he, if they were Chriftians, why did 
the French butcher them like Beafts ? 

The Papifts cut the Throats of above two hun- 
dred thoufand naked Proteftants ia the Maffacr^ 
at Paris^ and other Cities in France. 

^* Struck by a Hand invifible He dfi \ 

Almoft all impartial Writers agree that divine 
Vengeance was vifible in the terrible Manner of 
this young Tyrant's Death. I will make ufe of 
£chard*s Words on this Occafion, becaufe being 
a Divine, one may be fure that he has not err*d 
m Decorum. Immediately followed the infamous and 
execrable Maffacre of Paris, and the terrible Slaugh- 
ter of the Proteftants throughout all the Cities of 
France \ but the Kng^ notwithftanding all his Shews 
of Piety^ did not efcape the Divine Vengeance 5 for 
before two Tears were expir^dj he was feiz*>d with. 
unnatural Diftempers^ and ftrange Irruptions of 
Bloody and afterwards with long and grievous Tor- 
ment Sy ended bis Life A. D. 1574. 

*^ Valois impatient pafs^d thro* various Climes 

We have mentbn'd the Duke of Jnjou's be- 
ing chofen King of Poland^ and he became King 
otf^rance, Henry III. by the Death of his Bro- 
ther Charles IX. of which, as foon as he had No- 
tice, he left Poland very abruptly, and rather ftole 
away than departed, fe deroba^ fays the Bifhop of 
MeauXy being apprehenfive that the Poles would 
2 have 



262 NOTES, 

have flx>pp*d him to have iSatisfeftion for the Md-^ 
ney they had been out upon him. He i^s de- 
bauch'd, fuperftitious, and cruel ; his Life a Mix- 
ture of Lewdnefe and Devotion, like that oF his 
Sifter Margaret. In ihort, nothing could be mort 
extravagant and whimfical. He gavehitnfelf up 
lb entirely to his Minions, that all France was 
fhockM at it. The chief of them were the Dukes 
de Joyeufe and d*Eperndn^ whom he would have 
married to two of his Wif*e*s Sifters, Nieces to 
the Duke of Lorrain. She whom he intended for 
the Duke d*Epermn^rtt\t*d imo a Monaftery : The 
Duke de Joyeufe married the other, and ihe Mar* 
riage was celebrated with fo much Pomp, that it 
IS talk*d of to this Day in France. The Expence 
of it was four millions of Livres, as jnuch as ttxi 
millions is now. Nor wajs he lefs prtxligal of his 
AfFeftion and Favour to St. .Maigrin and ^uelus^ 
as appeared by His immoderate Grief when they 
were kill*d. 

'^ His Glofy nrantjh'd lih a flitting Shade ; 

Mariana writes of him, that in his elder Years 
he fiiUy'dall the Glory he acquired in his younger^ 
and adds, there was not more Difference between 
HeSfor viftorious Over Patfadus^ and his Carcafs 
dragg'd along at the Chariot Wheek, than be- 
tween the Duke d^Anjou vidbori^iis at Montdonlour 
and Henry IIL befet wkh Minions, and fcnred by 
the Duke de Guife to ijuit Pafts. In his youngpr 
Years he was fo inrlm*d to tiicgoftat\fm^ that at 
the Colloqui of P-^oiJfy he importuri*jd his 'Siftet 
Margaret^ afterwards Queen of -Nan^arre^ to tutn 
Proteftant, as Ihefays Irer felf in her Merfioii^; 
All the Court there was infixed with Herejy.y and I 
was daily importurfd inifferUiHjIy by ih Jjords md 
JLadieSy and even by^ my Brother d*Anjou, fince 

Jdng 



NOTES, 563 

JGiff ^ I^nce, who frtm bis Childhood bad re^ 
ttiifd Impreffions of wicked Hugonotifm, and in^ 
cejfantly tea%^d fne to change my Religion^ throwing 
my Mafs-Book into the Fire, and giving me the Pfalms 
^nd Prayers of the Hugonots. 

.^7 GviMtJbaws bimfdfj andjlrait th^inconjiant Crowd 

This was in rfie Year 1576. when the League 
Was form'd by him and his Accomplices, under 
Pretence of defending the Church, when it had 
a Defender on the Throne, and a very zealous 
one too, Henry III. than whom, no Man wafi 
more bufy in the bloody Majfacre, 

^ And in the Plains of Coutras bit the Ground. 

The French Critick thinks the Defcription of 
this Battle a Mafter-piece. It was fought in the 
Year J587. the King of Navarre beat the Lea- 
gUerSj and lay the 'Night after the Battle in th? 
fame Houfe where Joyeufe had his Quarters before 
it. 

^ Guile at Vlmory 

A Town in Champagne^ where Guife fell upon 
fome Germans marching to the AlTiftance of Na- 
varre^ and defeated them. 

'** Auneau^ in Beaujfe. 

The Duke of Guife had another Advantage Or 
ver the Germans at that Place. 

Room to fly. 

This refers to his Flight to Chartres^ (in the 
Year i5ft&) He had ammpted to iurvie Satis- 
fa<%oa of the finkem isx ttheir ^Enfoknoe. Thefe 
ftxteen were fo many Mutineers^ chofen out of the 
ftxteen Quarters of Paris^ who finding the Royal 
Authority was like to ^bt^tbo faftrd for &em, lent 

to 



264 NOTES. 

to the Duke de Gui/e, then at Soiffonsy to come 
to their Afliftance. Accordingly, he came, and. 
was received with loud Acclamations by the Peo- 
ple, who had fct up the Barricades for their De- 
fence. The Troops the King had caused to en- 
ter the Town in the Night-time, were kept off 
by them in every Street. Soon after this, he re- 
concil'd himfelf to the League^ which indeed he 
had himfelf fallen in with at its Commencement out 
of Fear, though he fell from it afterwards. He 
order'd his Subjefts to take an Oath that they 
wou'd never own as King, an Tieretical Prince. 
•Tis fuppos'd that the Rumour of the ^^^y/rj^ in- 
vincible Armada diiposM him to this Reconcili- 
ation. 

7» ^, — When the Dsfcendants of our Kings 

Thierry Clovis III. Cbildebert Dagohertlh CbU- 
pefiCj Kings of France, were meer Cyphers y the. 
fovereign Power about the latter End of the fe- 
venth Century being ufurpM by the Maire^s of 
the Palace Ebroin, Pepin, and Charles Martel\ 
and from the laft of thefe Ufurpers defcended 
Charlemagne and the Cc^rolovingian Line. 

7* To Blois, fummotTd ffow the States of France : 

In the Year 1588. the Leaguers hadfuch In- 
fluence on the whole Kingdom, that they carried 
the Eleftion in to many Places, as to get a Ma- 
jority. 

7' Expiring he preferv^d his haughty Jir^ 

An Imitation of what Tajfo fays of Argantes 
minacciava morendo. He threatened as he d^. 

7^ Faliant Mzynt 
Charles Duke de Mayne was at Lypns when he 

heard 



NOT US. i6f 

\iedx6. of his Brotlver*# t^th, upon which he re^ 
tir'd into Bitrgunifyj ^here he ^^as Gbv'erhor, af- 
ftmbled Ttoops, and iparch'd direftly to Parii^ 
He was received at Trbyes^ the dapital of Cbam^ 
pagne^ with the fame Honours as the Kings of 
France were Wortt to be. He affum*d Sovereign 
Power, and gave out Commiflions to the Crea- 
tures of the Duke of Guifej particularly Rofne and 
St. Pdj to command in Champagne and Bote: 
The P^tiftans had his Pifture drawn with an Im- 
}ierial Q-own ufton his Head, but he wouM not 
be crovn^d, colrteftting himfelf with the Title of 
Lieutefiant-Qefteral cf the State and Crown of 
France, &r. and as fuch, he made not only fe* 
ireral Generals, but even Marefchals of France^ 

St. Pol J 2nd an Admiral of France. 
lis firft Arr^ets he fa^s,- blafphemoufly. 
Since it has pleased God td call us to the DireSlion of 
tbt Affairs, rf this Kingdom. Indeed he uft rp'd th^ 
ehtire Government^ civil as well as military^ and 
by his Letters, made a ne# Parliament in the" 
Room of that which he broke for their Loyalty 
to their Sovereign. Cromwell did not aft the Pare 
<?f ari Dfirrper more after the King's Death, than 
Maynt did while his King was alive ; and yet 
with what Confidence have the Englijh Papiftsf, 
pretended to the Praftice of fuperlative Loyalty? 

75 Timfig AumlUctf 

I know not whether He was flie younger Bro-. 
thef of the pukes da Gitife and Mayrie^ or their 
NejAcw, -Son of the Duke SfAumakj Brothers tc^; 
Duke Francis. 




» < • * 



>* '^-—'tbe iSxngf iuho^Uries ih Us Crafty 

'"'PbHifXt Khg''6tSmh, Son of Cidrtes V. 
Etnpeltr of GcnUatyfAmt of ai vei7 unc4'a^l 

T Charadter^ 



266 NOTES. 

Chara6ler« PbUip endeavouring to make Acx|di- 
(itions by Cunning, as Charles did by Courage* 
He was proud ana cruel, killM his Sci tibn Caf- 
losj and ppifbnM his Wife, the beai^'cous Prbr . 
eels Elizabeth of France^ who had been promisM 
to Don Carlos. It was at this very Time that he 
aflifted the Leaguers in France^ equipping his In- 
vincible Armada to invade Efiglanai 

'^ EJfex 

The famous Earl of JE^x, Favourite of Queen 
Elizahitb^ whoie Story is well knbwn^ and is the^ 
SMbjcA of a Tragedy Written in French by STl Cof^, 
neiUe. 

^ The Pride of Sbaus '- ' ' 

Pope Sixius V. who from having been a Shcp^^ 
herd's Boy, rofe to the Papal Throne^ The Po-» 
ct feems tx> err here againft the Truth of HiftO- 
ry ; for moft Hiftorians write, that this Pontiff 
did not favour the League j but the contrary Par*^ 
ty, in France ; infomuch that one of their chief 
Preachers, and the Preachers in Paris^ were the 
chief Trumpeters to this Rebellio|n, £ud on News 
of his Death, God has delruer^d us from a mcked 
and crafty Pope ; if he bad liv^d^ we Jhould have 
been aftonip^dto hear preacUng againft tbi Pope in 
the Churches of Paris, This is the "Pope who 
wifhM for a Night's Lodging widi Qjecn 2//-' 
zohHh^ that he might beget another Akxander 
the Greats and envied her theGlpiyof cutting off 
a Sovereigi^'s Head. ,He alfo ^BtolPd the Mur- 
therer of Henry III. of France. 

^ NemourSj/Dnhtikj •. . • 

Son of Jiaquesjde SefiK^B^ tDmkciSf Netn^ufJi wfeo 
married the Ddjiit de G»»/£!^.Rtoffier," iq.Breaidr 



l\iaT&^. 267 

fir :hife JPromife of Marriage W Mademoifcllc de 
RjfBan^fhy y^hom he had a Qiild. He was Go- 
Vrniorcf Paris iibi^.thc Liapiers^ and was one ot 
the laft who fubmitted to Henry tV. 

^"^ Bouffiersj Bois Daiipbiny 

v -Byf th^ Behavioiir c«f the ktli Marefchal i)uc 
df Boufflersy who for^irded much the dragooning 
of the Proteftants of France in Lewis XIV*s 
Reign, we . l^rn, that . an implacable Hatred to 
the reformed Rell^bA was hereditary in that Fa- 
inflf . There was^ 'a Marefchal of Franct nam*d 
Bois Dauphin^ fortie Tiihe after this, tiut we know 
act in what Relatk^ he Itood to this. 

^.Briffac, . ,. 

.;lT?rtflfewf, Count <fe BfiJ/ac: He hated his Name 
TiMokin^ and wifli^d it had been Cafarj which 
gtve6)one ^a RetiHi of the Affeftion the French 
Papifts and PcriBeUtors have for Liberty : Ttmo- 
?^(?» . delivered a People from Slavery j Cafar tn- 
flav*d the World. One would have thought his 
Matter Buchanan mould have taught him better; 
He delighted fo much in Maffacre, that Bran- 
ttme telfe us, he wcni^d ftab the Enemy*^ Soldiers 
Witii ai3a^er agaih and again j to nlake the Blooc( 

fpitt up in his Face; 

• . • ■ 
** (ianilldci^ 

^iTheMttfquis de CanUlac intercepted^ the. Queeii 
'pi Navarre m her Flight from Clerat, and tak- 
ing her Fti&mrj jfhut herup in theOftle ofUf" 
fon^ where falling in Love with her, he gave 'her 
Opportunities todebaiich the Garrifoh, ^ich which 
ftie drove him out of the Cattle, 

« Elhet^t Marquis de, 

T 2 irothct 



268 NOTES. 

Brother to the Duke de Guife. He ixrai fHz'd 
and impriifon'd at BbnSj when the Duke was kil* 
led, and given to the Duke ^Epemm^ to make 
the moft of his Ranibm. 

^^ Aumale^ 

The Chevalier JtAutMliy Son of the Dbke 
S^Aumale^ Brother to the Duke di Gmfe^. killed 
by Polirol. 



'A few in France 



The Parliament of PariSf before moddPd by 
the Leaguers. This ParliamenSy which is now a 
Court of Juftice only, was in^cuted by Pefin^ 
Father of Cbarkmagney and was of greater Au- 
thority in former Times, efpecially upon the Dif^ 
ufe of the Aflcmbly of the States General, the 
laft of which was held Anno 1614. and the Af- 
fcmbly of the NotdUes Anno 1624. The Court 
of Parliament was moveable till PbiRp the Fair 
made it fedentary, in the Year 1302. 

^ Into old Sorbonne'j fpacious Bojom works j 

The Collie of Sorhonne takes its Name from 
one Robert y Uoftor m Divinity, of the VmYtT-- 
fity of Paris J in the Reign of St. Lewis. He 
was a Native of Sorhonne ^ near Sens^ and very 
much in Favour with that monaftick McMurch. 
He built this College, and call'd it The poor Ma^ 
fters ^ Sorbonne, which increased from Time to 
Time in Reputation fo much, that it topp'd all 
the other Schools^ and was ibmetimes namM for 
the Univerfity it felf. 

The Dodors of the Sorhonne favoured the League^ 
one of whom, Boucber^ Curate of St. Senoit^ in 
Parisy not only preach'd, but wrote for dim. 
Their firft Meeting wa9 at his Chambers in the 

Collc^ 



NOTE S. 



i6^ 



CoH^ 3e Fortes ; and the alarum Bell to raife 
the Parifians agaiiift Henry III. was by his Order 
rung in his Church. Tbuanus fpeaks of ^v&Bou^' 
€ber as a feditious Preacher. The Sorbonney by 
a .fdenia Decree^ Nemine Contradicente^ declared, 
that .the French were abfolv'd froni their Oath o( 
Allegiance to the King, and tpight take Arms; 
and raile 'Money to oppofe hvn. More Poplfh 
Loyalty : Yet how did they brag of it after the 
Reftordtiony ^becaufe they happen'd to be againft 
die Republicans^ who would not let them be tor 
them. 



<7 



Line vf Caftt 



Hugh Capet^ King of France^ was the firft 
Prince of the third Race in that Kingdom. Dan- 
te &fs^ his Father was a Butcher, and Francis L 
^e French King, fell into a violent Paflion, when 
he firft knew it. Francis de Vellony a French Po- 
et, lays the fame, as does Agrippa^ in his Vanity 
0f the Sciences \ however, 'tis a notorious Falfity^ 



The Goddefs of Juftice, for the ParJiament of 
Paris. The Motto on the Clock in their Hall of 
Audience is. Sacra Themis Mores y ut Pendula diri* 

Horas. 



A bluft^ring Fencer 

BuJJy Le Clerc^ who had been a Fencing Ma- 
tter, and turning Attorney, had got fome Know- 
ledge of Law Matters. He enter'd the Hall of 
Audience, and caus*d a Lift of thofe whom he 
faid he had Orders to feize, to be read. The 
Names of Achilles de Harlay^ the firft Prefident, 
jand ten or twelve other Prefidents, being there, 
ii^n h^uing them, the whole Aflembly rofe, and 

T 3 accompanied 




4 



iyo N O TES. 

accompanied them to the' B^le^ but in a fen$ 
Days Bujffy rdeas'd fome of thfim who t^rc de- 
voted to the Lfa^ue» 

^ Great Harlai's 

A Family who have long been cmuient in 
France for their high Stations in the Law. This 
Harlai was firft Prcfident of the Parliament of 
Parisy and about fifty Years ^o, the Archbifliop* 
rick of Paris was ere6bed into a Puchy with 
Peerage, in Favour of Francis de Harlai. To^ 
landy m a Dedication to Speaker Harley^ compli- 
mented him with an Acknowledgment of one of 
thefe French Harlafs^ that the Harley^s of the 
Marches of IFales were defcended from them* 

r « 

^ Virtuous dc Thou, 

r ... 

Jacobus AufvftusTbuanuSx Son of Cbrifiopberus, 
^uanusy both Prefidents of the Parliament of 
Paris. 'Cbryiopber the Father died Anno 158^. 
fix Years before the Aflembly of the States at 
Bloisy when the Duke of Guife was kill'd -, fo this 
muft refer to the Son, who was the &mous Hifto- 
rian^ and whofe Charafter is amply fet forth in. 
the following Epitaph on his Monument in the 
Church of St. Andre des Arcs in Paris. 

Jacobo Augufto Thuano, Chriftopheri fi/fo, in 
regni Conftliis AJfeJfori^ amjplij/imi Senatus preeJUu 
IMter^rumj qu(B res divinay & humanas ampleSun- 
tur^ magno bonorum iS eruditorum confenfu^ peritiffi- 
mQ , variis, legationibus fumma fmceritate ac pru^ 
demia fun^o^ viris principtbus ova fiio laudatiffimis 
eximie cultOy Hiftoriarum Scriptori quod ipfo pajfifi^ 
loquuntur celeherrimo^ Cbrijiiana pietatM antique 
retinentijfmoi 

# 

... Vixit 



NOTES, 271 



v»t ^ 



^ixit annos 63 

Menfes 6 dies 29 

' ^ Obiit Lutetiae ParHiorum 

' ^Nonis Maii 161 7. Parciffime .cenfuifii 

'vidctur, qui tali Viro fecuium 

dcfiiiffe dixit. 

^ Mole, 

Another Family in France^ illuftrious in the 
Law. Monfieur Mole le Barbon^ I know not whe- 
ther the fame, but it was about this Time, was 
Counfelhty Clerk, and a benefic'd Man, but, for 
fitting in Judgment on a Criminal, his Benefice 
was taken from him, after which, he renounced 
his Prieft^s Orders, married, and applied himfelf 
wholly to the Law. He was Father of Monfieur 
Mole^ Keeper of the Seal in France in the lad 
Age. . 

« Ameki, 

I take him to be Ameht de la Houjfaxe, a French 
Writer of Note, who wrote the Kifiory of the Go* 
vernment of Venice. 

^* To thofi dark Tow'rs, 

The BaJHlky in Paris\ a Fortrefs whW"e State 
Priforiers are confined. 

9J No Senate is there Now^ 

The Duke de Mayne diflblv*d the lawful Senate 
md by his Letters Patents erefted a new one, 
than which, Cromwell never a6led more the Part 
of a^Traytor and Rebel. 

?^ Tou^ Briflfon, 

Barnaby Brijfon^ a learned Lawyer, Prefident 

T 4 of 



JI7? NOTES. 

of the Parliament of Paris. Matthew di LMinof^ 
SI Protcftant Miniftcr, cxpell'dthe Church of i^r 
4an for Lewdi^fs, was received by the Pa^ift^ 
with open^ms, made a Canon x>{ JSoiJfafu^ and 
Curate of St. Mederic in Paris. He was jfo conr 
fiderable in the Fadion of 72^ Sjxteeff^ uiat he 
prefided in all the A0emb^es which fate for the 
Condemnation of Brijfon^ and the othef Prefix 
dents who were condemn- d, for which the Daki 
dc Mayne himfelf wou'd have hangM him, had he 
not run away. 

Some of thofe who cpndemnM this and th^ o* 
^er Gendemen, were executed for it-^ upon 
which. Dr. Boucher, one of the feditious Prea* 
chcrs, faid, they were Dei Martyres^ Martyrs of 
God. M. de Thou*s Words are, Infigm Impuden^ 
Hi vocaial'f with fingular Impudence he call'^ 
^em Dei Mariyres. This was in the Year 1691. 
V Archer was CounfeUor of tfie Cburt Cardiff ^ of 
the Chatelet, a Court Criminal. The Bifho^ xil 
Meauxy in his Unvoerfal IRftory, lays, t))e fixteeu 
^us'd them to be put to Death to revenge their 
particular Quarrels. They, were firft ftrangled 
m Prifon, and then their Bodies expos'd at the 
Place of common Execution, the dreve. This 
AAion ftruck Horror into even the Leaguersthiem^ 
fplves, and they wrote immediately to the Duke 
de Mayne, who was then z% Lofn, tq defire him 
to haften to Paris, and take Ckre of die Safety of 
the City. As foon as he rctum'd, he turn'd Buf\ 
fy le Clerc out of the BaJiUl^j vWch Fortrefi he 
had poflefsM himfelf of> and condemn'd to Death 
nine of the moft famous, of whom four only 
COu*d be taken, and they were hang'd. J^j^ 
jBed to Brujfels, and liy'd there a long Tinie 19 




it*-!" J J 



•» 



V Dominkk 



NOTES. ^73 

Founder pf the Order of Dominicans^ or Frir 
jars Preachers eftablifh'd firft in Spaing where 
this pipdigious Saint was born. The Blafphemy 
of the Papifts concerning this Domimckj is |b 
Rocking, that 'tis fcarce credible ; but coming 
jxpm one of their own Prekite$, and no lefs a one 
fhzn Antonius^ Archbifhop of Florence^ we fhall 

2uote it, as follows, . put of his Hiftorical Sums, 
3irift, &ys he, rais'd Three only that were dead^ 
but Dominick Three in the City tf Rome ; hut 
^batjbould we think of thofe Forty Strangers that 
fuffet^d Shipwreck in the great River near T|io- 
louie, who having been a long Ttme under Water ^ 
Jiy the Prayers ef St. Dominick came all fafe out of 
fbe River ^ anfi fif)er$ f jcitor^d to Life. Chrift liAng 
immortaly entered twice apfong bis JiifcipleSy theDoor 
peing {hut *, but Domini(:k, whilft yet but a mortal 
Man^ which is much to be admir^d^ entered one 
Night into a Church j the Door being ihut ; and this 
he did only left he Jbou*d waken Ins Brethren. There'4 
^ great deal more of it, and ftill more blafphe- 
mous and incredible ; preferring, in every Arti- 
cle, this Dominick to Jefus Chrift : But | have not 
Patience to infert it. Clement was a Mpnk of 
this moft holy Order, 

?* Had Clement in her Bo/om never lain. 

That th^ damnable Parricide committed by Fri« 

^r Clement^ was approved by the Hokt de Mayne^ 

and the whole Boay of the League^ appears by 

the jRelation of the Commander de Diouy Ambaf* 

iador from the Leaguers to the Pope Pius V. 

which was to this I\irpofe : A Religious of the 

prder of St. Dominick^ of the Convent in Paris^ 

MfnM ^riar J^tnus Ckmept^ agpd abqpt {wenty-: 
J ^ ^' fpur 



274 NOTE S. 

four Years, one of the youngeft of three or finir 
hundred Friars in that Convent, was divinely e- 
le£bed for io generous an Enterprize, which God 
has cffefted by his Hands, as Glement foretold 
fome Time before to his Brethren, and that he 
was to be the Man who fliou'd deliver thenri from 
their Oppreflbr \ <mi which Account his Brethren 
were wmt to call him Captain Clemera, To ac- 
ccmipli/h it, he procured counterfeit Letters from 
fome of the King's diief Friends in Paris, to in- 
form him of Intrigue carrymg on there for his 
Service, and obtained a Pafe frcmi the Count de 
Brienne, Prifoner in the Caftle of the Louvre, x6 
have favourable Accefi to the King's Perfon. 
Thus fumifh'd, he departed for ^t. Cfott, where 
the King lay, having taken Leave of the Rdir 
gious, exhorting them to pray for him, who was 
young in God*s Service, without Hope of Re- 
turn-; and he defirM not to return if the Lord 
wou'd give him Grace to effeft his Purpofc. 

Pray mind, this Speech was made to the Pope, 
the pretended Vicar of Chrift, the infallible Head 
of the Church of Rome\ and the acCurfl Wretch 
prays for the Grace of God to do an Aft, that 
wou'd make even Devils tremble. The Amhaf- 
fedor went on. He told them they fhoa'd hear 
the Event of his Enterprize in twenty-four Hoars. 
Coming to St. Clm, he cou'd find no Means of 
fpeaking to the King that Day, the thirty-firft of 
July, but the next Day, the firfi of Augufi, he 
addreft to theSicuc de la Guejle, the King's 
Proftor-General, and told him he had brought 
feveral Letters of the greateft Importance from 
his Majefly's faithful Friends in the City, and de- 
firM to be introdue'd to the King, that he might 
deliver rficm and fome Meflages he had frohi them' 
by Word <rf" Mouth. The King being informed 

of 



N. a T E Z 275. 

pf it, order'd he fhpu'd be admitted ; and taking 
him into his Clofet, taik'd to hihl above a Quar-. 
ter of kn Hour. Chment gave him his Letters, 
^nd when he came to the laft, the King afk'd 
him if that was all l The Monk replied, / be^ 
iieve not^ Sir-, I bdveftUl one more : And putting 
his Hand' Into his Seeve, he pull'd out a Knife he 
had hid there, and ftabb'd him in the Belly. The 
King iSihding he was wounded, fciz'd the Knife 
in the Friar's liand, with which he cut him over 
^heFace; and Attendants coming in, they imme- 
diately cut him to Pieties, Clement only faying, / 
hiefs God J I die contentedly ; / did not expert fo eafy 
a Death as this is, and am glad I come off fo well. 
His Garcafs was flung into the Street, and after- 
wards burnt. The King died the Night follow- 
ing* ^^gnft 2, 1589. 'lis faid, he was kiird in- 
the fame Room where he and others had a G)n- 
fultation to determine the Maflacre at Paris. It 
is inconteftable that not only the Duke de Mayne 
and the Leaguers, but the Pope and his Bifhops, 
approved this Aflaffination, by the panegyrical 
Account of it which Dion gave the Pope, and was 
^cceiv'^ by him with Pleafufe and Applaufe. 

59 In Rahab, where the limpid Amon flows, 

Arnon ira River on the Frontiers of the Land 
of Canaan, mentioned Deuteronomy, Chap. xi. where 
we read, that the Sons of Ammon were excepted 
out of the Number of the Nations deliverM over 
to the Ifraelites, When thou comeft nigh over-againft 
the Children of Ammon, dijlrefs them not. The 
more remarkable for that according to our Poem, 
they were moft horrible Idolaters. But their Coun- 
try was given to the Children of Lot. In the 
fame Chapter we read alfo, that it was in old 
Time inhabited by GiantSy call'd by the Ammo- 
mtes Zamzummims. ]!''' Jeptha'i 



tjS NOTES. 

••• Jq>tha*i rsfi Vow He diHated^ 

The Hiftory is in the dcveath Chapter of Jii^ 
ges. 

*~ Chalcaafj fcnrf ZriJ^r^ 

Chalets a Prieft, who attended the Gr^rib is 
their Expedition againft Trey^ and declared that 
the Fleet wou'd never fail mm the Port of M^ 
lis till Agammmn had iacrific'd his Daughter Ipbi^ 
retM to the Goddefs Diana. He iiirviv'd the 
Si^ of ^rojj and tlied at Cohpbron in 4/^9 of 
Grief fi>r being out-done by Mi^us in a Cqnteft 
foi Divination. 

•^ Teutaies 

I know not why r(?//4«r^ calls Teutates fAffrew^ 
lie being the Mercury of the Gm/r and Britains. 
Py J^^ he is ftyrd Mereurius Teutates j where he 
jwites that Jr^ tum'd up a Mount fo call'd» bcr 
.caufe CQnfecrated to his jHonour^ who was tbp 
<Sod of Eloquence^ and die Jnventor of LettOT» 
which are Qualities by no Me^ns confiftent witfe 
die lEpithet />iW«/. We arc told, he was cf- 
^eem'd above all the reft of the Gods by the Dru- 
jids. Ce^arwntcfj that there was a great Number 
qf Statues ercfted to his IJonour, ^d that the 
Invention of all Arts and Sciences was attributed 
to him. He/us J or Catnalus^ the Britifib and Caur 
lijb Mars J wou'd have krv'dFolt aire's Turn bet- 
ter •, and better ftill wou'd the God Taramis, their 
Jupter^ have ferv'd it : For both Cauls and Bri^ 
tains offered to him humane Sacrifices. Lucan 
mites of this Qod^ 

Et faramb Scythicae no^ witior ara Diana. 

f^ Stnjke^ cut $benf all tf Pms^ 

Not 



N TE y. 477 

Not more proTaic dan the French 
Frafpezy dtchtrez. 

«o4 ffi^ Seffaries at London He infpr% 

I have taken the Liberty to leave out Mr. VoU 
tair^$ Puritans^ whole Qiarafter he feems not tQ 
be acQuainted with, there being as little Pbana^ 
^fm in Puritamfm^ as in primitive Cbri/Hanity. 

^ In Liflx>n and Madrid 

The Autos de Fe. The Executions of the In* 
quifition, by which many thouland Jews have 
been deftroy'd for the Religion they received in a 
miraculous Manner from Heaven. 

«^ If Judith 

The Story is in the Apocrypha. 

^^ AU mngs are lawful to revenge the Churchy 

That no Body nuy think a Frenchman cou'd 
not fay what has been fo often laid by Englifiimen^ 
fee the Original. 

Tout devient legitime a qui venge PEglife. 

*** -IRs Friends of his Intent inform? dj 

The £.^^^^5 knew his Delign to murder their 
Sovereign, as has been already obferv^d; and' 
there is no Inftance of liich a damnable Villainy 
in all Story. The Murder of King Charles I. 
wicked as it was, comes not up* to the Wicked- 
nefs of thefe P(n)tlh Pri^. King Charles had 
wag'd a long War with thofe that put him to 
Death,, and wou'd have fupprels'd diem, had ic 
been in his Power. On the contrary^ the French 
Friefts and Rebels contrived the Murder of a Kih&c 
who had murdered many innocent Chriltians in 
cold Blood .&r their Sikes, and who thought he 

cou*d 



«78 NO.T:K\S:. 

cou'd never .4«^ «n(Hii|^ :iot dieir AdrontagB ^d 
Honour. 

*'' Jnd in lbs Roman Faftl j^lace bis iV«W, 
. Thel^cndabf thcSjuptsi alludingto thefai 
Jli of the aid RomdmV' ^itieadiri wHerein were 
fet down their Feaftsj the .Nimqs oif chcir Officers^ 
Gfc. A BpcMf ,'6f OwiTs,- trahhated.by my felf, 
a MS in the ttahds of J'.^i wasfo call'd for that 
Reafon. ;-:.' „:/. . ■'■" i ."■ 

"' -Rajeah for SinntT arid Jvortinez ofim'pafs. 

IntheO'riguial^ .- ..;' : 
Souvent les Scelerat-j rtffiaUiMt Mux Grands iatmesi 
'" Gelboa the mad Pithonels ■■'. - 

GeSioa is a Hill in G(i2iff» -the Kbrth-Pjotof 
Jewrjf. -Xhe mad Pitbonefs is the Witch. of En- 
dor, of whom fee the twenty -eighth Chapter of 
Samuel. Voltaire raifes her Character above that 
bf a common Witch, who by our Statutes is to 
be burnt to Death, and exalts her to a Pytbentfii 
a Prieftefs with a prophefying Spirk. 

'" The lying PH^s in ingb 3uaaxk, thus 
This Hillory is in th^ twenty-fiscond Chapot? 

of Xstf^S, Vcrfcs-lO, 23; . 

go agaiilll the PartUtutti 

in d by Prnjity .the Greati 

*li Iw-'MitfBtungiOUt.from 

^'' woof .the Ifc(^jl<ii win) 

5'' , tim Wafj intended a 

ftpp his JouroTO and i>j« hi|h- and Ptmir) a 
they were nMJ:cfing,0.iJ!«{:.tjK..Citjt. utMusa, 
i ... fii* 



N QT^E S^ 279 

firfi: xwjur'd Crtf^^f , t<^ d€l^ tifif, pi^-:. 

vail/n]g tigr: by bi^tribuiial PQwer,- (sommftndcdi 
his Serjet^pis to &iz& him, notwithftadiciing thp> 
grc^t l^nip4y wa^ :with hui\, and to. detain .hhn ; 
but the pttier ^r^bunes i|ot permittkig it, releaS'd. 
Cri^ffksy^xxfovi whkhy^/^i running ito: the City; 
Gatiq^^koa^led a ifirei.inr a Cauldron, and as Craf" 
fus, approached iti offibr^d. Fumigation and Sacri**. 
ficea^ c^IIiagiupoo and ^aAiing, feyer^ Grange arid 
hornjp^e: D^it^ea^ arid . cors?d jSrq0(jS with moft . 
dreadfuJL Itpprecation&V for which) fy>^^Pluf4nb^ 
Atduf Jyf2fi^to be blam'd^: The Rm^ns laying 
gre^t Sl:|qfs on jfudi, Eae^crations, after which, the 

Xhe , Jpcidqnt , of the Jewijh MagiqiaAfe con- 
de|nn^5|,l^yi itke ir^i Griupk. Motffieur 'W/aiVtf ^ 
hixnlelfndeclarM^ openij againft fuch. Things, in* 
his ^jjkym^Epck J^oetry, and it is a littfe odd. 
that neriflj^ou^d mtrodnce this conjuring Scene inr 
his Hentia^^ after having condemn*d it in the Je^ 
rufalemim of T^ajfo. His making Henry IV. fo* 
puillant, and fo near a Conqueft over the League^ 
is contrary, to the Truth of Hiftory, and leffena.- 
theSurprize. 

"^ VirtUdUs Potier, prudent Villerpi, 

I take thern to be^Pr^fidents of the Parliament 
of JParis^ and the latter to be Father of Monficiif 
^^/tfnjy, who was Secretary cf State in:tihe'Reign: 
of fJwis, XIH. and from j^rhom, I ftppofe, db^/ 
fcend^ (}i^ Marefchal Duke de VtUeroy^^ Goierpil; 
oif; f{i^ J^rencb Armies ag^nft the Cdn^ecatcs ik* 
t^fi ;laft Warsi \ , . " :. ./ -li ':^\ :" r 






hii -. -• -• .1,, 



''^^^'^afi^iiidfeha^^ Doffofsi . 

. -^j/tairnbonrg conkiks^ that Boucher ^ the wry Day 1 
th^ Kiqg. was wwod^: by. Clement^ ^(iid before 

News 



«8<5 NOTESf. 

News of it was broc^lit t6 Paris^ preackM thai 
the Leaguers woi/d Be delirer'd out of the Hands 
of their Enemy, that very Diy, Aft firft of jfugufi^ 
as Peler was deliyer'd out of h& Eneniy^s^ Haiids^ 
it being the Feaft of the Chains^ in Cbmmemoia* 
tion of that Deliverance. Boucher added,- it was 
an Aft of great Merk trf kfl! an heretical Km^^ 
or a King that favouV'd Hereticks ; and, fays 
MMnibourg^ Les autres Fredkateurs agifanSdeCtm- 
cert avec lui^ &c. Other Preachers afting m Con* 
cert Wkh kim, preach'd with greater Ra^ thair 
ever, ageiinft Henry de Vdcis. Baucber^s printed 
Sermons were burnrt « Paris the next Day after 
the Surrender of that City tb Henrj^ de Bourbon. 
Henry III. fent for the Faculty of Tteology be- 
fore he left Piiw, but contented himfelf with re-' 
primandbg them for preaching againft him, par- 
ticularly Dr. Boucher, MontgaUlard^znotiicr ffczt 
Doftor, wrote a Panegyrick on the AflaffihatiQa 
of Henry III. of France. Barclay a ScotfrndHj Fa- 
ther of Barclaij Author of the ArgeniSy anfwcr*d 
Boucher, who had ailerted that the Sovereignty 
was in the People, as did feveral other Doftors of 
the Leaguers, to purfuc their depofing Henry III. 
as they intended to do, and to fhut him up in a^ 
Monaftery, as foon as they cdu'd come at him. 
The Ducheis de Montpenfier is faid to have carri- 
Jbd a Pair of Sciilars about her, which fhe was wont' 
to fliew, as provided to cut off* the King's Hair 
when he was made a Monk: This Zeal of Iter's 
againft hiip, was not imputed fo much to her 
Concern for the Catholick Religion, as to Reient-^ 
ment for the King's Difcovery of fome bodily 
Defefts of her's, which he. became acquainted 
with in his Amours with her. Do not thefe Things 
flieW us how vain the PretieriGCS of the Papiftsan^ 
loimmaculate Loyalty to the Crown ? Mmmbourg 



NOTES. 2U 

ih his Hiftory of the League fays, the Prieflrs tur- 
ned their Sermons into Satyrs againft the facred 
Perfon of the King, and pathetically defcrib*d 
the Death of the two Brothers, the Duke and 
Cardinal de Guife^ whom they cried up as Afor- 
tyrs ; fo that they drew Tears and Groans from 
their Auditories; but inftead of propofmg to 
them the Example of St. Stephen^ they infpir*d 
them with an ardent Defire of Vengeance, info- 
much that thofe who had no Mind to weep and. 
to groan, and were fcandaliz'd at fiich Abufe of 
the Miniftry, were forcM to counterfeit Tears, for 
fear of being torn to Pieces. One Curate faid^. 
Is there not a Man iH this AJfemUy who has Courage 
enough to revenge the Murder of the Duke by the 
Death of the Tyrant ? And to move them the more, 
he put into the Mouth of the Dutchefs Dowager 
thefe Verfes, in Imitation of J^irgiL 

Exoriare aliquis vejiris ex ojfihus Ultor 
^i face Valefios ferroque fequare Tyrannos. 



u6 



^Confines bis Pow^r. 



In the Original, Limite fa Puiffancek 

"7 The Capets on the Throne of Gharlemagjle. 

About the Year 987. Lewis V. King of Ftancdy 
the laft of the iecond, or Canlomviman Race o£ 
Kings, died, and the Crown of France fell by he- 
reditary Right to his Uncle Charles Duke of Lor- 
rain\ but the States of /r<a«rdfcthim afide, and 
chofe Hugh Capet King, who, though, not theSoa 
of a Butcher, as Dante and others fay, was cer-. 
fiunly of a Family much inferior in Nobility ta 
ma^y other French Families -, and from him has 
the Royal Line in France continued in the prin- 
cipal Branch, and the divided Branches of Valois 
and Bourbon to our Times ; which provcsvthat the 

U Royai 



^Si N T E S^ 

Royal Hpufc of England is more ancient aiid 
more honourable than that of France : For if you 
take it from William the Conqueror^ his Anceftors, 
Defcendants from Rollo^ had been Dukes of Nor- 
mandy above lOO Years before Hugh Capet was e- 
lefted King of France in Wron^ to the right Heir 
Charles Duke of Lorrain ; but if we take it bixa 
Henry IL Son of Maud the Emprefe, Daughter 
of Matilda^ Daughter of Margaret Queen of 
Scotland^ Sifter and Heir to Edgar Ethelingj Heir 
of the Saxon Line, the Royal Houfe of England 
is 4 or 500 Years older than that of France^ and 
began with Princes, which the Houfe of France 

did not» 

1 

"* *1V Ambajfador of kome, and Him of Spain, 

Not only Cardinal Cajetan^ Nuncio in France 
from Pope Sixtus V. was at Paris to advife and 
affift the Leaguers^ but the renown'd Bellarmine^ 
Pancirolej and other Romans , to throw Oil in- 
to the Fire, fays Drelincourtj which the Pope 
ought to have extinguilh'd with his Tears, or with 
his Bloodi 'Tis certain, that though Pope Six- 
tus did not wifli the League well at laft, yet at his 
Acceflion to the Pofitfficate, he was fo much 
their Friend, that he excommunicated the ir/^rA 
King, Henry III. for calling the King of Na^ 
varre to his AfliftancCi 

The Spanijh Ambaflador aflifted at this Affem- 
bly of the States held by the Ledguers at Paris^ 
Anno 1593. He was inftru<5ted to propofe to 
them their making the Infanta Queen of France^ 
which they not liking, his next Propofal was to 
marry her to a French Prince, with whom Ihe 
IhouM reign jointly ; and in a private Audience 
he had of the Duke of Mayne^ he mentioned the 
young Duke of Guife^ who after the Death of his 

Father 



NOTES. 283 

JFather had been confin'd in the Caftle of Tours^, 
and thence made his Efcape •, but thefe Princes 
were fo jealous of one another, that nothing came 
of this PropofaL The Bifhop of Meausc faysj 
'twas in this Junfture that the King abjur'd the 
Proteftant Religion in the Church of St. Denis, 
the Archbilhop of Bourges performing the Cere-^ 
mony ; which makes it plain that he was frighted 
into it by ah Apprehenfion that the States wou'd 
put the Crown of France upon jfome other Head; 

"9 Qfff, poQf Remains of Freedom to defend. 

This is very well explained by Mr. John Hamp* 
den, who in a Treatife publifh d-^//»(? 11592. tells 
us, he was in France ten Years before .that^ and 
had Difcourfe with Mezerai the Hiftorian, wh6 
having heard Mr. Hampden fpeak of the Confti- 
tution of England^ broke out into thefe Expref- 
fions -, Oh Fortunatos nimium^ bona ft fua norint^ 
Angligenas / llVe bad once in France the fame Hap^ 
finefs and the fame Privileges^ which you have^ 
Our Laws were made by Reprefentatives of our own 
cbuftng. Our Money was not taken from us, hut by 
cur own Confent. Our IGngs were fubjeSl to the 
iiules of Law and Reajbn. But alas ! we are mi^ 
ferahlcy and all Is loft. Think nothing , Sir^ too dear 
io maintain thefe precious Advantages, and, if there, 
he Occafion, venture your Life, your Eft ate, and all 
you have, rather than fubmit to the wretched Condi- 
tion to which you fee us reduc'di 

The Pope's triple Crown : though the Tiara is 
properly the Turbant worn by eaftern Kings. 

«" nat fell Tribunal 

The Inquifition. 

U 2 . »" this 



284 NOTES. 

"* This Speech of the Prefident Potter ^ is mudh 
admired by the French Critick. 

"' Son of St. Lewis, 

Lewis IX. of France^ was the Son of Lemi 
VIIL and Blanche of Caftille^ who was Regent 
durmg the Minority of her Son, to the great Dif* 
fatisfaftion of the Princes of France^ Vaflals to 
rfiat Crown. Theobaldj Count de Champagne^ one 
of the chief of them, was drawn off from their 
Party by falling in Love with the Queen Regent, 
who either jilted or farourM him ; for fhe was 
very kind to him, as appears by the Count's Son- 
nets ; for he was one of the beft Poets of thofc 
Times. This King Lewis was a maudlin Sort of 
a Hero, fuperftitious and devout, according to 
his Religion, without any heroick Quality to make 
him the Subjeft of an Epick Poem, as the St. 
Lewis in French j and the Lu:dada in Portugueses 
by Camoens. He made two or three foolifh Ex- 
peditions againft the Turks in Jfta and Africa^ and 
for that Folly of his was made a Saint^ the firft 
of the Kind, according to the prefent Canoniza- 
tions. He was given m his Youth to Women, 
but cou'd not for that make the worfe Saint in the 
Roman Calendar. His Mother governed hkn fo 
entirely, that he denied himfelf the Company of 
his Wife, whom he lov'd, becaufe his Mother did 
not love her ; by which we may perceive what a 
Head and what a Heart he had. However, he 
had feveral Children. His eldeft Son was Pbilip 
the Bold^ his youngeft Son Robert de Clermont^ 
who married Beatrix of Bourbon about the Year 
1270. and the Houfeof Bourbon contmv?d in the 
Royal Line 319 Years, before Henry IV. fuc- 
ceeded to the Crown of France^ by virtue of that 
very old hereditary Right. This Saint ordered 

hia 



NOTES. 28y 

his Son, by his Will, not to raife Money by Tax- 
es on his People, but his Orders were not obey'd. 

"4 ^ Gods of Metal J or of Mud 

Dieux de Metal ou de Platre. 

The Papifts bow the Knee to Saints of Metal 
and of Mud^ and that's as much Idolatry as to 
bow it to Images of Jupiter or Hercules. . 

'*^ Children deteftable of Belgick Bfdls^ 

The Civil War began in the Low Countries, 
in the Year 1565. nine Years after the Renuncia- 
tion of the Emperor Charles V, in favour of his 
Son Philip IL King of Spain^ and was occafion'd 
by the Tyranny of that Prince, in impofing the 
bloody Inquifition on his Belgick Subjeds. *Tis 
iuppos*d that he did not attempt it fo much out of 
Zeal for Popery, as out of a Luft of Power, and 
to make his Government arbitrary by the Con- 
queft of thofe People, who, he imagined, wou'd 
oppofe that execrable Court, and be reduced by 
his Arms to his Will and Pleafure. But his Craft 
deceived him, and he loft the Low Countries in 
the Attempt to enflave them. There is fomething 
extremely abfbrd, as well as wicked, in the Con- 
duft of thofe Champions of Popery the Kings of 
Spain and France in thefe Times. The King of 
France maflacred his Proteftant Subjefts for their 
Religion, and affifted the Proteftants in the Ne- 
therlands againft the Papifts. The King of Spain 
caus'd his Proteftant Subje<5ls in the Netherlands 
to be inhumanly butcher*d, and affifted the //«- 
gonots in France^ againft the Catholicks •, which is 
fufficient to prove to us that Tyranny.^ and not 
Catholicifnij was the chief Mover m the Troubles 
of France and the Low Countries ; where, it is faid, 

U 3 Bombs 



N 



286 NOTES. 

Bombs were firft made ufe of in the Siege of Ci- 
ties. Some will have it, that the firft that were 
us'd in England^ was at the Siege of Gloucejlery 
by King Charles I. but they had greater Effeft ii\ 
the Storm of Bridgwater ^ 'two Years after. 

"* Momay among tbefe rapid Floods of Flame^ 
Grave ^ but intrepid^ mingles with the War. 

The French Critick upon the Henriade fays, 
that as. live)' as this Aflault i^, it does not touch 
him. Pou, ^ajfaut^ tout vif qu^il efi^ il ne me tou- 
ihe point. Je fuis Quake r en fait de Livres. 1 am 
a Quaker in the Matter of Booksy Baffles give me 
no Pleafure ; but 1 love to fee our great Momay, 
who^ in my Opinion^ is the Hero of the Poem. 

Incapable a la fois de crainte & de Fureur, 6f^, 

Incapable of Fury and of Fear^ 
Deaf to the Roar of Cannon and of Bombsj 
And calm amidft the Tempejt of Pbe Figbs. 
He looks on Battles %viih a StoicVs Eye^ 
As neceffary Flails of wrathful Skies ^ 
Lik^ a PhUofopberj wbereHonour guides 
He marches J and condemning Fights j avoidi 
No Danger J pities Henry, and attends. 

i*7 The formidable Bandj of EngXifhJid^^ 

The Queen of England not only fuppliedfl!?;i- 

2» IV. with Mbney, but fent 40QO choice Sol- 
ers to Ffancej who had the Port of Havre de 
Grace put into their Hands, and did good Ser- 
vice to that King, but were not well dealt witi\ 
for it by hiirn. ' ' 

!*• ^ Seine beheld their Ancefiors enthroned, 

Voltaire probably means Normandy^ where the 
I)u.kcs> Anceftors to fViUiam the Conjueror^ rcign- 



NOTES. 287 

cd ; and from them defcended the Kings of Eng- 
land. It ought rather to refer to Henry VI. King 
of England^ who was crownM King of France in 
Paris 300 Years ago. 

1*9 q^fis from the pyrenean oft we fee 

This §imUe is one of thofe Places mentioned 
in an Epiftle concerning Verfions of Firencb Po- 
ptry. 

^0 rife may he more eafy than to fall. 

»3° The Caftle of Vincennes in the Foreft fo calPd, 
three Miles from Paris^ has in the laft Reigns 
been the Place where Princes and great Lords are 
i;on|in'd. 

«" Elijah in a flaming Cloud involv^d^ 

This Hiftory is in the eleventh Chapter of the 
fecond Book of Kings. ^ 

!^ Among the Worlds^ 

T'he French Critick takes this to be one of tl^e 
moft beautiful Paflagcs in the Henriade^ and par- 
ticularly admires the Divinity of it. UAutbeur 
eft mon ^beologien \ the Author is a Divine for me. 
The following Verfes, which are not the worfe 
^r the X^wdation, are very remarkable. 

^bere rules a Judge upright with equal Laws^ 
Kings at bis Feet, and Nations wait their Doom^ 
S'his is the Being infinite we ferve^ 
This He, whom, th(f we know not, we adore. 
A diffWent Name in different Worlds he hears, 
Throned in Effulgence high, he hears our Cries, 
With Pity fees Us wandering from the Truths 
And in a Labyrinth rf Errors loft. 

wj 72>^tf Charlemagne, and Clovis Jit fublime. 

U4 My 



388 NOTES. 

My Author has phcfdCloviszfttrCbarlffmagney 
though he reign'd 300 Years before him, for the 
Sake of the Metre, and I have done it becaufe he 
did it. Clavis was the firft Chriftian King of 
France J or of the French^ and on that Account 
he has great Honours paid him in Hiftory, tho* 
he did not very well deferve them. His Wife 
Clotilda^ Daughter of the Arian King of Burgun- 
dy^ was a Chriftian, and endeavoured to turn hira 
to her Religion, which he did not do till he had 
made a bargain with Heaven : For being at War 
with the Germans^ he promised to be a Chriftian 
en Condition he gained the Battle of "Talbrau An- 
n9 495. but he made no great Hafte to peribrm 
his Promife, notwithftanding the repeated Solli- 
citations of his Wife, and the great Pains St. Va- 
aji took with him; For it was feven or eight 
Years after, that he was baptiz'd at Rbeims by Sc 
Remy^ Bifhop of that Church. However, he 
ftill hanker'd after the Idols of the Franks^ and 
the latter End of his Reign, fays the Biftiop of, 
Meaux^ tamifti*d the Glory of the reft of it. And 
why Voltaire has enthroned him in Heaven, one 
can't well imagine. The French fable, that he 
founded the Church of St. Genevieve in Paris ; 
but theFalfity is fcandaloufly apparent : For they 
fay he dedicated it to St. Peter and St. Pauh 
whereas the Popifli Dedication of Churches was 
not then heard of in the Chriftian World. 

Charlemagne was the Son of Pepin j Son of 
Charles Martel^ fiaftard Son of Pep'm Hertfiely 
Maire of the Palace, who ufurp'd the Govern- 
ment of France about the Year 693, and his Son 
Charles continued the Ufurpation, without aflu- 
ming the Title of King^ which his Father and he 
fuffer'd the fluggifli Kings,, Rots faineans^ De- 
icendants of Clovis^ to enjoy, without any Pow- 
er, 



NOTE S, 2«9 

cn Peptn^ Son of Mattel^ did the fitme ; but 
his Son Charlemagne took the Title of Kkig, and 
the better to eftablifti his Ufiu:^ation, enjgag'd 
the See of Rome in his Intereft, as his Father and 
Grandfather had done before hjm, pafling fevdml 
Times into Italy to deli\^r the -Pope out of tfefe 
Hands of the Lombards \ who^ had it not been 
for the Francksj wouW have delivered Ipaly from 
the Tyranny of the Bifhop of Rome. And on 
this Account it is, that Voltcnr^ ha^s form'd a 
Throne in Heaven for Charlemagne^ a very gfeat 
Deftroyer of Nations and Countries, uttder Pre- 
tence of making them Chriftians, as he calf d his 
idolatrous Franks. The Bilhop of Meaux tells 
us, that England^ as well as other Kingdoms, 
was happy in the EfFe6ls of his Piety and Jujiice^ 
of which we do not meet witK one InAarice in ^n- 
glijh Hiftory. He was crown'd Empemr by 
Pope Leo III, Anno 800. 

'54 ^ere the twelfth Lewis 

He was Grandfon of hewis Duke of Orleans^ 
affajSinated at Paris by the Duke of Burgundy^ in 
the Year 1407. He was ftil'd Pater Patrice^ the 
Father of his Country : However, as good as he 
was, he rebelled againft his Coufin Charles VIIL 
and repudiated his Wife Jeanne de France^ be* 
caufe Ihe was lame, to marry Ann of Breti$gnej 
Charles VIII.'s Widow, whom he lovM better. 
After her Death, he married the Prineefs Mary 
of England^ youngeft Daughter of Henry VII. a 
moft beautiful Prineefs, and it is faid, he kill'd 
hjmfelf with too much Ufe of the Marriage Bed. 

135 j^^h^i^ 



I know not whcdier this was George tPAmhoiJej 
Cardinal, who in this King's Reign was a Candi- 

•'•' • date 



29© NOTES. 

date for the Papacy, and loft it by the Dexterity 
of his Q>mpetitor Julius II. upon which a War 
^cceedcd, though under other Pretexts ; and tiic 
Bifliops of France declared that it was juft. The 
King, Lewis XII. forbad all Application to the 
Court at Rome^ for Benefices, and the fending 
Money thither. He carried his Refentment fo 
far, that he ordered Medals to be ftruck with this 
Infcription out of Ifaiab^ Perdam Babyfonis nomen. 
Thus we fee the moft ChriftianKing huhfelf calls 
the Pope's Rome^ Babylon^ which is not much 
fofter than Hugh Pelers*si fFbore of Babylony the 
Subjeft of fo many wretched Jefts from the Pncr 
tenders to Wit in the laft Age. 

There are fo many of that illuftrious Name in 
French Hiftory, that one knows no? to which of 
them this refers. 

"7 Montmorency^ 
Probably the fame we have fpoken of before, 

*'' TrimouUUy 

The iame may be faid of this Name as o(Fin», 
Lewis de Trimouille fignaliz'd himfelf in the Bat- 
tle of St. jiubin in Bretagne^ where he obtained a 
glorious Viftory for Charles VIIL and openM a 
Way to a Treaty of Marriage with Anne^ Heir 
of that Dutchy, by which it was annex'd to the 
Crown qf prance about the Year 1490. Of this 
noble Houfe was the iamoqs Countefs of Berby^ 
who fo refolutely defended Latham Houfe againit 
the Parliamentarians, in the Time of the Civil 
Wars. Lewis de Trimouille is, as we fuppofe, the 
fame who was ftil'd le Chevalier fans feur ^ fans 



N T E ^. 291 

Repmhe. The Knight without Fear, and with- 
out Reproach, as was alfo ftiPd, 

''9 Bayard^ 

A Warrior of fo great Fame in France^ that 
5tis a Saying to this Day, Js brave as Bayard ; and 
he was as virtuous as he was valiant. He flou- 
rilh'd in the Reigns of Lewis ^11. 2LTidi Francis l. 
and was fo highly honoured, that the latter re- 
ceived the Order of Knighthood from him, after 
the Battle with the Swifs. 



140 



•r^ 



Guifcelin the Bold], 



Bartrand de Guifcelin^ Conftable of France m 
the Reigns of King John and Charles V. He 
was very fuccefsful againft the Englijb in France. 
\T\% faid, that as to his Perfon, it was little and 
ugly, but that his Virtue and Valour did more 
than make Amends for thefe Defefts. He died 
A. D. 1330. before the Caftle of Randan^ which 
furrendring after his Death, the Keys were put 
on his Coffin, to fhew that it fubmitted to him* 

l^ There the redoubted Amazofi th^ faw^ 

Voltaire gives her a Place among the Sahits iit 
Heaven, though the Engltjh burnt her for a 
Witch ; and fhe confefs'd Whoredom, pleading 
her Belly to fave her Life. She is one of the top 
|iero*5 in the French Fafti ; and the graveft and 
OToft learned of their Authors are not a(ham*d of 
wafting many Words, and much Paper, in Pane- 
gyricks upon her. The Bifbop of Meauxynxte^^ 
♦' Sh^ offerM her Service to the King, declaring 
«< *fl;Le had a particular MilTion from God to raife 
^* the Siege of Orleans^ and to convoy hiro to be 
^* crown'd at Rheims. In defperate Af&irs the 
i^ moft extraordinary Counfel) (egn the beft. An 
^' *« Army 



«P2 NOTES. 

«' Army was given to this fame Girl > and the 
*' Baftard of Orleans^ and feveral other gallant 
" Officers, were aflbciated in Commiffion witfi 
•* her. She threw her felf into Orleans^ and made 
** feveral Sallies on the Englijh^ who cou'd not 
** Hand before her, but were obliged to raife the 
** Siege, &f r." The Fanaticifm of this Wench, 
might very well have been taken Notice of by the 
Poet, inflcad of that of the Puritans in England. 
Venner^ the -fifth Monarchift, and twenty or dur- 
ty of his Companions, ftood out againll the 
Guards and Militia of London two or three Days, 
but he is not for that reckoned any thing better 
than a Madman. 

l^ ■ JThy Son auguft^ 

Lewis XIIL Son of Henry IV. and Mary dc 
Medicis^ and Brother to Henrietta Maria^ Queen 
of Englandj Uncle to the Princefs of Orange^ 
and Great-uncle to William III. King of England. 
He was a Prince of a mean Charafter, and very 
fer from dcferving the Name of auguft. His 
being the Father of Lewis XIV. wou'd have ad- 
ded more to his Glory, if his Wife had not been 
brought to Bed of him, three or four and twenty 
Years after he was married to her, in the Decline 
of a very weak Conftitution. 

'« Richlieu and Mazarine, 

> 

Richlieu was a Politician of a prodigious Capa- 
city ; but however, 'tis more than probable that 
he wou'd not have aggrandized the Monarchy of 
France fo much as he did, had it not been for fo 
favourable a Juncture, when the Princes who 
lieign^d in England and Spain ^ who were moft in- 
terefted in giving a Check to that growing Power, 
were both weak and indolent, more given to Bi- 
gotry 



NOTES. 293 

gotry and Superftition, than to good Policy and 
the kingly Office. This Ricblieu was from a fmall 
Bifhoprick advanced to be a Cardinal and Prime 
Minifter by the Favour of Mary de Medicisy whom 
he afterwards fo ungratefully treated, as to reduce 
her almoft to Indigence, and force her to wander 
up and down the laft Year of her Life in foreign 
Countries, in a State of Dilgrace and Poverty. 
A French Author fays of this RichlieUj he was 
L*un de Miniftres le plus grand, le plus craint 6? le 
plus bat qui peuteftre ait jamais HL He was the 
greateft, the moft fear'd, and the moft hated Mi- 
nifter, that perhaps ever was ; notwithftanding 
which, Voltaire rolls him among his Worthies^ 
He died in the Year 1642. aged 57. 

Mazarine, Cardinal, fucceeded Ricblieu in the 
Prime Miniftry, in the Minority of Lewis XIV. 
He was by Birth an Italian, of no great Quality, 
and rofe to that extream Height by his Dexterity 
and Application. He died in the Year 1661. a- 
ged55. 

.'*♦ Before tbat King^ 

Lewis XIY. Graxidfonto Henry IV. HisCha- 
rafter is too recent, and too well known, to need' 
any Remark here. His Hiftory was begun to be 
written above forty Years before he died, by P^- 
Ujffbn, 2^nd the greateft Wits of France ; and rare 
Work, no doubt, they have made of it, the 
Charge he was at upon it amounting to above 
three thoufand Pounds a Year : But the Duke of 
Marlborough, by his Viftories in the latter Part 
of this King's Reign, havii^ reduc'd him to fo 
low a Condition, that he fubmitted to fend one of 
his prime Minifters to a Village in Holland to beg 
a Peace ; the Hiftory that had recorded him a,s 
the Viltorious^ the Conqueror y the Invincible, the 

* Immortal 



2H NOTE^^. 

Immortal Man^. and little lefs than a Gdd, muft 
end his Life with Circumftances that prov'd hitn 
to be hd more invincible than he was immortal. 

i« Defcartes 

Renatus Defcartes j one of the moft famous Phi- 
lofophers of his Age. Part of this Charafter 
ieems to be taken from the Epitaph over Defcar- 
ies^s Tomb in the Nave of the Church of Sl Ge- 
nevieve in Paris, 

Son Efprit mefurant &? la Terre &? Us Cieux: 
He meafures ly his Art both Earth and Skies. 

He liv'd fome Time in the Court of Cbriftinai 
Queen of Sweden. 

»« itou know to conquer J and your Conquefts ftng. 

Was not that very judicioufly and modeftly 

iaid, after the French had been beaten from one 

. End of Europe to the other ? But the Truth is^ 

the French Poefy was more equal to their Feats 

of Arms in thofe Days, than in any other Times. 

i*^ And Condc 

Lewis the Laft, Prince of Conde^ was a very 
great (Seneral, and obtaih'd many glorious Vic- 
tories. He left France in the Beginning of />w- 
is XIV's Mindrity, and remrn'd not all after the 
Pyrenean 'treaty. That King never loy*d himj 
and Conie had a very contemptible Opinioii of his 
Heroiim, when he was almoft fuffocated with the 
Breath of Flatterers, who made him fuperior to 
Alexander and Ccefark 

!^7 TurenriCy 

Monfieur de ^uhnne^ Second Son of Henry it 
U Toury Vicomtc dm^urenne, D^uke de BouSlon. 

ana 



NOTES. ^95 

and Prince of Sedan, one of the greateft Gene- 
rals of his Time. He was very ferviceable to 
Ijewis XIII. and XIV. in their Wars, and conti- 
nued in the Reform'd Religion till he was advan- 
ced in Age near Sixty. But Lewis XIV. telling 
him that it was his Religion only which hindered 
his Elevation to the Degree of Conftable, it was 
very foon after rumour'd that he vifited often the 
Church of the Celeftins, where he conferred with 
the Fathers, in order to be enlightened in the 
Truth of Popery. After he had liv*d fo many 
Years in the glorious Light of the Reformation^ 
*tis a Jeft to imagine that Idolatry, Purgatory^ 
Impoflibility, and the Papal Tyranny^ can con- 
vince a Man of Senfe, who has long been conver- 
fant with the Verity and Purity of the Proteftant 
Religion. A Pagan, a Turk, a Jew, who never 
heard of any other Chriftian Religion but Popery, 
may miftake that for Chriftianity , and embrace it ; 
but a Proteftant in his Wits never can embrace it 
from ConviAion of Mind, however he may be 
fway'd by Paffion or Prejudice, by Ambition or 
Intereft. Some pretend he was converted by the 
Cardinal d^ Boutllon ; but de Buijfon, who ferv*d 
under him as Major of the Regiment de Verdelin, 
and wrote his Life, fays, he was converted by a 
Father of the Oratory, recommended to him by 
the Marquis de Sillery. Wou*d a Man that was 
not refolv'd to be an Apoftate, throw himfelf in- 
to the Arms of Priefts and Friars, to be fatisfied 
pf the Truth of their Religion, without confult- 
ing with thdfe able Minifters whom he had fo ma- 
ny Years heard with Pleafure and Edification ? 
Wou'd he have ftolen away from them to a clan- 
deftine Conference with thofe whom they and he 
himfelf looked on as Enemies to the Gofpel of 
Chrift, which none of the-^apifts ever had the 

Impudence 



^96 NOTES, 

Impudence to fay is the Founda4[ion o^ Popeiy^ 
aft it is moflr certainly of the reform'd Religion P 
But the BatOQQ of France had Charms in it which 
gave him more Light than all the Arguments of 
the Nferquis ie Smeris Prieft, and he abjur'd 
primitive Chriftianity between the Hands, as the 
French fay of the Archbifhop of Paris^ in the 
Prefence of an innumerable Aflfembly of Perfons 
of all Conditions. The Writer of his Life tells 
us, he went always a back Way through the Arfc- 
nal to the Celeftines Church, and he imputes it to 
his Modefty and Simplicity ; whereas a fmall Por^^ 
tion of Reafon and Impartiality wouM have im- 
puted it to his being a(ham'd of what he was a- 
bout. Be that as it will, he became an arrant Pa^ 
pift, and did all he cou'd to convert his Nephew 
the Count de Roye ; fo far he went with his Temp-^ 
rations as to get him an Ofier of a Marefchal's 
Staff. But that noble Lord reje6ted it ; the 
French faid it was becaufe his Father, the Count 
de Rouffyy a Proteftant* had a great Eftate, which 
he cou a have given from him •, and his Son was 
appreheniive he wou'd do fo if he apoftatiz*d 
from his Religion. But that was a Popijh Scan- 
dal ; for the Count de Roye continued a hearty 
Proteftant after his Father's Death, and upon the 
tyrannous Revocation of the Edidl of Nantes, he 
left France, and liv*d the Remainder of his Life 
in England. 

' The Defertion of the Marefchal de ^urenne^ 
was an irreparable Lofs to the reformM in France^ 
and no Wonder he was highly carefs'd for it by 
Lewis XIV. and the Romijh perfecuting Clergy ; 
notwithftanding which, he never obtained the Dig- 
nity of Conftable, but inftead of it, was made 
Marefchal General, having etijoy^d the Honouf 
of Marefchal ever finc€ the Year 1643. and it 

was 



NOTES, 297 

was ^oubtlefs that tlonour which prevaird with 
the Duke J^ Duras and his Brother. the Duke^^ 
Large^ to turn Papifts. Their younger Brother, 
lllqnfieur Duras j Earl of Fever/bam in England^ 
^id not indeed turn downright Papift, but he. 
commanded. King. J^?;2^i*s Popifh Army againft: 
the EngHJh Protectants, not only when the Duke 
oi Monmouth made his rafti Attempt, but when 
afterwards the Prince of Orange^ our glorious 
Deliverer, came and fucceeded. The Vicomte 
de ^lirmne had not been long Marefchal General^ 
before he was kilPd with a Canon Shot, as he 
>Yas direfting the raifing a Battery againft the 
Germans n^^v Stratjbourg. And the Honours"^ 
that were done him by thfc French King, while he, 
liv'd, and after his Death, were but a poor Re* 
ward for the Sacrifice he. had made to him. 

'*^ Cdtinat.- Marefchal de^ 

Who rofe to that Degree from that of a pri- 
vate Gentleman. He had Succefs againft the 
Duke of Savoy in the firft Confederate War after 
the Revolution. He had the Charafter of a Man 
of Virtue, as well as Prudence and Valour. 

'*9 Vauhan^ Marefcbal de^ 

• • • • . 

Advanc'd himfelf by his Knowledge of Gun- 
nery ?Lnd^ Fortification. The Works a:t Namur 
were reckoned his Maftcr-piece. . 

^^'^ Luxemiurgbj 

The Name of thefe Generals were fo often met 
with in Gazettes and Journals, during the Con- 
federate Wars, that they are too recent and fa- 
miliar for Remark. 

'J' Couraiious Yilhn 



298 NOTES. 

A dq)lorable Inftance this, of the fad Efiefts 
of the late Duke of Ormondes defcrting the Con- 
federates in the laft War, and giving VUlars an 
Opportunity to fell upon the Earl ot MbemarU^ 
and a Detachment of the Army of the Allies at 
Denain. 

Dtfputing Thunder with the Bird of Jove. 

With Prince Eugene^ General of the Imperial 
Troops in the confederate Army, whom Pillars 
durft not come near till he was deferted by the 
Englijh General. Too well known to need En- 
largement upon it. 

Here are enough Remarks on thefe modem 
French Heroes : I fhall only add one made by the 
French Remarken " The End of thb fcvcnth 
<* Canto is tedious ; the Poet talks of nothing but 
<< France^ in which he has but ill imitated Virffl^ 
^^ who fpeaks of nothing but Rome. The Rih 
" man Empire was then the World. But France 
" has not the univerfal Monarchy, Graces a Dim 
♦* 6f tf Milord Due de Marlborough : Thanks be 
** to God and my Lord Duke of Marlborough^ 
who had he ftill commanded the Armyof the Al- 
lies, wou'd have fpoil'd Veltairis Compliment u> 
Monfieur VUlars. 

'^^ What Rxfyal routh 

The Dvikt of Burgundy J Son of the Dauphin, 
Son of Lewis XIV. He was Father of Lewis XV. 
the prefent French King, a very hopeful Prince, 
owing, as 'tis faid, to the divine Leflbns of the 
Archbifliop of Cambray, his Preceptor, whofe 
Works arc in univerfal Efteem. Siome fey his 
Telemachus was written purely for the Ufc of this 
Prince. 

us fhe 



1^0 TB^, 299 

I 

• ■ " '. 

•» ii— ~72^ y«/^ ifefo» i» France^ 
^^ — Des Franftns It flus jufte^ 

A Charafter which Wou'd have been far from 
courtly in the Reign of his Grandfather Lewis 
XIV. 

*^ The Hujband^ Wtf^^ the Mother^ and the Son. 
The Duke and Ehitchcfs of Burgundy y and ati 
infant Prince. 

*^^ -^^A cradled King. 

Lewis XV. now reigning, was but four or 
five Yeairs old at his Great-grandfather's Death. 

»^^ Keep Peace and Order ^ and feek War no morcj 

Maintiens VOr^rCy 6? la Paix fans cbercher la 
VtStoirCy 

This may let us a little into the prefent Difpo-, 
fition of the French Nation, and Ihew us that 
their He^ds are no more fiiil of Conquefts, Ac^ 
quifitions, and univerfal Monarchy \ a Chimsera 
that coft them many thoufands of millions of their 
Money, and many millions of Lives to purchale 
at laft, inftead of thofe fine Dreams, Difgraceand 
Mifery. . They can never hope for the fame Jun- 
Aure again, and muft dread the fatal ESe^of 
their grand Monarch's boundlefs Ambition too 
much to covet fuch another Mafter as Lewis XIV. 
and to be Slaves to fuch Politicks. 

'^ ^rbe Line of the Fifth Charles 

Charles V. Emperor of Germany ^ and King of 
Spain^ was fucceeded in that Kingdom by his Son 
PbUip II. Father of PhOip III. Father of PhUip 
IV. Fsitiicr of Charles II. who dic^ childlefs, in 
the Year 1 70a and by his Will left his Kingdom 

X 2 to 



3^oa 1S[ 0:TR S. 

to Pbilip of Anjou^ Brother to the Duke of Bur^ 
gundy beforc-mei^tiDn'd, who by his Grand&dier's 
Afliftancc, in Violation of thc.Marriige Treaty, 
and Renunciation in the Year 1659. in VioUtipn 
of the Treaty of Partition juft naade and fwora 
to, poffefs'd himfelf of the S^panijh Dominions; 
but we fhall fee that our Poet does not think that 
Succeifioi; is like to be profperoifs, or of Advan* 
tage to. Franfc. 

Kings of my Bloody Oh Philip, Ob my Sonsy 
Can you the Spaniards witbth^ French untie? 
How long will Iqji the Fuel you provide 
To fee4 the Ftn, of Difcord in your BAce ? 

''' St. Pol, 

A Creature of the Duke of Guife\ and after- 
wards of his Brother the Duke de Mayne% who 
made him Marefchal of France. He had been a 
Soldier of Fortune, and appearing ftout and def- 
perate^ fit for any bloody £xecuti<Mi, was taken 
into Cuife^% Favour ; but behaving infolently to 
the young Duke of Guifey Son of him who was 
kiird at Skis J the young Prihce ran him- through 
the Body in the City of Rbeimsy of which he was 
Governor. 

V' Near where the hreaihlefs Bodies of our Xsngs 
St. Denis^ a League or tw6 from Paris^ 

'*** 2^«»^Egmont, 

Count Egmontj Son of Count Egmonty who af- 
ter having gained the Battles of St. ^intin ancf 
Gravelin for the King of Spain] was.ungratefidty 
put to Death by him, for ^vouring that.P^ty in 
the Netherlands^ who were for throwing off the 
Spanijh Yoke. CcHint Horff , was . alto put to 
Death on the fame Account^, and HWkam^ the 

' great 



great Prihce of Orange, wou'd have had tKe fame 
Fate, if he ha*d not retir'd in Time, as he wou'd 
have perfuaded thefe Lords to do, but they did 
not think Philip 11. fo blood-thirfty as he prov'd 
to be. 

*^' Near Eure, and Itton'j Jtlver Streams j 

Eure is a River that riifes in the Foreli of Me- 
noult^ ten Leagues above Chartres^ and falls into 
the Seine below Pont de VArche in Normandy, The 
lUon rifes about four Leagues above Moulins in 
Marcbe^ and falls into the Eure below Duadux^ 
in the fame Province. Neither of thefe Rivers 
is navigable. Robbe, the French Geographer, is fo 
^eak as to report that the City of Chartres was 
built a little after the Flood. 

*^* The Duke d'Aumonty whom I take to be An- 
ceftor to the Dukes d*Aumont in our Time, par- 
ticularly to him who was Ambaflador in England 
after the Peace of Utrecht. 

*^' Biron^ Marefchal^, 

Very feithful to Henry IJL and very ferviceable 
to Henry IV. He was Matter of the Ordnance^ 
and had an Apartment as fuch in the Baftille^ 
where he Ihut himfelf up clofe in the Maffacre 
of Paris ; for he was profcrib*d as a Hugonot, 
by means of the Marquis de Tavannes^ and the 
Count de Rets his Enemies, and had been murderM 
iif they cou*d have come at him, thougji he had 
little Religion, and was fo far from being a Pro- 
teftant, that he wou'd have embraced the Party 
of the League^ if they would have given him thirty 
thoufand Livres in Money, which they cou'd not 
fpare, and he wou*d not accept of Jewels ; fay- 
ing, he had no Occafion for them, Brantofne 
fays, this Marefchil de Biron had the greateft 
^ X 3 Hand 



302 NOTES. 

Hand in gaining the Batde of Ton here fpok^ 
of, which was fought in the Year 1590. 

1«* SuOiy Duke de. 

Prime Minifter and Favourite to Henry IV. 

?** GriUonr 

A Gentleman of Prwence. He was reckoned 
one of the braveft Men in France in the Reigns of 
Ifenry III. and Henry IV. 

!^ ^urennej 

Henri de la Tour d'Juvergn^^ Vifcount 4r Tu- 
rennej Marcfchal of France^ married to his firft 
Wife a Princefs of the Houfe of La Mark, who 
brought him in Marriage the Title of Duke de 
BouUkn^ with the Principality of Sedan. He nvas 
Father of the famous Vifcount de Turenne^ Mare- 
fd^al Qeneral of Franee. 

!^7 — —JBy Armaud'i Haie ; 

Armaud de Pleffis^ Cardinal de RicblieUy hated 
the Duke de Bouillon^ eldeft Son of Henry de la 
^our above-mentionM ^ and having got IntelJi- 
gence of his bemg acquainted with Cinquiar'%^ 
Confpiracy, for vjhich that Lord and Monfieur 
de Thouy Son of the Hiftorfan, loft their Heads, 
Procefi was iffu'd a^inft the Duke de BouiUon^ 
who alfo wou*d have loft his Head if he had not 
parted with the Sovereignty of Sedan to procure 
a Pardon. 



368 



iHajfpy Lefdiguieres. 



Monfieur Bonne, Baron de Le/di^ideres^ fxoax 
^n ordinary. Gentleman's Family ui JOauphinyj^ 
rottto the Degree of Marefchal of France^ as Us 
Soa did b (hat of C^HsUe* » Vhich Honoar 



NOTES. 3Q3 

he facrificM his Religion, he being a Proteftant, 
as he had before facrific'd his Confcience to his 
Luft, living openly with a Harlot. 

*^ Bayonne 

A City of France m the Government of Guu 
enne^ bordering on Bifcaicy the capital City of 
which, Bilbao J is famous for the Manufafture of 
Sword-Blades, as is the Country for good Iron. 

»7° . Thou Jhoul^ft thus have dfd. 

This Marefchal, Son of the Duke de Biron^ be- 
ing difgufted, held Correfpondence with the Duke 
of Savoy, and being convifted of Treafon, was 
beheaded -/f . D. 1 602 . Different are the Accounts 
of his Behaviour 5 fome Authors fay, it was fo 
unworthy of his Character, that he almoft died 
with Apprehenfion of Death : And others, that 
Henry IV. ofFcr'd ^q pardon him if he wou*d alk 
it, which he refqs*d tq do. 

*7' Jnd Mantes and Anet, 

Mante is a City Capital of the Mantmis in the 
Ifle of France y water'd by the River 5W»^. Anet 
not fer from Verneuil in Pkardy. The latter fe- 
mous for the Viftory obtain'd there over the 
French by Henry V. King of England. The Car 
ftle of Anet is in the Foreft of Rets, near the 
Banks of the Eure. It was built by de Lorme^ 
reputed the bed Archited in France, in the Reign 
of Henry II. for his Miftrefs Diana de Poitiers, 
by whom he had Iffue, froni whom this. Caftle 
came into the Poffeffion of the Duke de Vendofme, 
and the pr^fent Duke enjoys it at this Time. 
The Gardens are very fine, and in one of them 
jl (^e Statue of Diana in Marble^ The Gate and 

X 4 Clock 



304 NOTES, 

Clock upon it were very much admir'd in pall 
Ages. 

'7* The ready Mejfenger that tbro^ the JVorld 
Hies with light fVing increafing in her Flight. 

Almoft literally from VirgU. 

Mobilitate viget, virefque acquirit eundo. 

'71 On old Idalia'j Borders^ 

Cyprus is here underftood, fo calPd from Mount 
Idalus in that Ifland, facr<d to Venus. Its eaftern 
Coaft faces the lower ^tf. 

'7* Such the gay Entrance 

The French Critick, on this Canto, writes thus, 
«« The Defcription of Amours is not quite fo 
<* lafcivious here, as in Tajfo^ but it wants certain 
«* Beauties, which we find as well in Tajfo as in 
^\ Virgil. Armida and Jiido move our Paflion; 
^ we pity them, we are concern'd for them: 
« But to fpeak freely, I am under no Manner of 
<« Concern for the fair Gabrielk. This Canto is 
<« rather a Pidlure than an Event : 'Tis a Fault, 
<^ and I will maintain it to be one, and a great 
*« Fault, in an Heroick Poem. The Hero's 
" Miftrefs ought to have afted a Part in it. This 
" Canto feems to me to be nothing but a char- 
*' ming and delicate Brothel, where a King of 
<* France diverts himfelf after a Campaigne. 

^5 Omphale 

Queen of Lydia^ whom Hercules fervid for 
Love of her, and changed his Arrows, his Club, 
apd his Lyoffs Skin, for a Diftaff and Spindle, 
and in a Woman's Habit fpun with her and her 
Maids* 



NOTES, 305 

»^ jya not Mark Anthony 

This Story is top well knpwn to nee4 Armpta- 
tion, elpecially fince Mr. Dryden^s Tragedy upoij 
it, with a comical Title, All for Jjoye^ Qr t^c 
fFbrld well loji. 

»77 Severe and fweet 

From the Italian dulcimente feroce^ fwcetly 
fierce. 

'?' Ximois fiB Troas, 

'79 Venice 

I can't imagine why the Poet, after he has 
made Love fly over lb many fine Cities and Coun- 
tries, ftops him in his Flight at the City of Ve* 
nice, unlefs it was becaufe that City feems to rife 
out of the Sea, as *tis fabled his Mother Fenus 
did- 

180 Pctrarch*j happy Song^ 

An Italian Poet, who flourilh'd about the Year 
1350. and is efteem'd the Reviver of Learning. 
Though he liv*d fome Time at Avignon^ where 
the Pope then kept his Court, yet he vas very, 
fevere with his Courtiers for their Vices, and cal- 
led Rome Bahyhn. His Miftrefs's Name was Lau- 
ray but it is thought to be a Nomme de Guerre^ 
and that he under it conceal'd a Lady of too great 
Quality to be own'd by him. 

!?! Diana* J Cypher^ 

Diana de Poitiers^ Miftrefs to Henry IL King 
of France^ was Daughter to the Count de St. Val- 
lier^ who was condemned to be beheaded for be- 
ing an Accomplice in theHebpllion of the Con- 

ftahlc 



3o6 NOTES, 

ftable of Bmirhon ; but his Life was fav^d, hT 
means of this Dau^ter of his^ who purchased it 
with her Virgmity, of Francis L King of Franciy 
when ihe was but fourteen Years of Age. She 
had been bred in the Court of the Countels <^ 
AngoidefnUy Mother of Francis I. and afterwards 
was Maid of Honour to Queen Claude. Sie oon- 
tinu'd to be Miftrefs to that King till his Expe- 
dition to Italy y where he was taken Prifoner at 
Pavia. She dien nurried Lewis de Brezey Sene- 
Ichal of Normandy y and was thirty- five Years old 
when Henry 11. Son of Francis I. fell in Love 
with her. 'Tis aftonifhins, that fo wife and learn- 
ed a Man as Monfieur de ^thou^ fhou'd believe 
Ihe eain'd his Love by Magick and Philtres. Phd- 
iris cf Magicisy ut creaitur, artibus adeo ftU animum 
Hentici devinxit. What docs he^ mean by Ma- 
gUk ? The old exploded Fable of dealing with 
the Devil ? And what by Philtres ? Liirue Pc^ipdns 
which WenchesL give young Fellows to make them 
in Love with them ? 'Tis no doubt in the Power 
qf Philtres to enflame Luft, and ^|ve a Man De- 
fire for the next Worpan he m^ets^ but not to in- 
fpire a Paffion for any particular Woman. Th<? 
well-attefted Hiftory of the lewd Countefs of j^ 
[ex and Mrs. Xurn^ty in King James the Firffa 
Reign, proves that, beyond Contcft. As to Ma-i^ 
gicky credat Jud(sus apella. Henry II. became en-» 
ampur'd of her, when he was Daufbiny in his; 
Father's Life-time, and after Ihe was Widow to 
Lewis de Breze^ Count ^ Maulevrier. She hated 
the reformed Religion fo heartily, that fhe difinn 
herited her two Daughters^ ^ Dutcheflbs de JSte- 
ilion. 2ind ^Autnale, by ber Will^ if ever they 
turnM Proteftants^ Vajrillas himfclf wites of n 
thus, " Tho* her Cbnfcienqe permitted her to, 
V* liv? twenty Ye^rs m a Ctommexa with her Sk>- 

^ vere^ 



NOTES. 307 

^* vereign forbidden by the -Gofpel, yet it was 
*^ otherwifc fb delicate, that it wou*d not fuflfer 
♦* her to fpeak to Perfons fufpefted of Herefy,'* 
Henry 11. created her Dutchefs de Valentinois. She 
heapM up an immenfe Treafure by felling of Be- 
nefices, Pardons, and all the unjuft Ways that of- 
fered. *Tis laid, the Duke de Guife, Father of 
that Duke who caused the Parifian Majptcrey in-* 
tended to marry this Dutchefs, but was difliiaded 
by Adqiiral Coligny^ to whom he then pretended 
Friendfhip, ** Tte Dutchefs de Valentinois^ fays 
•* die Author of the Melange Critique^ fePr. was 
*« the Caufe of the Divifion between Admiral C^ 
*' lig^y and the Duke de Guife^ which was the 
^* Caufe pf fuch prodigious and fatal Efie^fcs. 
*« Thefe two Lprds being one Day at Tennis, 
** the Admiral faid to him. He wondered a Man 
♦* of bis IVifdom and ^alitywou*d think of marry^ 
*« ing a Whore, The Duke de Guife took that 
^* Saying fo ill, th^t he ever after hated the Ad- 
•^ miral, declared himfelf his Enemy ,, and fought 
^' his I)eftruftion j infomuch that the Whore, as 
** the Admiral ca|i'd her, or the Qjarrel that rojfe 
** concernipg her, had greater Share of the Maf- 
*• iacre of St. Bartholomew^ than^Religion. This 
** Herodias perhaps demanded the Head of Ad-. 
** miral Coligny.^* She liv*d to a great Age, near 
Eighty, died zx.Anet^ and was buried in the Chap- 
pel Ihe built there. This Caftle was from her 
caU*d Dianet by the Poets of thofe Times, Her 
Tomb is to be feen in that Chappel to this Day. 
Jaques de Breze^ her Hufband's Father, kill*4 
his Wife, a Baflard Daughter of Charles VII. for 
Adultery with hisi Huntmian. Diana was of the 
Houfe of Lujignan, one of which was King of 
Cyprui ; and though ihe was fuch an abandonH 
l^ioflimea^ ta lie with both Fatheraad Smi yee 



3o8 NOTES, 

as I have obfeiVd, fhe was a great Bigot to Pa- 
pery, and k extremely devout, dut flie chofefot 
Iier Device^ a Tomb out of which an Arrow ap 
pear'd (hooting in the Air, and out of that fhot 
young green Sprigs ^ the Motto, Sola vivU in Sh. 
She lives in God done^ Anet was condecin'd to be 
raz'd when the Duke ^Jumale her Grandfon was 
condenm'd to be beheaded, but it efcapM that 
Misfortune. 

* As Henry bad jufi formed fame j^rand DeJJgn. 

In the French^ 
Z^Roypre^ d^sn partir pour un plus Grand deffHn. 

I have more than once hinted, that my Author 
16 fometimes too profaick, and that I am excufe- 
able when I am fo, having the Original for my 
Plea. 

»*J Her Name d'Eftrce, 

Gabrielle d^EJiree, commonly calPd la belle Ga- 
hrielle. She was Daughter of the Marquis d^Ef- 
tree, the fame, as I take it, who was Mafter of 
the Ordnance, as was his Father before him, and 
a zealous Proteftant, which endeared him to the 
Admiral Coli^ny, 

»«* Nor the ^een 

Cleopatra, Queen of Egypt, of whom Plutarch 
writes, that haying given Ailiftance to Cafftus ia' 
his War with Oifavius and Anthofr^, when that 
War was over, and Anthony came into the Eaft, 
Ke fent Cleopatra a Command to make her per* 
fonal Appearance in Cilicia, to anfwer that Charge, 
which after fome afiedied Delay (he did in thia 
Manner : She embark'd in a imali Galley in the 
River Cydnus, the Head of the Barge fliin'd widi* 
inlaid Gold» the Sails were of purple Silk, tiie^ 

Oars 



QWsVSivet, which beat Time to tlie FlUtts^ 
apfi Naiadboys ; ihe.ber &lf ky all along undter 2t 
Canopy of Cbtkof Goldy cqrioufly cmbroider'aj 
drefs'das Fenus is ordinarily reprefented, andbeaur 
tifiil young Boys, like^QupUs^ ftoodL on each Side 
to fen her. Her Ms^ids were drels'd like Sea 
Nymphs and Graces^ fbme fleering the Rudder, 
fome working at the Ropes. The Perfumes dif- 
fiis'd themfelves from the- Veflel to the Shoar, 
which was all covered with Multitudes^ meeting 
and following the Galley, 6f h ' 

'*^ Jmng the Tents of GaJvin^j Sons 

The Protefbnts, If the reform'd ReKgion is 
a damnable Herefy, as the Bifliop of Meaux^ 
and the very befl: of the Popifli Bifhops fay it isj 
how comes it that the good Angel of France de- 
fcends from Heaven to infpire a Protefbint for 
the Prefervation of the King ; and how came St. 
Lewis not to direft his Flight otherwife? If it is 
not a damnable Herefy, but in the Favour of 
Heaven as. this Flight of the Angel intimates, 
how came it that St, Lewis is fo foUicitous about 
the King's deferting it, and how came Voltaire 
to make his Defertion the Subje£t of an Epick 
Poem? This is not very confiftcnt. 

>«6 Marcus.Jurelius 

Antoninus J furnam*d Philofopbus^ Emperor* of 
Romey about the Year 1 60. He was a Prince of 
great Virtue and Learning, as appears by his 
"Works •, but "he publifti'd fevcre Edifts againft 
the Chriflians, to whom he became favourable at 
the latter End of his Reign, occafion^d, as it is 
faid, by a Miraele which their Prayeis for* him' 
wrought, in obtaining Rain when his Army was 
ready to perilh for Want of Water. It* is no 

Wonder 



3IO NOTEy. 

Wonder it had fuch an Efiedt on a Prmde of hit 
Underftanding and Goodnds. This Miracle is,, 
however^ cootefted hy fome Writers^ 

*^ Plato 

Sumam'd tiit Divine. He was born itAibenss 
a little before the Time of Alexander the Great, 
His Mafter Socrates was chief of the Seft of the 
Academich. He was one who travelled as well as 
ftiidied for Knowledge. Plutarch gives the Hi- 
ftory of his Reception by Di^ifx/itfi, Tyrant of 5/- 
aly. His Works are in the highcft Efteem with 
the Learned and the Virtuous. 

*■• Fair Arethula, 

The Fable fays, flie was a Nymph, Daughter 
of Nereus and JDoriJ, one of Diana^s Compa- 
nions, belov*d of Alpbeusy whole Violence when 
iHe cou'd not efcape, Diana turn'd her into a 
Fountain of that Name, whofe Waters, that they 
Inight not mix with AlpheuC^ Stream^ ran under 
Ground by fecret Channels, and broke out again 
by Syracuse in SicUy^ whither M^heui alfo purfu*d 
her. 

"^ Papbos, 

A City of Cyprus^ fabled to be for call'd from 
Papbiusj Son of Pygmalion^ who built it. Venus 
had a Temple there, much frequented by her Vo- 
taries, 

•^ But Turenne prevails. 

The Hiftory of Henry IV. being fo recent and 
fo well known in France^ this Variation from it 
is contrary to the Rules of Criticifmj and indeed 
to good Senfej jvhich is the fame Thing. Every 
one that knows any Thing of the Story, .knows 
there was no fuch Dud as this between iAumak 

and 



NOTES. 311 

u«]7«raiw. The AAion of rfie Poem was pro- 
bably in the Memory of the Poet's Grandfouier* 
and it was not allow'd him to add any Thing to 
the Story, which he did not introduce by Ma- 
chines, This is not the only Inllance of his alter- 
ing the Hiftory. The French Critick obferves, 
Je m voudrm pas nen plus qu*i la fin de caiquieme 
Chant Henry IV. fut reprefente ft puiffant^ &c. 
** Neither wou'd I have had Henry IV. repre- 
« fented fo powerful at the End of the Fifth 
*• Canto, where he is made to be fo near con- 
*• qucring the League ■» it is contrary to the 
*» Truth of Hiftory, anj befides lakes off from 
** the Reader's Surprize." However, he"bwns 
the Combat between Turenne and d^Aumale to be 
very fine. He criticizes farther on this Canta 
•• The Famine which follows, comes too abrupt. 
«* It is not prcpar'd. 'Tis alfo too kmg. The 
** Clemency of Henry IV. draws Tears, but St. 
*' Levds makes one laugh. He goes to the Al- 
'• mighty to befeech him to fend Henry IV, to 
« Mais, iSc. 



Finding the following Note omitted in its 
Place among the Notes, I infert it hert. 

Lineff. dotifror'dnd Fathii'_^}iU.Counlrey, He 

I aril fcnfible tliat He Rercwill by vulgar Judg- 
es' be reclcon'd fi Bstcb ; but JtCGu'd not be tor thfr 
Sake of the R^ufie: And I qhink the tranfpofing- 
the W'ord mare poetical, than placing it at the- 
Head of ;hc Line. R^we in his Lucan has 

Phorcus and Cseto, next to Neptune, He 

Hcltas alfo, Conquei-or arid Confror, y0orya.nd 
Via'ry^ three Syllables and two Syllables; ind 
tho' J have fl:iKliou(]y avoided to ufe Diflyllables 
at the End of a Verfc, even in this Blank Metre, 
yet if I had made life of them oftner, I might ju- 
ftify it by the Example of Mr. Dryden, yir.Rowe^ 
Mr. Pope, and our beft Verfifiers".' 



ST 817 



n. IX. 1567 



